Catelyn had never liked this godswood.
She had been born a Tully, at Riverrun far to the south, on the Red Fork of the Trident. The godswood there was a garden, bright and airy, where tall redwoods spread dappled shadows across tinkling streams, birds sang from hidden nests, and the air was spicy with the scent of flowers.
The gods of Winterfell kept a different sort of wood. It was a dark, primal place, three acres of old forest untouched for ten thousand years as the gloomy castle rose around it. It smelled of moist earth and decay. No redwoods grew here. This was a wood of stubborn sentinel trees armored in grey-green needles, of mighty oaks, of ironwoods as old as the realm itself. Here thick black trunks crowded close together while twisted branches wove a dense canopy overhead and misshapen roots wrestled beneath the soil. This was a place of deep silence and brooding shadows, and the gods who lived here had no names.
But she knew she would find her husband here tonight. Whenever he took a man’s life, afterward he would seek the quiet of the godswood.
Catelyn had been anointed with the seven oils and named in the rainbow of light that filled the sept of Riverrun. She was of the Faith, like her father and grandfather and his father before him. Her gods had names, and their faces were as familiar as the faces of her parents. Worship was a septon with a censer, the smell of incense, a seven-sided crystal alive with light, voices raised in song. The Tullys kept a godswood, as all the great houses did, but it was only a place to walk or read or lie in the sun. Worship was for the sept.
For her sake, Ned had built a small sept where she might sing to the seven faces of god, but the blood of the First Men still flowed in the veins of the Starks, and his own gods were the old ones, the nameless, faceless gods of the greenwood they shared with the vanished children of the forest.
At the center of the grove an ancient weirwood brooded over a small pool where the waters were black and cold. “The heart tree,” Ned called it. The weirwood’s bark was white as bone, its leaves dark red, like a thousand bloodstained hands. A face had been carved in the trunk of the great tree, its features long and melancholy, the deep-cut eyes red with dried sap and strangely watchful. They were old, those eyes; older than Winterfell itself. They had seen Brandon the Builder set the first stone, if the tales were true; they had watched the castle’s granite walls rise around them. It was said that the children of the forest had carved the faces in the trees during the dawn centuries before the coming of the First Men across the narrow sea.
In the south the last weirwoods had been cut down or burned out a thousand years ago, except on the Isle of Faces where the green men kept their silent watch. Up here it was different. Here every castle had its godswood, and every godswood had its heart tree, and every heart tree its face.
Catelyn found her husband beneath the weirwood, seated on a moss-covered stone. The greatsword Ice was across his lap, and he was cleaning the blade in those waters black as night. A thousand years of humus lay thick upon the godswood floor, swallowing the sound of her feet, but the red eyes of the weirwood seemed to follow her as she came. “Ned,” she called softly.
He lifted his head to look at her. “Catelyn,” he said. His voice was distant and formal. “Where are the children?”
He would always ask her that. “In the kitchen, arguing about names for the wolf pups.” She spread her cloak on the forest floor and sat beside the pool, her back to the weirwood. She could feel the eyes watching her, but she did her best to ignore them. “Arya is already in love, and Sansa is charmed and gracious, but Rickon is not quite sure.”
“Is he afraid?” Ned asked.
“A little,” she admitted. “He is only three.”
Ned frowned. “He must learn to face his fears. He will not be three forever. And winter is coming.”
“Yes,” Catelyn agreed. The words gave her a chill, as they always did. The Stark words. Every noble house had its words. Family mottoes, touchstones, prayers of sorts, they boasted of honor and glory, promised loyalty and truth, swore faith and courage. All but the Starks. Winter is coming, said the Stark words. Not for the first time, she reflected on what a strange people these northerners were.
“The man died well, I’ll give him that,” Ned said. He had a swatch of oiled leather in one hand. He ran it lightly up the greatsword as he spoke, polishing the metal to a dark glow. “I was glad for Bran’s sake. You would have been proud of Bran.”
“I am always proud of Bran,” Catelyn replied, watching the sword as he stroked it. She could see the rippling deep within the steel, where the metal had been folded back on itself a hundred times in the forging. Catelyn had no love for swords, but she could not deny that Ice had its own beauty. It had been forged in Valyria, before the Doom had come to the old Freehold, when the ironsmiths had worked their metal with spells as well as hammers. Four hundred years old it was, and as sharp as the day it was forged. The name it bore was older still, a legacy from the age of heroes, when the Starks were Kings in the North.
“He was the fourth this year,” Ned said grimly. “The poor man was half-mad. Something had put a fear in him so deep that my words could not reach him.” He sighed. “Ben writes that the strength of the Night’s Watch is down below a thousand. It’s not only desertions. They are losing men on rangings as well.”
“Is it the wildlings?” she asked.
“Who else?” Ned lifted Ice, looked down the cool steel length of it. “And it will only grow worse. The day may come when I will have no choice but to call the banners and ride north to deal with this King-beyond-the-Wall for good and all.”
“Beyond the Wall?” The thought made Catelyn shudder.
Ned saw the dread on her face. “Mance Rayder is nothing for us to fear.”
“There are darker things beyond the Wall.” She glanced behind her at the heart tree, the pale bark and red eyes, watching, listening, thinking its long slow thoughts.
His smile was gentle. “You listen to too many of Old Nan’s stories. The Others are as dead as the children of the forest, gone eight thousand years. Maester Luwin will tell you they never lived at all. No living man has ever seen one.”
“Until this morning, no living man had ever seen a direwolf either,” Catelyn reminded him.
“I ought to know better than to argue with a Tully,” he said with a rueful smile. He slid Ice back into its sheath. “You did not come here to tell me crib tales. I know how little you like this place. What is it, my lady?”
Catelyn took her husband’s hand. “There was grievous news today, my lord. I did not wish to trouble you until you had cleansed yourself.” There was no way to soften the blow, so she told him straight. “I am so sorry, my love. Jon Arryn is dead.”
His eyes found hers, and she could see how hard it took him, as she had known it would. In his youth, Ned had fostered at the Eyrie, and the childless Lord Arryn had become a second father to him and his fellow ward, Robert Baratheon. When the Mad King Aerys II Targaryen had demanded their heads, the Lord of the Eyrie had raised his moon-and-falcon banners in revolt rather than give up those he had pledged to protect.
And one day fifteen years ago, this second father had become a brother as well, as he and Ned stood together in the sept at Riverrun to wed two sisters, the daughters of Lord Hoster Tully.
“Jon …” he said. “Is this news certain?”
“It was the king’s seal, and the letter is in Robert’s own hand. I saved it for you. He said Lord Arryn was taken quickly. Even Maester Pycelle was helpless, but he brought the milk of the poppy, so Jon did not linger long in pain.”
“That is some small mercy, I suppose,” he said. She could see the grief on his face, but even then he thought first of her. “Your sister,” he said. “And Jon’s boy. What word of them?”
“The message said only that they were well, and had returned to the Eyrie,” Catelyn said. “I wish they had gone to Riverrun instead. The Eyrie is high and lonely, and it was ever her husband’s place, not hers. Lord Jon’s memory will haunt each stone. I know my sister. She needs the comfort of family and friends around her.”
“Your uncle waits in the Vale, does he not? Jon named him Knight of the Gate, I’d heard.”
Catelyn nodded. “Brynden will do what he can for her, and for the boy. That is some comfort, but still …”
“Go to her,” Ned urged. “Take the children. Fill her halls with noise and shouts and laughter. That boy of hers needs other children about him, and Lysa should not be alone in her grief.”
“Would that I could,” Catelyn said. “The letter had other tidings. The king is riding to Winterfell to seek you out.”
It took Ned a moment to comprehend her words, but when the understanding came, the darkness left his eyes. “Robert is coming here?” When she nodded, a smile broke across his face.
Catelyn wished she could share his joy. But she had heard the talk in the yards; a direwolf dead in the snow, a broken antler in its throat. Dread coiled within her like a snake, but she forced herself to smile at this man she loved, this man who put no faith in signs. “I knew that would please you,” she said. “We should send word to your brother on the Wall.”
“Yes, of course,” he agreed. “Ben will want to be here. I shall tell Maester Luwin to send his swiftest bird.” Ned rose and pulled her to her feet. “Damnation, how many years has it been? And he gives us no more notice than this? How many in his party, did the message say?”
“I should think a hundred knights, at the least, with all their retainers, and half again as many freeriders. Cersei and the children travel with them.”
“Robert will keep an easy pace for their sakes,” he said. “It is just as well. That will give us more time to prepare.”
“The queen’s brothers are also in the party,” she told him.
Ned grimaced at that. There was small love between him and the queen’s family, Catelyn knew. The Lannisters of Casterly Rock had come late to Robert’s cause, when victory was all but certain, and he had never forgiven them. “Well, if the price for Robert’s company is an infestation of Lannisters, so be it. It sounds as though Robert is bringing half his court.”
“Where the king goes, the realm follows,” she said.
“It will be good to see the children. The youngest was still sucking at the Lannister woman’s teat the last time I saw him. He must be, what, five by now?”
“Prince Tommen is seven,” she told him. “The same age as Bran. Please, Ned, guard your tongue. The Lannister woman is our queen, and her pride is said to grow with every passing year.”
Ned squeezed her hand. “There must be a feast, of course, with singers, and Robert will want to hunt. I shall send Jory south with an honor guard to meet them on the kingsroad and escort them back. Gods, how are we going to feed them all? On his way already, you said? Damn the man. Damn his royal hide.”

Of all the rooms in Winterfell’s Great Keep, Catelyn’s bedchambers were the hottest. She seldom had to light a fire. The castle had been built over natural hot springs, and the scalding waters rushed through its walls and chambers like blood through a man’s body, driving the chill from the stone halls, filling the glass gardens with a moist warmth, keeping the earth from freezing. Open pools smoked day and night in a dozen small courtyards. That was a little thing, in summer; in winter, it was the difference between life and death.
Catelyn’s bath was always hot and steaming, and her walls warm to the touch. The warmth reminded her of Riverrun, of days in the sun with Lysa and Edmure, but Ned could never abide the heat. The Starks were made for the cold, he would tell her, and she would laugh and tell him in that case they had certainly built their castle in the wrong place.
So when they had finished, Ned rolled off and climbed from her bed, as he had a thousand times before. He crossed the room, pulled back the heavy tapestries, and threw open the high narrow windows one by one, letting the night air into the chamber.
The wind swirled around him as he stood facing the dark, naked and empty-handed. Catelyn pulled the furs to her chin and watched him. He looked somehow smaller and more vulnerable, like the youth she had wed in the sept at Riverrun, fifteen long years gone. Her loins still ached from the urgency of his lovemaking. It was a good ache. She could feel his seed within her. She prayed that it might quicken there. It had been three years since Rickon. She was not too old. She could give him another son.
“I will refuse him,” Ned said as he turned back to her. His eyes were haunted, his voice thick with doubt.
Catelyn sat up in the bed. “You cannot. You must not.”
“My duties are here in the north. I have no wish to be Robert’s Hand.”
“He will not understand that. He is a king now, and kings are not like other men. If you refuse to serve him, he will wonder why, and sooner or later he will begin to suspect that you oppose him. Can’t you see the danger that would put us in?”
Ned shook his head, refusing to believe. “Robert would never harm me or any of mine. We were closer than brothers. He loves me. If I refuse him, he will roar and curse and bluster, and in a week we will laugh about it together. I know the man!”
“You knew the man,” she said. “The king is a stranger to you.” Catelyn remembered the direwolf dead in the snow, the broken antler lodged deep in her throat. She had to make him see. “Pride is everything to a king, my lord. Robert came all this way to see you, to bring you these great honors, you cannot throw them back in his face.”
“Honors?” Ned laughed bitterly.
“In his eyes, yes,” she said.
“And in yours?”
“And in mine,” she blazed, angry now. Why couldn’t he see? “He offers his own son in marriage to our daughter, what else would you call that? Sansa might someday be queen. Her sons could rule from the Wall to the mountains of Dorne. What is so wrong with that?”
“Gods, Catelyn, Sansa is only eleven,” Ned said. “And Joffrey … Joffrey is …”
She finished for him. “…   crown prince, and heir to the Iron Throne. And I was only twelve when my father promised me to your brother Brandon.”
That brought a bitter twist to Ned’s mouth. “Brandon. Yes. Brandon would know what to do. He always did. It was all meant for Brandon. You, Winterfell, everything. He was born to be a King’s Hand and a father to queens. I never asked for this cup to pass to me.”
“Perhaps not,” Catelyn said, “but Brandon is dead, and the cup has passed, and you must drink from it, like it or not.”
Ned turned away from her, back to the night. He stood staring out in the darkness, watching the moon and the stars perhaps, or perhaps the sentries on the wall.
Catelyn softened then, to see his pain. Eddard Stark had married her in Brandon’s place, as custom decreed, but the shadow of his dead brother still lay between them, as did the other, the shadow of the woman he would not name, the woman who had borne him his bastard son.
She was about to go to him when the knock came at the door, loud and unexpected. Ned turned, frowning. “What is it?”
Desmond’s voice came through the door. “My lord, Maester Luwin is without and begs urgent audience.”
“You told him I had left orders not to be disturbed?”
“Yes, my lord. He insists.”
“Very well. Send him in.”
Ned crossed to the wardrobe and slipped on a heavy robe. Catelyn realized suddenly how cold it had become. She sat up in bed and pulled the furs to her chin. “Perhaps we should close the windows,” she suggested.
Ned nodded absently. Maester Luwin was shown in.
The maester was a small grey man. His eyes were grey, and quick, and saw much. His hair was grey, what little the years had left him. His robe was grey wool, trimmed with white fur, the Stark colors. Its great floppy sleeves had pockets hidden inside. Luwin was always tucking things into those sleeves and producing other things from them: books, messages, strange artifacts, toys for the children. With all he kept hidden in his sleeves, Catelyn was surprised that Maester Luwin could lift his arms at all.
The maester waited until the door had closed behind him before he spoke. “My lord,” he said to Ned, “pardon for disturbing your rest. I have been left a message.”
Ned looked irritated. “Been left? By whom? Has there been a rider? I was not told.”
“There was no rider, my lord. Only a carved wooden box, left on a table in my observatory while I napped. My servants saw no one, but it must have been brought by someone in the king’s party. We have had no other visitors from the south.”
“A wooden box, you say?” Catelyn said.
“Inside was a fine new lens for the observatory, from Myr by the look of it. The lenscrafters of Myr are without equal.”
Ned frowned. He had little patience for this sort of thing, Catelyn knew. “A lens,” he said. “What has that to do with me?”
“I asked the same question,” Maester Luwin said. “Clearly there was more to this than the seeming.”
Under the heavy weight of her furs, Catelyn shivered. “A lens is an instrument to help us see.”
“Indeed it is.” He fingered the collar of his order; a heavy chain worn tight around the neck beneath his robe, each link forged from a different metal.
Catelyn could feel dread stirring inside her once again. “What is it that they would have us see more clearly?”
“The very thing I asked myself.” Maester Luwin drew a tightly rolled paper out of his sleeve. “I found the true message concealed within a false bottom when I dismantled the box the lens had come in, but it is not for my eyes.”
Ned held out his hand. “Let me have it, then.”
Luwin did not stir. “Pardons, my lord. The message is not for you either. It is marked for the eyes of the Lady Catelyn, and her alone. May I approach?”
Catelyn nodded, not trusting to speak. The maester placed the paper on the table beside the bed. It was sealed with a small blob of blue wax. Luwin bowed and began to retreat.
“Stay,” Ned commanded him. His voice was grave. He looked at Catelyn. “What is it? My lady, you’re shaking.”
“I’m afraid,” she admitted. She reached out and took the letter in trembling hands. The furs dropped away from her nakedness, forgotten. In the blue wax was the moon-and-falcon seal of House Arryn. “It’s from Lysa.” Catelyn looked at her husband. “It will not make us glad,” she told him. “There is grief in this message, Ned. I can feel it.”
Ned frowned, his face darkening. “Open it.”
Catelyn broke the seal.
Her eyes moved over the words. At first they made no sense to her. Then she remembered. “Lysa took no chances. When we were girls together, we had a private language, she and I.”
“Can you read it?”
“Yes,” Catelyn admitted.
“Then tell us.”
“Perhaps I should withdraw,” Maester Luwin said.
“No,” Catelyn said. “We will need your counsel.” She threw back the furs and climbed from the bed. The night air was as cold as the grave on her bare skin as she padded across the room.
Maester Luwin averted his eyes. Even Ned looked shocked. “What are you doing?” he asked.
“Lighting a fire,” Catelyn told him. She found a dressing gown and shrugged into it, then knelt over the cold hearth.
“Maester Luwin—” Ned began.
“Maester Luwin has delivered all my children,” Catelyn said. “This is no time for false modesty.” She slid the paper in among the kindling and placed the heavier logs on top of it.
Ned crossed the room, took her by the arm, and pulled her to her feet. He held her there, his face inches from her. “My lady, tell me! What was this message?”
Catelyn stiffened in his grasp. “A warning,” she said softly. “If we have the wits to hear.”
His eyes searched her face. “Go on.”
“Lysa says Jon Arryn was murdered.”
His fingers tightened on her arm. “By whom?”
“The Lannisters,” she told him. “The queen.”
Ned released his hold on her arm. There were deep red marks on her skin. “Gods,” he whispered. His voice was hoarse. “Your sister is sick with grief. She cannot know what she is saying.”
“She knows,” Catelyn said. “Lysa is impulsive, yes, but this message was carefully planned, cleverly hidden. She knew it meant death if her letter fell into the wrong hands. To risk so much, she must have had more than mere suspicion.” Catelyn looked to her husband. “Now we truly have no choice. You must be Robert’s Hand. You must go south with him and learn the truth.”
She saw at once that Ned had reached a very different conclusion. “The only truths I know are here. The south is a nest of adders I would do better to avoid.”
Luwin plucked at his chain collar where it had chafed the soft skin of his throat. “The Hand of the King has great power, my lord. Power to find the truth of Lord Arryn’s death, to bring his killers to the king’s justice. Power to protect Lady Arryn and her son, if the worst be true.”
Ned glanced helplessly around the bedchamber. Catelyn’s heart went out to him, but she knew she could not take him in her arms just then. First the victory must be won, for her children’s sake. “You say you love Robert like a brother. Would you leave your brother surrounded by Lannisters?”
“The Others take both of you,” Ned muttered darkly. He turned away from them and went to the window. She did not speak, nor did the maester. They waited, quiet, while Eddard Stark said a silent farewell to the home he loved. When he turned away from the window at last, his voice was tired and full of melancholy, and moisture glittered faintly in the corners of his eyes. “My father went south once, to answer the summons of a king. He never came home again.”
“A different time,” Maester Luwin said. “A different king.”
“Yes,” Ned said dully. He seated himself in a chair by the hearth. “Catelyn, you shall stay here in Winterfell.”
His words were like an icy draft through her heart. “No,” she said, suddenly afraid. Was this to be her punishment? Never to see his face again, nor to feel his arms around her?
“Yes,” Ned said, in words that would brook no argument. “You must govern the north in my stead, while I run Robert’s errands. There must always be a Stark in Winterfell. Robb is fourteen. Soon enough, he will be a man grown. He must learn to rule, and I will not be here for him. Make him part of your councils. He must be ready when his time comes.”
“Gods will, not for many years,” Maester Luwin murmured.
“Maester Luwin, I trust you as I would my own blood. Give my wife your voice in all things great and small. Teach my son the things he needs to know. Winter is coming.”
Maester Luwin nodded gravely. Then silence fell, until Catelyn found her courage and asked the question whose answer she most dreaded. “What of the other children?”
Ned stood, and took her in his arms, and held her face close to his. “Rickon is very young,” he said gently. “He should stay here with you and Robb. The others I would take with me.”
“I could not bear it,” Catelyn said, trembling.
“You must,” he said. “Sansa must wed Joffrey, that is clear now, we must give them no grounds to suspect our devotion. And it is past time that Arya learned the ways of a southron court. In a few years she will be of an age to marry too.”
Sansa would shine in the south, Catelyn thought to herself, and the gods knew that Arya needed refinement. Reluctantly, she let go of them in her heart. But not Bran. Never Bran. “Yes,” she said, “but please, Ned, for the love you bear me, let Bran remain here at Winterfell. He is only seven.”
“I was eight when my father sent me to foster at the Eyrie,” Ned said. “Ser Rodrik tells me there is bad feeling between Robb and Prince Joffrey. That is not healthy. Bran can bridge that distance. He is a sweet boy, quick to laugh, easy to love. Let him grow up with the young princes, let him become their friend as Robert became mine. Our House will be the safer for it.”
He was right; Catelyn knew it. It did not make the pain any easier to bear. She would lose all four of them, then: Ned, and both girls, and her sweet, loving Bran. Only Robb and little Rickon would be left to her. She felt lonely already. Winterfell was such a vast place. “Keep him off the walls, then,” she said bravely. “You know how Bran loves to climb.”
Ned kissed the tears from her eyes before they could fall. “Thank you, my lady,” he whispered. “This is hard, I know.”
“What of Jon Snow, my lord?” Maester Luwin asked.
Catelyn tensed at the mention of the name. Ned felt the anger in her, and pulled away.
Many men fathered bastards. Catelyn had grown up with that knowledge. It came as no surprise to her, in the first year of her marriage, to learn that Ned had fathered a child on some girl chance met on campaign. He had a man’s needs, after all, and they had spent that year apart, Ned off at war in the south while she remained safe in her father’s castle at Riverrun. Her thoughts were more of Robb, the infant at her breast, than of the husband she scarcely knew. He was welcome to whatever solace he might find between battles. And if his seed quickened, she expected he would see to the child’s needs.
He did more than that. The Starks were not like other men. Ned brought his bastard home with him, and called him “son” for all the north to see. When the wars were over at last, and Catelyn rode to Winterfell, Jon and his wet nurse had already taken up residence.
That cut deep. Ned would not speak of the mother, not so much as a word, but a castle has no secrets, and Catelyn heard her maids repeating tales they heard from the lips of her husband’s soldiers. They whispered of Ser Arthur Dayne, the Sword of the Morning, deadliest of the seven knights of Aerys’s Kingsguard, and of how their young lord had slain him in single combat. And they told how afterward Ned had carried Ser Arthur’s sword back to the beautiful young sister who awaited him in a castle called Starfall on the shores of the Summer Sea. The Lady Ashara Dayne, tall and fair, with haunting violet eyes. It had taken her a fortnight to marshal her courage, but finally, in bed one night, Catelyn had asked her husband the truth of it, asked him to his face.
That was the only time in all their years that Ned had ever frightened her. “Never ask me about Jon,” he said, cold as ice. “He is my blood, and that is all you need to know. And now I will learn where you heard that name, my lady.” She had pledged to obey; she told him; and from that day on, the whispering had stopped, and Ashara Dayne’s name was never heard in Winterfell again.
Whoever Jon’s mother had been, Ned must have loved her fiercely, for nothing Catelyn said would persuade him to send the boy away. It was the one thing she could never forgive him. She had come to love her husband with all her heart, but she had never found it in her to love Jon. She might have overlooked a dozen bastards for Ned’s sake, so long as they were out of sight. Jon was never out of sight, and as he grew, he looked more like Ned than any of the trueborn sons she bore him. Somehow that made it worse. “Jon must go,” she said now.
“He and Robb are close,” Ned said. “I had hoped …”
“He cannot stay here,” Catelyn said, cutting him off. “He is your son, not mine. I will not have him.” It was hard, she knew, but no less the truth. Ned would do the boy no kindness by leaving him here at Winterfell.
The look Ned gave her was anguished. “You know I cannot take him south. There will be no place for him at court. A boy with a bastard’s name … you know what they will say of him. He will be shunned.”
Catelyn armored her heart against the mute appeal in her husband’s eyes. “They say your friend Robert has fathered a dozen bastards himself.”
“And none of them has ever been seen at court!” Ned blazed. “The Lannister woman has seen to that. How can you be so damnably cruel, Catelyn? He is only a boy. He—”
His fury was on him. He might have said more, and worse, but Maester Luwin cut in. “Another solution presents itself,” he said, his voice quiet. “Your brother Benjen came to me about Jon a few days ago. It seems the boy aspires to take the black.”
Ned looked shocked. “He asked to join the Night’s Watch?”
Catelyn said nothing. Let Ned work it out in his own mind; her voice would not be welcome now. Yet gladly would she have kissed the maester just then. His was the perfect solution. Benjen Stark was a Sworn Brother. Jon would be a son to him, the child he would never have. And in time the boy would take the oath as well. He would father no sons who might someday contest with Catelyn’s own grandchildren for Winterfell.
Maester Luwin said, “There is great honor in service on the Wall, my lord.”
“And even a bastard may rise high in the Night’s Watch,” Ned reflected. Still, his voice was troubled. “Jon is so young. If he asked this when he was a man grown, that would be one thing, but a boy of fourteen …”
“A hard sacrifice,” Maester Luwin agreed. “Yet these are hard times, my lord. His road is no crueler than yours or your lady’s.”
Catelyn thought of the three children she must lose. It was not easy keeping silent then.
Ned turned away from them to gaze out the window, his long face silent and thoughtful. Finally he sighed, and turned back. “Very well,” he said to Maester Luwin. “I suppose it is for the best. I will speak to Ben.”
“When shall we tell Jon?” the maester asked.
“When I must. Preparations must be made. It will be a fortnight before we are ready to depart. I would sooner let Jon enjoy these last few days. Summer will end soon enough, and childhood as well. When the time comes, I will tell him myself.”

Ned and the girls were eight days gone when Maester Luwin came to her one night in Bran’s sickroom, carrying a reading lamp and the books of account. “It is past time that we reviewed the figures, my lady,” he said. “You’ll want to know how much this royal visit cost us.”
Catelyn looked at Bran in his sickbed and brushed his hair back off his forehead. It had grown very long, she realized. She would have to cut it soon. “I have no need to look at figures, Maester Luwin,” she told him, never taking her eyes from Bran. “I know what the visit cost us. Take the books away.”
“My lady, the king’s party had healthy appetites. We must replenish our stores before—”
She cut him off. “I said, take the books away. The steward will attend to our needs.”
“We have no steward,” Maester Luwin reminded her. Like a little grey rat, she thought, he would not let go. “Poole went south to establish Lord Eddard’s household at King’s Landing.”
Catelyn nodded absently. “Oh, yes. I remember.” Bran looked so pale. She wondered whether they might move his bed under the window, so he could get the morning sun.
Maester Luwin set the lamp in a niche by the door and fiddled with its wick. “There are several appointments that require your immediate attention, my lady. Besides the steward, we need a captain of the guards to fill Jory’s place, a new master of horse—”
Her eyes snapped around and found him. “A master of horse?” Her voice was a whip.
The maester was shaken. “Yes, my lady. Hullen rode south with Lord Eddard, so—”
“My son lies here broken and dying, Luwin, and you wish to discuss a new master of horse? Do you think I care what happens in the stables? Do you think it matters to me one whit? I would gladly butcher every horse in Winterfell with my own hands if it would open Bran’s eyes, do you understand that? Do you!”
He bowed his head. “Yes, my lady, but the appointments—”
“I’ll make the appointments,” Robb said.
Catelyn had not heard him enter, but there he stood in the doorway, looking at her. She had been shouting, she realized with a sudden flush of shame. What was happening to her? She was so tired, and her head hurt all the time.
Maester Luwin looked from Catelyn to her son. “I have prepared a list of those we might wish to consider for the vacant offices,” he said, offering Robb a paper plucked from his sleeve.
Her son glanced at the names. He had come from outside, Catelyn saw; his cheeks were red from the cold, his hair shaggy and windblown. “Good men,” he said. “We’ll talk about them tomorrow.” He handed back the list of names.
“Very good, my lord.” The paper vanished into his sleeve.
“Leave us now,” Robb said. Maester Luwin bowed and departed. Robb closed the door behind him and turned to her. He was wearing a sword, she saw. “Mother, what are you doing?”
Catelyn had always thought Robb looked like her; like Bran and Rickon and Sansa, he had the Tully coloring, the auburn hair, the blue eyes. Yet now for the first time she saw something of Eddard Stark in his face, something as stern and hard as the north. “What am I doing?” she echoed, puzzled. “How can you ask that? What do you imagine I’m doing? I am taking care of your brother. I am taking care of Bran.”
“Is that what you call it? You haven’t left this room since Bran was hurt. You didn’t even come to the gate when Father and the girls went south.”
“I said my farewells to them here, and watched them ride out from that window.” She had begged Ned not to go, not now, not after what had happened; everything had changed now, couldn’t he see that? It was no use. He had no choice, he had told her, and then he left, choosing. “I can’t leave him, even for a moment, not when any moment could be his last. I have to be with him, if … if …” She took her son’s limp hand, sliding his fingers through her own. He was so frail and thin, with no strength left in his hand, but she could still feel the warmth of life through his skin.
Robb’s voice softened. “He’s not going to die, Mother. Maester Luwin says the time of greatest danger has passed.”
“And what if Maester Luwin is wrong? What if Bran needs me and I’m not here?”
“Rickon needs you,” Robb said sharply. “He’s only three, he doesn’t understand what’s happening. He thinks everyone has deserted him, so he follows me around all day, clutching my leg and crying. I don’t know what to do with him.” He paused a moment, chewing on his lower lip the way he’d done when he was little. “Mother, I need you too. I’m trying but I can’t … I can’t do it all by myself.” His voice broke with sudden emotion, and Catelyn remembered that he was only fourteen. She wanted to get up and go to him, but Bran was still holding her hand and she could not move.
Outside the tower, a wolf began to howl. Catelyn trembled, just for a second.
“Bran’s.” Robb opened the window and let the night air into the stuffy tower room. The howling grew louder. It was a cold and lonely sound, full of melancholy and despair.
“Don’t,” she told him. “Bran needs to stay warm.”
“He needs to hear them sing,” Robb said. Somewhere out in Winterfell, a second wolf began to howl in chorus with the first. Then a third, closer. “Shaggydog and Grey Wind,” Robb said as their voices rose and fell together. “You can tell them apart if you listen close.”
Catelyn was shaking. It was the grief, the cold, the howling of the direwolves. Night after night, the howling and the cold wind and the grey empty castle, on and on they went, never changing, and her boy lying there broken, the sweetest of her children, the gentlest, Bran who loved to laugh and climb and dreamt of knighthood, all gone now, she would never hear him laugh again. Sobbing, she pulled her hand free of his and covered her ears against those terrible howls. “Make them stop!” she cried. “I can’t stand it, make them stop, make them stop, kill them all if you must, just make them stop!”
She didn’t remember falling to the floor, but there she was, and Robb was lifting her, holding her in strong arms. “Don’t be afraid, Mother. They would never hurt him.” He helped her to her narrow bed in the corner of the sickroom. “Close your eyes,” he said gently. “Rest. Maester Luwin tells me you’ve hardly slept since Bran’s fall.”
“I can’t,” she wept. “Gods forgive me, Robb, I can’t, what if he dies while I’m asleep, what if he dies, what if he dies …” The wolves were still howling. She screamed and held her ears again. “Oh, gods, close the window!”
“If you swear to me you’ll sleep.” Robb went to the window, but as he reached for the shutters another sound was added to the mournful howling of the direwolves. “Dogs,” he said, listening. “All the dogs are barking. They’ve never done that before …” Catelyn heard his breath catch in his throat. When she looked up, his face was pale in the lamplight. “Fire,” he whispered.
Fire, she thought, and then, Bran! “Help me,” she said urgently, sitting up. “Help me with Bran.”
Robb did not seem to hear her. “The library tower’s on fire,” he said.
Catelyn could see the flickering reddish light through the open window now. She sagged with relief. Bran was safe. The library was across the bailey, there was no way the fire would reach them here. “Thank the gods,” she whispered.
Robb looked at her as if she’d gone mad. “Mother, stay here. I’ll come back as soon as the fire’s out.” He ran then. She heard him shout to the guards outside the room, heard them descending together in a wild rush, taking the stairs two and three at a time.
Outside, there were shouts of “Fire!” in the yard, screams, running footsteps, the whinny of frightened horses, and the frantic barking of the castle dogs. The howling was gone, she realized as she listened to the cacophony. The direwolves had fallen silent.
Catelyn said a silent prayer of thanks to the seven faces of god as she went to the window. Across the bailey, long tongues of flame shot from the windows of the library. She watched the smoke rise into the sky and thought sadly of all the books the Starks had gathered over the centuries. Then she closed the shutters.
When she turned away from the window, the man was in the room with her.
“You weren’t s’posed to be here,” he muttered sourly. “No one was s’posed to be here.”
He was a small, dirty man in filthy brown clothing, and he stank of horses. Catelyn knew all the men who worked in their stables, and he was none of them. He was gaunt, with limp blond hair and pale eyes deep-sunk in a bony face, and there was a dagger in his hand.
Catelyn looked at the knife, then at Bran. “No,” she said. The word stuck in her throat, the merest whisper.
He must have heard her. “It’s a mercy,” he said. “He’s dead already.”
“No,” Catelyn said, louder now as she found her voice again. “No, you can’t.” She spun back toward the window to scream for help, but the man moved faster than she would have believed. One hand clamped down over her mouth and yanked back her head, the other brought the dagger up to her windpipe. The stench of him was overwhelming.
She reached up with both hands and grabbed the blade with all her strength, pulling it away from her throat. She heard him cursing into her ear. Her fingers were slippery with blood, but she would not let go of the dagger. The hand over her mouth clenched more tightly, shutting off her air. Catelyn twisted her head to the side and managed to get a piece of his flesh between her teeth. She bit down hard into his palm. The man grunted in pain. She ground her teeth together and tore at him, and all of a sudden he let go. The taste of his blood filled her mouth. She sucked in air and screamed, and he grabbed her hair and pulled her away from him, and she stumbled and went down, and then he was standing over her, breathing hard, shaking. The dagger was still clutched tightly in his right hand, slick with blood. “You weren’t s’posed to be here,” he repeated stupidly.
Catelyn saw the shadow slip through the open door behind him. There was a low rumble, less than a snarl, the merest whisper of a threat, but he must have heard something, because he started to turn just as the wolf made its leap. They went down together, half sprawled over Catelyn where she’d fallen. The wolf had him under the jaw. The man’s shriek lasted less than a second before the beast wrenched back its head, taking out half his throat.
His blood felt like warm rain as it sprayed across her face.
The wolf was looking at her. Its jaws were red and wet and its eyes glowed golden in the dark room. It was Bran’s wolf, she realized. Of course it was. “Thank you,” Catelyn whispered, her voice faint and tiny. She lifted her hand, trembling. The wolf padded closer, sniffed at her fingers, then licked at the blood with a wet rough tongue. When it had cleaned all the blood off her hand, it turned away silently and jumped up on Bran’s bed and lay down beside him. Catelyn began to laugh hysterically.
That was the way they found them, when Robb and Maester Luwin and Ser Rodrik burst in with half the guards in Winterfell. When the laughter finally died in her throat, they wrapped her in warm blankets and led her back to the Great Keep, to her own chambers. Old Nan undressed her and helped her into a scalding hot bath and washed the blood off her with a soft cloth.
Afterward Maester Luwin arrived to dress her wounds. The cuts in her fingers went deep, almost to the bone, and her scalp was raw and bleeding where he’d pulled out a handful of hair. The maester told her the pain was just starting now, and gave her milk of the poppy to help her sleep.
Finally she closed her eyes.
When she opened them again, they told her that she had slept four days. Catelyn nodded and sat up in bed. It all seemed like a nightmare to her now, everything since Bran’s fall, a terrible dream of blood and grief, but she had the pain in her hands to remind her that it was real. She felt weak and light-headed, yet strangely resolute, as if a great weight had lifted from her.
“Bring me some bread and honey,” she told her servants, “and take word to Maester Luwin that my bandages want changing.” They looked at her in surprise and ran to do her bidding.
Catelyn remembered the way she had been before, and she was ashamed. She had let them all down, her children, her husband, her House. It would not happen again. She would show these northerners how strong a Tully of Riverrun could be.
Robb arrived before her food. Rodrik Cassel came with him, and her husband’s ward Theon Greyjoy, and lastly Hallis Mollen, a muscular guardsman with a square brown beard. He was the new captain of the guard, Robb said. Her son was dressed in boiled leather and ringmail, she saw, and a sword hung at his waist.
“Who was he?” Catelyn asked them.
“No one knows his name,” Hallis Mollen told her. “He was no man of Winterfell, m’lady, but some says they seen him here and about the castle these past few weeks.”
“One of the king’s men, then,” she said, “or one of the Lannisters’. He could have waited behind when the others left.”
“Maybe,” Hal said. “With all these strangers filling up Winterfell of late, there’s no way of saying who he belonged to.”
“He’d been hiding in your stables,” Greyjoy said. “You could smell it on him.”
“And how could he go unnoticed?” she said sharply.
Hallis Mollen looked abashed. “Between the horses Lord Eddard took south and them we sent north to the Night’s Watch, the stalls were half-empty. It were no great trick to hide from the stableboys. Could be Hodor saw him, the talk is that boy’s been acting queer, but simple as he is …” Hal shook his head.
“We found where he’d been sleeping,” Robb put in. “He had ninety silver stags in a leather bag buried beneath the straw.”
“It’s good to know my son’s life was not sold cheaply,” Catelyn said bitterly.
Hallis Mollen looked at her, confused. “Begging your grace, m’lady, you saying he was out to kill your boy?”
Greyjoy was doubtful. “That’s madness.”
“He came for Bran,” Catelyn said. “He kept muttering how I wasn’t supposed to be there. He set the library fire thinking I would rush to put it out, taking any guards with me. If I hadn’t been half-mad with grief, it would have worked.”
“Why would anyone want to kill Bran?” Robb said. “Gods, he’s only a little boy, helpless, sleeping …”
Catelyn gave her firstborn a challenging look. “If you are to rule in the north, you must think these things through, Robb. Answer your own question. Why would anyone want to kill a sleeping child?”
Before he could answer, the servants returned with a plate of food fresh from the kitchen. There was much more than she’d asked for: hot bread, butter and honey and blackberry preserves, a rasher of bacon and a soft-boiled egg, a wedge of cheese, a pot of mint tea. And with it came Maester Luwin.
“How is my son, Maester?” Catelyn looked at all the food and found she had no appetite.
Maester Luwin lowered his eyes. “Unchanged, my lady.”
It was the reply she had expected, no more and no less. Her hands throbbed with pain, as if the blade were still in her, cutting deep. She sent the servants away and looked back to Robb. “Do you have the answer yet?”
“Someone is afraid Bran might wake up,” Robb said, “afraid of what he might say or do, afraid of something he knows.”
Catelyn was proud of him. “Very good.” She turned to the new captain of the guard. “We must keep Bran safe. If there was one killer, there could be others.”
“How many guards do you want, m’lady?” Hal asked.
“So long as Lord Eddard is away, my son is the master of Winterfell,” she told him.
Robb stood a little taller. “Put one man in the sickroom, night and day, one outside the door, two at the bottom of the stairs. No one sees Bran without my warrant or my mother’s.”
“As you say, m’lord.”
“Do it now,” Catelyn suggested.
“And let his wolf stay in the room with him,” Robb added.
“Yes,” Catelyn said. And then again: “Yes.”
Hallis Mollen bowed and left the room.
“Lady Stark,” Ser Rodrik said when the guardsman had gone, “did you chance to notice the dagger the killer used?”
“The circumstances did not allow me to examine it closely, but I can vouch for its edge,” Catelyn replied with a dry smile. “Why do you ask?”
“We found the knife still in the villain’s grasp. It seemed to me that it was altogether too fine a weapon for such a man, so I looked at it long and hard. The blade is Valyrian steel, the hilt dragonbone. A weapon like that has no business being in the hands of such as him. Someone gave it to him.”
Catelyn nodded, thoughtful. “Robb, close the door.”
He looked at her strangely, but did as she told him.
“What I am about to tell you must not leave this room,” she told them. “I want your oaths on that. If even part of what I suspect is true, Ned and my girls have ridden into deadly danger, and a word in the wrong ears could mean their lives.”
“Lord Eddard is a second father to me,” said Theon Greyjoy. “I do so swear.”
“You have my oath,” Maester Luwin said.
“And mine, my lady,” echoed Ser Rodrik.
She looked at her son. “And you, Robb?”
He nodded his consent.
“My sister Lysa believes the Lannisters murdered her husband, Lord Arryn, the Hand of the King,” Catelyn told them. “It comes to me that Jaime Lannister did not join the hunt the day Bran fell. He remained here in the castle.” The room was deathly quiet. “I do not think Bran fell from that tower,” she said into the stillness. “I think he was thrown.”
The shock was plain on their faces. “My lady, that is a monstrous suggestion,” said Rodrik Cassel. “Even the Kingslayer would flinch at the murder of an innocent child.”
“Oh, would he?” Theon Greyjoy asked. “I wonder.”
“There is no limit to Lannister pride or Lannister ambition,” Catelyn said.
“The boy had always been surehanded in the past,” Maester Luwin said thoughtfully. “He knew every stone in Winterfell.”
“Gods,” Robb swore, his young face dark with anger. “If this is true, he will pay for it.” He drew his sword and waved it in the air. “I’ll kill him myself!”
Ser Rodrik bristled at him. “Put that away! The Lannisters are a hundred leagues away. Never draw your sword unless you mean to use it. How many times must I tell you, foolish boy?”
Abashed, Robb sheathed his sword, suddenly a child again. Catelyn said to Ser Rodrik, “I see my son is wearing steel now.”
The old master-at-arms said, “I thought it was time.”
Robb was looking at her anxiously. “Past time,” she said. “Winterfell may have need of all its swords soon, and they had best not be made of wood.”
Theon Greyjoy put a hand on the hilt of his blade and said, “My lady, if it comes to that, my House owes yours a great debt.”
Maester Luwin pulled at his chain collar where it chafed against his neck. “All we have is conjecture. This is the queen’s beloved brother we mean to accuse. She will not take it kindly. We must have proof, or forever keep silent.”
“Your proof is in the dagger,” Ser Rodrik said. “A fine blade like that will not have gone unnoticed.”
There was only one place to find the truth of it, Catelyn realized. “Someone must go to King’s Landing.”
“I’ll go,” Robb said.
“No,” she told him. “Your place is here. There must always be a Stark in Winterfell.” She looked at Ser Rodrik with his great white whiskers, at Maester Luwin in his grey robes, at young Greyjoy, lean and dark and impetuous. Who to send? Who would be believed? Then she knew. Catelyn struggled to push back the blankets, her bandaged fingers as stiff and unyielding as stone. She climbed out of bed. “I must go myself.”
“My lady,” said Maester Luwin, “is that wise? Surely the Lannisters would greet your arrival with suspicion.”
“What about Bran?” Robb asked. The poor boy looked utterly confused now. “You can’t mean to leave him.”
“I have done everything I can for Bran,” she said, laying a wounded hand on his arm. “His life is in the hands of the gods and Maester Luwin. As you reminded me yourself, Robb, I have other children to think of now.”
“You will need a strong escort, my lady,” Theon said.
“I’ll send Hal with a squad of guardsmen,” Robb said.
“No,” Catelyn said. “A large party attracts unwelcome attention. I would not have the Lannisters know I am coming.”
Ser Rodrik protested. “My lady, let me accompany you at least. The kingsroad can be perilous for a woman alone.”
“I will not be taking the kingsroad,” Catelyn replied. She thought for a moment, then nodded her consent. “Two riders can move as fast as one, and a good deal faster than a long column burdened by wagons and wheel-houses. I will welcome your company, Ser Rodrik. We will follow the White Knife down to the sea, and hire a ship at White Harbor. Strong horses and brisk winds should bring us to King’s Landing well ahead of Ned and the Lannisters.” And then, she thought, we shall see what we shall see.

“We will make King’s Landing within the hour.”
Catelyn turned away from the rail and forced herself to smile. “Your oarmen have done well by us, Captain. Each one of them shall have a silver stag, as a token of my gratitude.”
Captain Moreo Tumitis favored her with a half bow. “You are far too generous, Lady Stark. The honor of carrying a great lady like yourself is all the reward they need.”
“But they’ll take the silver anyway.”
Moreo smiled. “As you say.” He spoke the Common Tongue fluently, with only the slightest hint of a Tyroshi accent. He’d been plying the narrow sea for thirty years, he’d told her, as oarman, quartermaster, and finally captain of his own trading galleys. The Storm Dancer was his fourth ship, and his fastest, a two-masted galley of sixty oars.
She had certainly been the fastest of the ships available in White Harbor when Catelyn and Ser Rodrik Cassel had arrived after their headlong gallop downriver. The Tyroshi were notorious for their avarice, and Ser Rodrik had argued for hiring a fishing sloop out of the Three Sisters, but Catelyn had insisted on the galley. It was good that she had. The winds had been against them much of the voyage, and without the galley’s oars they’d still be beating their way past the Fingers, instead of skimming toward King’s Landing and journey’s end.
So close, she thought. Beneath the linen bandages, her fingers still throbbed where the dagger had bitten. The pain was her scourge, Catelyn felt, lest she forget. She could not bend the last two fingers on her left hand, and the others would never again be dexterous. Yet that was a small enough price to pay for Bran’s life.
Ser Rodrik chose that moment to appear on deck. “My good friend,” said Moreo through his forked green beard. The Tyroshi loved bright colors, even in their facial hair. “It is so fine to see you looking better.”
“Yes,” Ser Rodrik agreed. “I haven’t wanted to die for almost two days now.” He bowed to Catelyn. “My lady.”
He was looking better. A shade thinner than he had been when they set out from White Harbor, but almost himself again. The strong winds in the Bite and the roughness of the narrow sea had not agreed with him, and he’d almost gone over the side when the storm seized them unexpectedly off Dragonstone, yet somehow he had clung to a rope until three of Moreo’s men could rescue him and carry him safely below decks.
“The captain was just telling me that our voyage is almost at an end,” she said.
Ser Rodrik managed a wry smile. “So soon?” He looked odd without his great white side whiskers; smaller somehow, less fierce, and ten years older. Yet back on the Bite it had seemed prudent to submit to a crewman’s razor, after his whiskers had become hopelessly befouled for the third time while he leaned over the rail and retched into the swirling winds.
“I will leave you to discuss your business,” Captain Moreo said. He bowed and took his leave of them.
The galley skimmed the water like a dragonfly, her oars rising and falling in perfect time. Ser Rodrik held the rail and looked out over the passing shore. “I have not been the most valiant of protectors.”
Catelyn touched his arm. “We are here, Ser Rodrik, and safely. That is all that truly matters.” Her hand groped beneath her cloak, her fingers stiff and fumbling. The dagger was still at her side. She found she had to touch it now and then, to reassure herself. “Now we must reach the king’s master-at-arms, and pray that he can be trusted.”
“Ser Aron Santagar is a vain man, but an honest one.” Ser Rodrik’s hand went to his face to stroke his whiskers and discovered once again that they were gone. He looked nonplussed. “He may know the blade, yes … but, my lady, the moment we go ashore we are at risk. And there are those at court who will know you on sight.”
Catelyn’s mouth grew tight. “Littlefinger,” she murmured. His face swam up before her; a boy’s face, though he was a boy no longer. His father had died several years before, so he was Lord Baelish now, yet still they called him Littlefinger. Her brother Edmure had given him that name, long ago at Riverrun. His family’s modest holdings were on the smallest of the Fingers, and Petyr had been slight and short for his age.
Ser Rodrik cleared his throat. “Lord Baelish once, ah …” His thought trailed off uncertainly in search of the polite word.
Catelyn was past delicacy. “He was my father’s ward. We grew up together in Riverrun. I thought of him as a brother, but his feelings for me were … more than brotherly. When it was announced that I was to wed Brandon Stark, Petyr challenged for the right to my hand. It was madness. Brandon was twenty, Petyr scarcely fifteen. I had to beg Brandon to spare Petyr’s life. He let him off with a scar. Afterward my father sent him away. I have not seen him since.” She lifted her face to the spray, as if the brisk wind could blow the memories away. “He wrote to me at Riverrun after Brandon was killed, but I burned the letter unread. By then I knew that Ned would marry me in his brother’s place.”
Ser Rodrik’s fingers fumbled once again for nonexistent whiskers. “Littlefinger sits on the small council now.”
“I knew he would rise high,” Catelyn said. “He was always clever, even as a boy, but it is one thing to be clever and another to be wise. I wonder what the years have done to him.”
High overhead, the far-eyes sang out from the rigging. Captain Moreo came scrambling across the deck, giving orders, and all around them the Storm Dancer burst into frenetic activity as King’s Landing slid into view atop its three high hills.
Three hundred years ago, Catelyn knew, those heights had been covered with forest, and only a handful of fisherfolk had lived on the north shore of the Blackwater Rush where that deep, swift river flowed into the sea. Then Aegon the Conqueror had sailed from Dragonstone. It was here that his army had put ashore, and there on the highest hill that he built his first crude redoubt of wood and earth.
Now the city covered the shore as far as Catelyn could see; manses and arbors and granaries, brick storehouses and timbered inns and merchant’s stalls, taverns and graveyards and brothels, all piled one on another. She could hear the clamor of the fish market even at this distance. Between the buildings were broad roads lined with trees, wandering crookback streets, and alleys so narrow that two men could not walk abreast. Visenya’s hill was crowned by the Great Sept of Baelor with its seven crystal towers. Across the city on the hill of Rhaenys stood the blackened walls of the Dragonpit, its huge dome collapsing into ruin, its bronze doors closed now for a century. The Street of the Sisters ran between them, straight as an arrow. The city walls rose in the distance, high and strong.
A hundred quays lined the waterfront, and the harbor was crowded with ships. Deepwater fishing boats and river runners came and went, ferrymen poled back and forth across the Blackwater Rush, trading galleys unloaded goods from Braavos and Pentos and Lys. Catelyn spied the queen’s ornate barge, tied up beside a fat-bellied whaler from the Port of Ibben, its hull black with tar, while upriver a dozen lean golden warships rested in their cribs, sails furled and cruel iron rams lapping at the water.
And above it all, frowning down from Aegon’s high hill, was the Red Keep; seven huge drum-towers crowned with iron ramparts, an immense grim barbican, vaulted halls and covered bridges, barracks and dungeons and granaries, massive curtain walls studded with archers’ nests, all fashioned of pale red stone. Aegon the Conqueror had commanded it built. His son Maegor the Cruel had seen it completed. Afterward he had taken the heads of every stonemason, woodworker, and builder who had labored on it. Only the blood of the dragon would ever know the secrets of the fortress the Dragonlords had built, he vowed.
Yet now the banners that flew from its battlements were golden, not black, and where the three-headed dragon had once breathed fire, now pranced the crowned stag of House Baratheon.
A high-masted swan ship from the Summer Isles was beating out from port, its white sails huge with wind. The Storm Dancer moved past it, pulling steadily for shore.
“My lady,” Ser Rodrik said, “I have thought on how best to proceed while I lay abed. You must not enter the castle. I will go in your stead and bring Ser Aron to you in some safe place.”
She studied the old knight as the galley drew near to a pier. Moreo was shouting in the vulgar Valyrian of the Free Cities. “You would be as much at risk as I would.”
Ser Rodrik smiled. “I think not. I looked at my reflection in the water earlier and scarcely recognized myself. My mother was the last person to see me without whiskers, and she is forty years dead. I believe I am safe enough, my lady.”
Moreo bellowed a command. As one, sixty oars lifted from the river, then reversed and backed water. The galley slowed. Another shout. The oars slid back inside the hull. As they thumped against the dock, Tyroshi seamen leapt down to tie up. Moreo came bustling up, all smiles. “King’s Landing, my lady, as you did command, and never has a ship made a swifter or surer passage. Will you be needing assistance to carry your things to the castle?”
“We shall not be going to the castle. Perhaps you can suggest an inn, someplace clean and comfortable and not too far from the river.”
The Tyroshi fingered his forked green beard. “Just so. I know of several establishments that might suit your needs. Yet first, if I may be so bold, there is the matter of the second half of the payment we agreed upon. And of course the extra silver you were so kind as to promise. Sixty stags, I believe it was.”
“For the oarmen,” Catelyn reminded him.
“Oh, of a certainty,” said Moreo. “Though perhaps I should hold it for them until we return to Tyrosh. For the sake of their wives and children. If you give them the silver here, my lady, they will dice it away or spend it all for a night’s pleasure.”
“There are worse things to spend money on,” Ser Rodrik put in. “Winter is coming.”
“A man must make his own choices,” Catelyn said. “They earned the silver. How they spend it is no concern of mine.”
“As you say, my lady,” Moreo replied, bowing and smiling.
Just to be sure, Catelyn paid the oarmen herself, a stag to each man, and a copper to the two men who carried their chests halfway up Visenya’s hill to the inn that Moreo had suggested. It was a rambling old place on Eel Alley. The woman who owned it was a sour crone with a wandering eye who looked them over suspiciously and bit the coin that Catelyn offered her to make sure it was real. Her rooms were large and airy, though, and Moreo swore that her fish stew was the most savory in all the Seven Kingdoms. Best of all, she had no interest in their names.
“I think it best if you stay away from the common room,” Ser Rodrik said, after they had settled in. “Even in a place like this, one never knows who may be watching.” He wore ringmail, dagger, and longsword under a dark cloak with a hood he could pull up over his head. “I will be back before nightfall, with Ser Aron,” he promised. “Rest now, my lady.”
Catelyn was tired. The voyage had been long and fatiguing, and she was no longer as young as she had been. Her windows opened on the alley and rooftops, with a view of the Blackwater beyond. She watched Ser Rodrik set off, striding briskly through the busy streets until he was lost in the crowds, then decided to take his advice. The bedding was stuffed with straw instead of feathers, but she had no trouble falling asleep.
She woke to a pounding on her door.
Catelyn sat up sharply. Outside the window, the rooftops of King’s Landing were red in the light of the setting sun. She had slept longer than she intended. A fist hammered at her door again, and a voice called out, “Open, in the name of the king.”
“A moment,” she called out. She wrapped herself in her cloak. The dagger was on the bedside table. She snatched it up before she unlatched the heavy wooden door.
The men who pushed into the room wore the black ringmail and golden cloaks of the City Watch. Their leader smiled at the dagger in her hand and said, “No need for that, m’lady. We’re to escort you to the castle.”
“By whose authority?” she said.
He showed her a ribbon. Catelyn felt her breath catch in her throat. The seal was a mockingbird, in grey wax. “Petyr,” she said. So soon. Something must have happened to Ser Rodrik. She looked at the head guardsman. “Do you know who I am?”
“No, m’lady,” he said. “M’lord Littlefinger said only to bring you to him, and see that you were not mistreated.”
Catelyn nodded. “You may wait outside while I dress.”
She bathed her hands in the basin and wrapped them in clean linen. Her fingers were thick and awkward as she struggled to lace up her bodice and knot a drab brown cloak about her neck. How could Littlefinger have known she was here? Ser Rodrik would never have told him. Old he might be, but he was stubborn, and loyal to a fault. Were they too late, had the Lannisters reached King’s Landing before her? No, if that were true, Ned would be here too, and surely he would have come to her. How …?
Then she thought, Moreo. The Tyroshi knew who they were and where they were, damn him. She hoped he’d gotten a good price for the information.
They had brought a horse for her. The lamps were being lit along the streets as they set out, and Catelyn felt the eyes of the city on her as she rode, surrounded by the guard in their golden cloaks. When they reached the Red Keep, the portcullis was down and the great gates sealed for the night, but the castle windows were alive with flickering lights. The guardsmen left their mounts outside the walls and escorted her through a narrow postern door, then up endless steps to a tower.
He was alone in the room, seated at a heavy wooden table, an oil lamp beside him as he wrote. When they ushered her inside, he set down his pen and looked at her. “Cat,” he said quietly.
“Why have I been brought here in this fashion?”
He rose and gestured brusquely to the guards. “Leave us.” The men departed. “You were not mistreated, I trust,” he said after they had gone. “I gave firm instructions.” He noticed her bandages. “Your hands …”
Catelyn ignored the implied question. “I am not accustomed to being summoned like a serving wench,” she said icily. “As a boy, you still knew the meaning of courtesy.”
“I’ve angered you, my lady. That was never my intent.” He looked contrite. The look brought back vivid memories for Catelyn. He had been a sly child, but after his mischiefs he always looked contrite; it was a gift he had. The years had not changed him much. Petyr had been a small boy, and he had grown into a small man, an inch or two shorter than Catelyn, slender and quick, with the sharp features she remembered and the same laughing grey-green eyes. He had a little pointed chin beard now, and threads of silver in his dark hair, though he was still shy of thirty. They went well with the silver mockingbird that fastened his cloak. Even as a child, he had always loved his silver.
“How did you know I was in the city?” she asked him.
“Lord Varys knows all,” Petyr said with a sly smile. “He will be joining us shortly, but I wanted to see you alone first. It has been too long, Cat. How many years?”
Catelyn ignored his familiarity. There were more important questions. “So it was the King’s Spider who found me.”
Littlefinger winced. “You don’t want to call him that. He’s very sensitive. Comes of being an eunuch, I imagine. Nothing happens in this city without Varys knowing. Ofttimes he knows about it before it happens. He has informants everywhere. His little birds, he calls them. One of his little birds heard about your visit. Thankfully, Varys came to me first.”
“Why you?”
He shrugged. “Why not me? I am master of coin, the king’s own councillor. Selmy and Lord Renly rode north to meet Robert, and Lord Stannis is gone to Dragonstone, leaving only Maester Pycelle and me. I was the obvious choice. I was ever a friend to your sister Lysa, Varys knows that.”
“Does Varys know about …”
“Lord Varys knows everything … except why you are here.” He lifted an eyebrow. “Why are you here?”
“A wife is allowed to yearn for her husband, and if a mother needs her daughters close, who can tell her no?”
Littlefinger laughed. “Oh, very good, my lady, but please don’t expect me to believe that. I know you too well. What were the Tully words again?”
Her throat was dry. “Family, Duty, Honor,” she recited stiffly. He did know her too well.
“Family, Duty, Honor,” he echoed. “All of which required you to remain in Winterfell, where our Hand left you. No, my lady, something has happened. This sudden trip of yours bespeaks a certain urgency. I beg of you, let me help. Old sweet friends should never hesitate to rely upon each other.” There was a soft knock on the door. “Enter,” Littlefinger called out.
The man who stepped through the door was plump, perfumed, powdered, and as hairless as an egg. He wore a vest of woven gold thread over a loose gown of purple silk, and on his feet were pointed slippers of soft velvet. “Lady Stark,” he said, taking her hand in both of his, “to see you again after so many years is such a joy.” His flesh was soft and moist, and his breath smelled of lilacs. “Oh, your poor hands. Have you burned yourself, sweet lady? The fingers are so delicate … Our good Maester Pycelle makes a marvelous salve, shall I send for a jar?”
Catelyn slid her fingers from his grasp. “I thank you, my lord, but my own Maester Luwin has already seen to my hurts.”
Varys bobbed his head. “I was grievous sad to hear about your son. And him so young. The gods are cruel.”
“On that we agree, Lord Varys,” she said. The title was but a courtesy due him as a council member; Varys was lord of nothing but the spiderweb, the master of none but his whisperers.
The eunuch spread his soft hands. “On more than that, I hope, sweet lady. I have great esteem for your husband, our new Hand, and I know we do both love King Robert.”
“Yes,” she was forced to say. “For a certainty.”
“Never has a king been so beloved as our Robert,” quipped Littlefinger. He smiled slyly. “At least in Lord Varys’s hearing.”
“Good lady,” Varys said with great solicitude. “There are men in the Free Cities with wondrous healing powers. Say only the word, and I will send for one for your dear Bran.”
“Maester Luwin is doing all that can be done for Bran,” she told him. She would not speak of Bran, not here, not with these men. She trusted Littlefinger only a little, and Varys not at all. She would not let them see her grief. “Lord Baelish tells me that I have you to thank for bringing me here.”
Varys giggled like a little girl. “Oh, yes. I suppose I am guilty. I hope you forgive me, kind lady.” He eased himself down into a seat and put his hands together. “I wonder if we might trouble you to show us the dagger?”
Catelyn Stark stared at the eunuch in stunned disbelief. He was a spider, she thought wildly, an enchanter or worse. He knew things no one could possibly know, unless … “What have you done to Ser Rodrik?” she demanded.
Littlefinger was lost. “I feel rather like the knight who arrives at the battle without his lance. What dagger are we talking about? Who is Ser Rodrik?”
“Ser Rodrik Cassel is master-at-arms at Winterfell,” Varys informed him. “I assure you, Lady Stark, nothing at all has been done to the good knight. He did call here early this afternoon. He visited with Ser Aron Santagar in the armory, and they talked of a certain dagger. About sunset, they left the castle together and walked to that dreadful hovel where you were staying. They are still there, drinking in the common room, waiting for your return. Ser Rodrik was very distressed to find you gone.”
“How could you know all that?”
“The whisperings of little birds,” Varys said, smiling. “I know things, sweet lady. That is the nature of my service.” He shrugged. “You do have the dagger with you, yes?”
Catelyn pulled it out from beneath her cloak and threw it down on the table in front of him. “Here. Perhaps your little birds will whisper the name of the man it belongs to.”
Varys lifted the knife with exaggerated delicacy and ran a thumb along its edge. Blood welled, and he let out a squeal and dropped the dagger back on the table.
“Careful,” Catelyn told him, “it’s sharp.”
“Nothing holds an edge like Valyrian steel,” Littlefinger said as Varys sucked at his bleeding thumb and looked at Catelyn with sullen admonition. Littlefinger hefted the knife lightly in his hand, testing the grip. He flipped it in the air, caught it again with his other hand. “Such sweet balance. You want to find the owner, is that the reason for this visit? You have no need of Ser Aron for that, my lady. You should have come to me.”
“And if I had,” she said, “what would you have told me?”
“I would have told you that there was only one knife like this at King’s Landing.” He grasped the blade between thumb and forefinger, drew it back over his shoulder, and threw it across the room with a practiced flick of his wrist. It struck the door and buried itself deep in the oak, quivering. “It’s mine.”
“Yours?” It made no sense. Petyr had not been at Winterfell.
“Until the tourney on Prince Joffrey’s name day,” he said, crossing the room to wrench the dagger from the wood. “I backed Ser Jaime in the jousting, along with half the court.” Petyr’s sheepish grin made him look half a boy again. “When Loras Tyrell unhorsed him, many of us became a trifle poorer. Ser Jaime lost a hundred golden dragons, the queen lost an emerald pendant, and I lost my knife. Her Grace got the emerald back, but the winner kept the rest.”
“Who?” Catelyn demanded, her mouth dry with fear. Her fingers ached with remembered pain.
“The Imp,” said Littlefinger as Lord Varys watched her face. “Tyrion Lannister.”

“My lady, you ought cover your head,” Ser Rodrik told her as their horses plodded north. “You will take a chill.”
“It is only water, Ser Rodrik,” Catelyn replied. Her hair hung wet and heavy, a loose strand stuck to her forehead, and she could imagine how ragged and wild she must look, but for once she did not care. The southern rain was soft and warm. Catelyn liked the feel of it on her face, gentle as a mother’s kisses. It took her back to her childhood, to long grey days at Riverrun. She remembered the godswood, drooping branches heavy with moisture, and the sound of her brother’s laughter as he chased her through piles of damp leaves. She remembered making mud pies with Lysa, the weight of them, the mud slick and brown between her fingers. They had served them to Littlefinger, giggling, and he’d eaten so much mud he was sick for a week. How young they all had been.
Catelyn had almost forgotten. In the north, the rain fell cold and hard, and sometimes at night it turned to ice. It was as likely to kill a crop as nurture it, and it sent grown men running for the nearest shelter. That was no rain for little girls to play in.
“I am soaked through,” Ser Rodrik complained. “Even my bones are wet.” The woods pressed close around them, and the steady pattering of rain on leaves was accompanied by the small sucking sounds their horses made as their hooves pulled free of the mud. “We will want a fire tonight, my lady, and a hot meal would serve us both.”
“There is an inn at the crossroads up ahead,” Catelyn told him. She had slept many a night there in her youth, traveling with her father. Lord Hoster Tully had been a restless man in his prime, always riding somewhere. She still remembered the innkeep, a fat woman named Masha Heddle who chewed sourleaf night and day and seemed to have an endless supply of smiles and sweet cakes for the children. The sweet cakes had been soaked with honey, rich and heavy on the tongue, but how Catelyn had dreaded those smiles. The sourleaf had stained Masha’s teeth a dark red, and made her smile a bloody horror.
“An inn,” Ser Rodrik repeated wistfully. “If only … but we dare not risk it. If we wish to remain unknown, I think it best we seek out some small holdfast …” He broke off as they heard sounds up the road; splashing water, the clink of mail, a horse’s whinny. “Riders,” he warned, his hand dropping to the hilt of his sword. Even on the kingsroad, it never hurt to be wary.
They followed the sounds around a lazy bend of the road and saw them; a column of armed men noisily fording a swollen stream. Catelyn reined up to let them pass. The banner in the hand of the foremost rider hung sodden and limp, but the guardsmen wore indigo cloaks and on their shoulders flew the silver eagle of Seagard. “Mallisters,” Ser Rodrik whispered to her, as if she had not known. “My lady, best pull up your hood.”
Catelyn made no move. Lord Jason Mallister himself rode with them, surrounded by his knights, his son Patrek by his side and their squires close behind. They were riding for King’s Landing and the Hand’s tourney, she knew. For the past week, the travelers had been thick as flies upon the kingsroad; knights and freeriders, singers with their harps and drums, heavy wagons laden with hops or corn or casks of honey, traders and craftsmen and whores, and all of them moving south.
She studied Lord Jason boldly. The last time she had seen him he had been jesting with her uncle at her wedding feast; the Mallisters stood bannermen to the Tullys, and his gifts had been lavish. His brown hair was salted with white now, his face chiseled gaunt by time, yet the years had not touched his pride. He rode like a man who feared nothing. Catelyn envied him that; she had come to fear so much. As the riders passed, Lord Jason nodded a curt greeting, but it was only a high lord’s courtesy to strangers chance met on the road. There was no recognition in those fierce eyes, and his son did not even waste a look.
“He did not know you,” Ser Rodrik said after, wondering.
“He saw a pair of mud-spattered travelers by the side of the road, wet and tired. It would never occur to him to suspect that one of them was the daughter of his liege lord. I think we shall be safe enough at the inn, Ser Rodrik.”
It was near dark when they reached it, at the crossroads north of the great confluence of the Trident. Masha Heddle was fatter and greyer than Catelyn remembered, still chewing her sourleaf, but she gave them only the most cursory of looks, with nary a hint of her ghastly red smile. “Two rooms at the top of the stair, that’s all there is,” she said, chewing all the while. “They’re under the bell tower, you won’t be missing meals, though there’s some thinks it too noisy. Can’t be helped. We’re full up, or near as makes no matter. It’s those rooms or the road.”
It was those rooms, low, dusty garrets at the top of a cramped narrow staircase. “Leave your boots down here,” Masha told them after she’d taken their coin. “The boy will clean them. I won’t have you tracking mud up my stairs. Mind the bell. Those who come late to meals don’t eat.” There were no smiles, and no mention of sweet cakes.
When the supper bell rang, the sound was deafening. Catelyn had changed into dry clothes. She sat by the window, watching rain run down the pane. The glass was milky and full of bubbles, and a wet dusk was falling outside. Catelyn could just make out the muddy crossing where the two great roads met.
The crossroads gave her pause. If they turned west from here, it was an easy ride down to Riverrun. Her father had always given her wise counsel when she needed it most, and she yearned to talk to him, to warn him of the gathering storm. If Winterfell needed to brace for war, how much more so Riverrun, so much closer to King’s Landing, with the power of Casterly Rock looming to the west like a shadow. If only her father had been stronger, she might have chanced it, but Hoster Tully had been bedridden these past two years, and Catelyn was loath to tax him now.
The eastern road was wilder and more dangerous, climbing through rocky foothills and thick forests into the Mountains of the Moon, past high passes and deep chasms to the Vale of Arryn and the stony Fingers beyond. Above the Vale, the Eyrie stood high and impregnable, its towers reaching for the sky. There she would find her sister … and, perhaps, some of the answers Ned sought. Surely Lysa knew more than she had dared to put in her letter. She might have the very proof that Ned needed to bring the Lannisters to ruin, and if it came to war, they would need the Arryns and the eastern lords who owed them service.
Yet the mountain road was perilous. Shadowcats prowled those passes, rock slides were common, and the mountain clans were lawless brigands, descending from the heights to rob and kill and melting away like snow whenever the knights rode out from the Vale in search of them. Even Jon Arryn, as great a lord as any the Eyrie had ever known, had always traveled in strength when he crossed the mountains. Catelyn’s only strength was one elderly knight, armored in loyalty.
No, she thought, Riverrun and the Eyrie would have to wait. Her path ran north to Winterfell, where her sons and her duty were waiting for her. As soon as they were safely past the Neck, she could declare herself to one of Ned’s bannermen, and send riders racing ahead with orders to mount a watch on the kingsroad.
The rain obscured the fields beyond the crossroads, but Catelyn saw the land clear enough in her memory. The marketplace was just across the way, and the village a mile farther on, half a hundred white cottages surrounding a small stone sept. There would be more now; the summer had been long and peaceful. North of here the kingsroad ran along the Green Fork of the Trident, through fertile valleys and green woodlands, past thriving towns and stout holdfasts and the castles of the river lords.
Catelyn knew them all: the Blackwoods and the Brackens, ever enemies, whose quarrels her father was obliged to settle; Lady Whent, last of her line, who dwelt with her ghosts in the cavernous vaults of Harrenhal; irascible Lord Frey, who had outlived seven wives and filled his twin castles with children, grandchildren, and great-grandchildren, and bastards and grandbastards as well. All of them were bannermen to the Tullys, their swords sworn to the service of Riverrun. Catelyn wondered if that would be enough, if it came to war. Her father was the staunchest man who’d ever lived, and she had no doubt that he would call his banners … but would the banners come? The Darrys and Rygers and Mootons had sworn oaths to Riverrun as well, yet they had fought with Rhaegar Targaryen on the Trident, while Lord Frey had arrived with his levies well after the battle was over, leaving some doubt as to which army he had planned to join (theirs, he had assured the victors solemnly in the aftermath, but ever after her father had called him the Late Lord Frey). It must not come to war, Catelyn thought fervently. They must not let it.
Ser Rodrik came for her just as the bell ceased its clangor. “We had best make haste if we hope to eat tonight, my lady.”
“It might be safer if we were not knight and lady until we pass the Neck,” she told him. “Common travelers attract less notice. A father and daughter taken to the road on some family business, say.”
“As you say, my lady,” Ser Rodrik agreed. It was only when she laughed that he realized what he’d done. “The old courtesies die hard, my—my daughter.” He tried to tug on his missing whiskers, and sighed with exasperation.
Catelyn took his arm. “Come, Father,” she said. “You’ll find that Masha Heddle sets a good table, I think, but try not to praise her. You truly don’t want to see her smile.”
The common room was long and drafty, with a row of huge wooden kegs at one end and a fireplace at the other. A serving boy ran back and forth with skewers of meat while Masha drew beer from the kegs, chewing her sourleaf all the while.
The benches were crowded, townsfolk and farmers mingling freely with all manner of travelers. The crossroads made for odd companions; dyers with black and purple hands shared a bench with rivermen reeking of fish, an ironsmith thick with muscle squeezed in beside a wizened old septon, hard-bitten sellswords and soft plump merchants swapped news like boon companions.
The company included more swords than Catelyn would have liked. Three by the fire wore the red stallion badge of the Brackens, and there was a large party in blue steel ringmail and capes of a silvery grey. On their shoulder was another familiar sigil, the twin towers of House Frey. She studied their faces, but they were all too young to have known her. The senior among them would have been no older than Bran when she went north.
Ser Rodrik found them an empty place on the bench near the kitchen. Across the table a handsome youth was fingering a woodharp. “Seven blessings to you, goodfolk,” he said as they sat. An empty wine cup stood on the table before him.
“And to you, singer,” Catelyn returned. Ser Rodrik called for bread and meat and beer in a tone that meant now. The singer, a youth of some eighteen years, eyed them boldly and asked where they were going, and from whence they had come, and what news they had, letting the questions fly as quick as arrows and never pausing for an answer. “We left King’s Landing a fortnight ago,” Catelyn replied, answering the safest of his questions.
“That’s where I’m bound,” the youth said. As she had suspected, he was more interested in telling his own story than in hearing theirs. Singers loved nothing half so well as the sound of their own voices. “The Hand’s tourney means rich lords with fat purses. The last time I came away with more silver than I could carry … or would have, if I hadn’t lost it all betting on the Kingslayer to win the day.”
“The gods frown on the gambler,” Ser Rodrik said sternly. He was of the north, and shared the Stark views on tournaments.
“They frowned on me, for certain,” the singer said. “Your cruel gods and the Knight of Flowers altogether did me in.”
“No doubt that was a lesson for you,” Ser Rodrik said.
“It was. This time my coin will champion Ser Loras.”
Ser Rodrik tried to tug at whiskers that were not there, but before he could frame a rebuke the serving boy came scurrying up. He laid trenchers of bread before them and filled them with chunks of browned meat off a skewer, dripping with hot juice. Another skewer held tiny onions, fire peppers, and fat mushrooms. Ser Rodrik set to lustily as the lad ran back to fetch them beer.
“My name is Marillion,” the singer said, plucking a string on his woodharp. “Doubtless you’ve heard me play somewhere?”
His manner made Catelyn smile. Few wandering singers ever ventured as far north as Winterfell, but she knew his like from her girlhood in Riverrun. “I fear not,” she told him.
He drew a plaintive chord from the woodharp. “That is your loss,” he said. “Who was the finest singer you’ve ever heard?”
“Alia of Braavos,” Ser Rodrik answered at once.
“Oh, I’m much better than that old stick,” Marillion said. “If you have the silver for a song, I’ll gladly show you.”
“I might have a copper or two, but I’d sooner toss it down a well than pay for your howling,” Ser Rodrik groused. His opinion of singers was well known; music was a lovely thing for girls, but he could not comprehend why any healthy boy would fill his hand with a harp when he might have had a sword.
“Your grandfather has a sour nature,” Marillion said to Catelyn. “I meant to do you honor. An homage to your beauty. In truth, I was made to sing for kings and high lords.”
“Oh, I can see that,” Catelyn said. “Lord Tully is fond of song, I hear. No doubt you’ve been to Riverrun.”
“A hundred times,” the singer said airily. “They keep a chamber for me, and the young lord is like a brother.”
Catelyn smiled, wondering what Edmure would think of that. Another singer had once bedded a girl her brother fancied; he had hated the breed ever since. “And Winterfell?” she asked him. “Have you traveled north?”
“Why would I?” Marillion asked. “It’s all blizzards and bearskins up there, and the Starks know no music but the howling of wolves.” Distantly, she was aware of the door banging open at the far end of the room.
“Innkeep,” a servant’s voice called out behind her, “we have horses that want stabling, and my lord of Lannister requires a room and a hot bath.”
“Oh, gods,” Ser Rodrik said before Catelyn reached out to silence him, her fingers tightening hard around his forearm.
Masha Heddle was bowing and smiling her hideous red smile. “I’m sorry, m’lord, truly, we’re full up, every room.”
There were four of them, Catelyn saw. An old man in the black of the Night’s Watch, two servants … and him, standing there small and bold as life. “My men will sleep in your stable, and as for myself, well, I do not require a large room, as you can plainly see.” He flashed a mocking grin. “So long as the fire’s warm and the straw reasonably free of fleas, I am a happy man.”
Masha Heddle was beside herself. “M’lord, there’s nothing, it’s the tourney, there’s no help for it, oh …”
Tyrion Lannister pulled a coin from his purse and flicked it up over his head, caught it, tossed it again. Even across the room, where Catelyn sat, the wink of gold was unmistakable.
A freerider in a faded blue cloak lurched to his feet. “You’re welcome to my room, m’lord.”
“Now there’s a clever man,” Lannister said as he sent the coin spinning across the room. The freerider snatched it from the air. “And a nimble one to boot.” The dwarf turned back to Masha Heddle. “You will be able to manage food, I trust?”
“Anything you like, m’lord, anything at all,” the innkeep promised. And may he choke on it, Catelyn thought, but it was Bran she saw choking, drowning on his own blood.
Lannister glanced at the nearest tables. “My men will have whatever you’re serving these people. Double portions, we’ve had a long hard ride. I’ll take a roast fowl—chicken, duck, pigeon, it makes no matter. And send up a flagon of your best wine. Yoren, will you sup with me?”
“Aye, m’lord, I will,” the black brother replied.
The dwarf had not so much as glanced toward the far end of the room, and Catelyn was thinking how grateful she was for the crowded benches between them when suddenly Marillion bounded to his feet. “My lord of Lannister!” he called out. “I would be pleased to entertain you while you eat. Let me sing you the lay of your father’s great victory at King’s Landing!”
“Nothing would be more likely to ruin my supper,” the dwarf said dryly. His mismatched eyes considered the singer briefly, started to move away … and found Catelyn. He looked at her for a moment, puzzled. She turned her face away, but too late. The dwarf was smiling. “Lady Stark, what an unexpected pleasure,” he said. “I was sorry to miss you at Winterfell.”
Marillion gaped at her, confusion giving way to chagrin as Catelyn rose slowly to her feet. She heard Ser Rodrik curse. If only the man had lingered at the Wall, she thought, if only …
“Lady … Stark?” Masha Heddle said thickly.
“I was still Catelyn Tully the last time I bedded here,” she told the innkeep. She could hear the muttering, feel the eyes upon her. Catelyn glanced around the room, at the faces of the knights and sworn swords, and took a deep breath to slow the frantic beating of her heart. Did she dare take the risk? There was no time to think it through, only the moment and the sound of her own voice ringing in her ears. “You in the corner,” she said to an older man she had not noticed until now. “Is that the black bat of Harrenhal I see embroidered on your surcoat, ser?”
The man got to his feet. “It is, my lady.”
“And is Lady Whent a true and honest friend to my father, Lord Hoster Tully of Riverrun?”
“She is,” the man replied stoutly.
Ser Rodrik rose quietly and loosened his sword in its scabbard. The dwarf was blinking at them, blank-faced, with puzzlement in his mismatched eyes.
“The red stallion was ever a welcome sight in Riverrun,” she said to the trio by the fire. “My father counts Jonos Bracken among his oldest and most loyal bannermen.”
The three men-at-arms exchanged uncertain looks. “Our lord is honored by his trust,” one of them said hesitantly.
“I envy your father all these fine friends,” Lannister quipped, “but I do not quite see the purpose of this, Lady Stark.”
She ignored him, turning to the large party in blue and grey. They were the heart of the matter; there were more than twenty of them. “I know your sigil as well: the twin towers of Frey. How fares your good lord, sers?”
Their captain rose. “Lord Walder is well, my lady. He plans to take a new wife on his ninetieth name day, and has asked your lord father to honor the wedding with his presence.”
Tyrion Lannister sniggered. That was when Catelyn knew he was hers. “This man came a guest into my house, and there conspired to murder my son, a boy of seven,” she proclaimed to the room at large, pointing. Ser Rodrik moved to her side, his sword in hand. “In the name of King Robert and the good lords you serve, I call upon you to seize him and help me return him to Winterfell to await the king’s justice.”
She did not know what was more satisfying: the sound of a dozen swords drawn as one or the look on Tyrion Lannister’s face.

“My lady, you should have sent word of your coming,” Ser Donnel Waynwood told her as their horses climbed the pass. “We would have sent an escort. The high road is not as safe as it once was, for a party as small as yours.”
“We learned that to our sorrow, Ser Donnel,” Catelyn said. Sometimes she felt as though her heart had turned to stone; six brave men had died to bring her this far, and she could not even find it in her to weep for them. Even their names were fading. “The clansmen harried us day and night. We lost three men in the first attack, and two more in the second, and Lannister’s serving man died of a fever when his wounds festered. When we heard your men approaching, I thought us doomed for certain.” They had drawn up for a last desperate fight, blades in hand and backs to the rock. The dwarf had been whetting the edge of his axe and making some mordant jest when Bronn spotted the banner the riders carried before them, the moon-and-falcon of House Arryn, sky-blue and white. Catelyn had never seen a more welcome sight.
“The clans have grown bolder since Lord Jon died,” Ser Donnel said. He was a stocky youth of twenty years, earnest and homely, with a wide nose and a shock of thick brown hair. “If it were up to me, I would take a hundred men into the mountains, root them out of their fastnesses, and teach them some sharp lessons, but your sister has forbidden it. She would not even permit her knights to fight in the Hand’s tourney. She wants all our swords kept close to home, to defend the Vale … against what, no one is certain. Shadows, some say.” He looked at her anxiously, as if he had suddenly remembered who she was. “I hope I have not spoken out of turn, my lady. I meant no offense.”
“Frank talk does not offend me, Ser Donnel.” Catelyn knew what her sister feared. Not shadows, Lannisters, she thought to herself, glancing back to where the dwarf rode beside Bronn. The two of them had grown thick as thieves since Chiggen had died. The little man was more cunning than she liked. When they had entered the mountains, he had been her captive, bound and helpless. What was he now? Her captive still, yet he rode along with a dirk through his belt and an axe strapped to his saddle, wearing the shadowskin cloak he’d won dicing with the singer and the chainmail hauberk he’d taken off Chiggen’s corpse. Two score men flanked the dwarf and the rest of her ragged band, knights and men-at-arms in service to her sister Lysa and Jon Arryn’s young son, and yet Tyrion betrayed no hint of fear. Could I be wrong? Catelyn wondered, not for the first time. Could he be innocent after all, of Bran and Jon Arryn and all the rest? And if he was, what did that make her? Six men had died to bring him here.
Resolute, she pushed her doubts away. “When we reach your keep, I would take it kindly if you could send for Maester Colemon at once. Ser Rodrik is feverish from his wounds.” More than once she had feared the gallant old knight would not survive the journey. Toward the end he could scarcely sit his horse, and Bronn had urged her to leave him to his fate, but Catelyn would not hear of it. They had tied him in the saddle instead, and she had commanded Marillion the singer to watch over him.
Ser Donnel hesitated before he answered. “The Lady Lysa has commanded the maester to remain at the Eyrie at all times, to care for Lord Robert,” he said. “We have a septon at the gate who tends to our wounded. He can see to your man’s hurts.”
Catelyn had more faith in a maester’s learning than a septon’s prayers. She was about to say as much when she saw the battlements ahead, long parapets built into the very stone of the mountains on either side of them. Where the pass shrank to a narrow defile scarce wide enough for four men to ride abreast, twin watchtowers clung to the rocky slopes, joined by a covered bridge of weathered grey stone that arched above the road. Silent faces watched from arrow slits in tower, battlements, and bridge. When they had climbed almost to the top, a knight rode out to meet them. His horse and his armor were grey, but his cloak was the rippling blue-and-red of Riverrun, and a shiny black fish, wrought in gold and obsidian, pinned its folds against his shoulder. “Who would pass the Bloody Gate?” he called.
“Ser Donnel Waynwood, with the Lady Catelyn Stark and her companions,” the young knight answered.
The Knight of the Gate lifted his visor. “I thought the lady looked familiar. You are far from home, little Cat.”
“And you, Uncle,” she said, smiling despite all she had been through. Hearing that hoarse, smoky voice again took her back twenty years, to the days of her childhood.
“My home is at my back,” he said gruffly.
“Your home is in my heart,” Catelyn told him. “Take off your helm. I would look on your face again.”
“The years have not improved it, I fear,” Brynden Tully said, but when he lifted off the helm, Catelyn saw that he lied. His features were lined and weathered, and time had stolen the auburn from his hair and left him only grey, but the smile was the same, and the bushy eyebrows fat as caterpillars, and the laughter in his deep blue eyes. “Did Lysa know you were coming?”
“There was no time to send word ahead,” Catelyn told him. The others were coming up behind her. “I fear we ride before the storm, Uncle.”
“May we enter the Vale?” Ser Donnel asked. The Waynwoods were ever ones for ceremony.
“In the name of Robert Arryn, Lord of the Eyrie, Defender of the Vale, True Warden of the East, I bid you enter freely, and charge you to keep his peace,” Ser Brynden replied. “Come.”
And so she rode behind him, beneath the shadow of the Bloody Gate where a dozen armies had dashed themselves to pieces in the Age of Heroes. On the far side of the stoneworks, the mountains opened up suddenly upon a vista of green fields, blue sky, and snowcapped mountains that took her breath away. The Vale of Arryn bathed in the morning light.
It stretched before them to the misty east, a tranquil land of rich black soil, wide slow-moving rivers, and hundreds of small lakes that shone like mirrors in the sun, protected on all sides by its sheltering peaks. Wheat and corn and barley grew high in its fields, and even in Highgarden the pumpkins were no larger nor the fruit any sweeter than here. They stood at the western end of the valley, where the high road crested the last pass and began its winding descent to the bottomlands two miles below. The Vale was narrow here, no more than a half day’s ride across, and the northern mountains seemed so close that Catelyn could almost reach out and touch them. Looming over them all was the jagged peak called the Giant’s Lance, a mountain that even mountains looked up to, its head lost in icy mists three and a half miles above the valley floor. Over its massive western shoulder flowed the ghost torrent of Alyssa’s Tears. Even from this distance, Catelyn could make out the shining silver thread, bright against the dark stone.
When her uncle saw that she had stopped, he moved his horse closer and pointed. “It’s there, beside Alyssa’s Tears. All you can see from here is a flash of white every now and then, if you look hard and the sun hits the walls just right.”
Seven towers, Ned had told her, like white daggers thrust into the belly of the sky, so high you can stand on the parapets and look down on the clouds. “How long a ride?” she asked.
“We can be at the mountain by evenfall,” Uncle Brynden said, “but the climb will take another day.”
Ser Rodrik Cassel spoke up from behind. “My lady,” he said, “I fear I can go no farther today.” His face sagged beneath his ragged, new-grown whiskers, and he looked so weary Catelyn feared he might fall off his horse.
“Nor should you,” she said. “You have done all I could have asked of you, and a hundred times more. My uncle will see me the rest of the way to the Eyrie. Lannister must come with me, but there is no reason that you and the others should not rest here and recover your strength.”
“We should be honored to have them to guest,” Ser Donnel said with the grave courtesy of the young. Beside Ser Rodrik, only Bronn, Ser Willis Wode, and Marillion the singer remained of the party that had ridden with her from the inn by the crossroads.
“My lady,” Marillion said, riding forward. “I beg you allow me to accompany you to the Eyrie, to see the end of the tale as I saw its beginnings.” The boy sounded haggard, yet strangely determined; he had a fevered shine to his eyes.
Catelyn had never asked the singer to ride with them; that choice he had made himself, and how he had come to survive the journey when so many braver men lay dead and unburied behind them, she could never say. Yet here he was, with a scruff of beard that made him look almost a man. Perhaps she owed him something for having come this far. “Very well,” she told him.
“I’ll come as well,” Bronn announced.
She liked that less well. Without Bronn she would never have reached the Vale, she knew; the sellsword was as fierce a fighter as she had ever seen, and his sword had helped cut them through to safety. Yet for all that, Catelyn misliked the man. Courage he had, and strength, but there was no kindness in him, and little loyalty. And she had seen him riding beside Lannister far too often, talking in low voices and laughing at some private joke. She would have preferred to separate him from the dwarf here and now, but having agreed that Marillion might continue to the Eyrie, she could see no gracious way to deny that same right to Bronn. “As you wish,” she said, although she noted that he had not actually asked her permission.
Ser Willis Wode remained with Ser Rodrik, a soft-spoken septon fussing over their wounds. Their horses were left behind as well, poor ragged things. Ser Donnel promised to send birds ahead to the Eyrie and the Gates of the Moon with the word of their coming. Fresh mounts were brought forth from the stables, surefooted mountain stock with shaggy coats, and within the hour they set forth once again. Catelyn rode beside her uncle as they began the descent to the valley floor. Behind came Bronn, Tyrion Lannister, Marillion, and six of Brynden’s men.
Not until they were a third of the way down the mountain path, well out of earshot of the others, did Brynden Tully turn to her and say, “So, child. Tell me about this storm of yours.”
“I have not been a child in many years, Uncle,” Catelyn said, but she told him nonetheless. It took longer than she would have believed to tell it all, Lysa’s letter and Bran’s fall, the assassin’s dagger and Littlefinger and her chance meeting with Tyrion Lannister in the crossroads inn.
Her uncle listened silently, heavy brows shadowing his eyes as his frown grew deeper. Brynden Tully had always known how to listen … to anyone but her father. He was Lord Hoster’s brother, younger by five years, but the two of them had been at war as far back as Catelyn could remember. During one of their louder quarrels, when Catelyn was eight, Lord Hoster had called Brynden “the black goat of the Tully flock.” Laughing, Brynden had pointed out that the sigil of their house was a leaping trout, so he ought to be a black fish rather than a black goat, and from that day forward he had taken it as his personal emblem.
The war had not ended until the day she and Lysa had been wed. It was at their wedding feast that Brynden told his brother he was leaving Riverrun to serve Lysa and her new husband, the Lord of the Eyrie. Lord Hoster had not spoken his brother’s name since, from what Edmure told her in his infrequent letters.
Nonetheless, during all those years of Catelyn’s girlhood, it had been Brynden the Blackfish to whom Lord Hoster’s children had run with their tears and their tales, when Father was too busy and Mother too ill. Catelyn, Lysa, Edmure … and yes, even Petyr Baelish, their father’s ward … he had listened to them all patiently, as he listened now, laughing at their triumphs and sympathizing with their childish misfortunes.
When she was done, her uncle remained silent for a long time, as his horse negotiated the steep, rocky trail. “Your father must be told,” he said at last. “If the Lannisters should march, Winterfell is remote and the Vale walled up behind its mountains, but Riverrun lies right in their path.”
“I’d had the same fear,” Catelyn admitted. “I shall ask Maester Colemon to send a bird when we reach the Eyrie.” She had other messages to send as well; the commands that Ned had given her for his bannermen, to ready the defenses of the north. “What is the mood in the Vale?” she asked.
“Angry,” Brynden Tully admitted. “Lord Jon was much loved, and the insult was keenly felt when the king named Jaime Lannister to an office the Arryns had held for near three hundred years. Lysa has commanded us to call her son the True Warden of the East, but no one is fooled. Nor is your sister alone in wondering at the manner of the Hand’s death. None dare say Jon was murdered, not openly, but suspicion casts a long shadow.” He gave Catelyn a look, his mouth tight. “And there is the boy.”
“The boy? What of him?” She ducked her head as they passed under a low overhang of rock, and around a sharp turn.
Her uncle’s voice was troubled. “Lord Robert,” he sighed. “Six years old, sickly, and prone to weep if you take his dolls away. Jon Arryn’s trueborn heir, by all the gods, yet there are some who say he is too weak to sit his father’s seat. Nestor Royce has been high steward these past fourteen years, while Lord Jon served in King’s Landing, and many whisper that he should rule until the boy comes of age. Others believe that Lysa must marry again, and soon. Already the suitors gather like crows on a battlefield. The Eyrie is full of them.”
“I might have expected that,” Catelyn said. Small wonder there; Lysa was still young, and the kingdom of Mountain and Vale made a handsome wedding gift. “Will Lysa take another husband?”
“She says yes, provided she finds a man who suits her,” Brynden Tully said, “but she has already rejected Lord Nestor and a dozen other suitable men. She swears that this time she will choose her lord husband.”
“You of all people can scarce fault her for that.”
Ser Brynden snorted. “Nor do I, but … it seems to me Lysa is only playing at courtship. She enjoys the sport, but I believe your sister intends to rule herself until her boy is old enough to be Lord of the Eyrie in truth as well as name.”
“A woman can rule as wisely as a man,” Catelyn said.
“The right woman can,” her uncle said with a sideways glance. “Make no mistake, Cat. Lysa is not you.” He hesitated a moment. “If truth be told, I fear you may not find your sister as … helpful as you would like.”
She was puzzled. “What do you mean?”
“The Lysa who came back from King’s Landing is not the same girl who went south when her husband was named Hand. Those years were hard for her. You must know. Lord Arryn was a dutiful husband, but their marriage was made from politics, not passion.”
“As was my own.”
“They began the same, but your ending has been happier than your sister’s. Two babes stillborn, twice as many miscarriages, Lord Arryn’s death … Catelyn, the gods gave Lysa only the one child, and he is all your sister lives for now, poor boy. Small wonder she fled rather than see him handed over to the Lannisters. Your sister is afraid, child, and the Lannisters are what she fears most. She ran to the Vale, stealing away from the Red Keep like a thief in the night, and all to snatch her son out of the lion’s mouth … and now you have brought the lion to her door.”
“In chains,” Catelyn said. A crevasse yawned on her right, falling away into darkness. She reined up her horse and picked her way along step by careful step.
“Oh?” Her uncle glanced back, to where Tyrion Lannister was making his slow descent behind them. “I see an axe on his saddle, a dirk at his belt, and a sellsword that trails after him like a hungry shadow. Where are the chains, sweet one?”
Catelyn shifted uneasily in her seat. “The dwarf is here, and not by choice. Chains or no, he is my prisoner. Lysa will want him to answer for his crimes no less than I. It was her own lord husband the Lannisters murdered, and her own letter that first warned us against them.”
Brynden Blackfish gave her a weary smile. “I hope you are right, child,” he sighed, in tones that said she was wrong.
The sun was well to the west by the time the slope began to flatten beneath the hooves of their horses. The road widened and grew straight, and for the first time Catelyn noticed wildflowers and grasses growing. Once they reached the valley floor, the going was faster and they made good time, cantering through verdant greenwoods and sleepy little hamlets, past orchards and golden wheat fields, splashing across a dozen sunlit streams. Her uncle sent a standard-bearer ahead of them, a double banner flying from his staff; the moon-and-falcon of House Arryn on high, and below it his own black fish. Farm wagons and merchants’ carts and riders from lesser houses moved aside to let them pass.
Even so, it was full dark before they reached the stout castle that stood at the foot of the Giant’s Lance. Torches flickered atop its ramparts, and the horned moon danced upon the dark waters of its moat. The drawbridge was up and the portcullis down, but Catelyn saw lights burning in the gatehouse and spilling from the windows of the square towers beyond.
“The Gates of the Moon,” her uncle said as the party drew rein. His standard-bearer rode to the edge of the moat to hail the men in the gatehouse. “Lord Nestor’s seat. He should be expecting us. Look up.”
Catelyn raised her eyes, up and up and up. At first all she saw was stone and trees, the looming mass of the great mountain shrouded in night, as black as a starless sky. Then she noticed the glow of distant fires well above them; a tower keep, built upon the steep side of the mountain, its lights like orange eyes staring down from above. Above that was another, higher and more distant, and still higher a third, no more than a flickering spark in the sky. And finally, up where the falcons soared, a flash of white in the moonlight. Vertigo washed over her as she stared upward at the pale towers, so far above.
“The Eyrie,” she heard Marillion murmur, awed.
The sharp voice of Tyrion Lannister broke in. “The Arryns must not be overfond of company. If you’re planning to make us climb that mountain in the dark, I’d rather you kill me here.”
“We’ll spend the night here and make the ascent on the morrow,” Brynden told him.
“I can scarcely wait,” the dwarf replied. “How do we get up there? I’ve no experience at riding goats.”
“Mules,” Brynden said, smiling.
“There are steps carved into the mountain,” Catelyn said. Ned had told her about them when he talked of his youth here with Robert Baratheon and Jon Arryn.
Her uncle nodded. “It is too dark to see them, but the steps are there. Too steep and narrow for horses, but mules can manage them most of the way. The path is guarded by three waycastles, Stone and Snow and Sky. The mules will take us as far up as Sky.”
Tyrion Lannister glanced up doubtfully. “And beyond that?”
Brynden smiled. “Beyond that, the path is too steep even for mules. We ascend on foot the rest of the way. Or perchance you’d prefer to ride a basket. The Eyrie clings to the mountain directly above Sky, and in its cellars are six great winches with long iron chains to draw supplies up from below. If you prefer, my lord of Lannister, I can arrange for you to ride up with the bread and beer and apples.”
The dwarf gave a bark of laughter. “Would that I were a pumpkin,” he said. “Alas, my lord father would no doubt be most chagrined if his son of Lannister went to his fate like a load of turnips. If you ascend on foot, I fear I must do the same. We Lannisters do have a certain pride.”
“Pride?” Catelyn snapped. His mocking tone and easy manner made her angry. “Arrogance, some might call it. Arrogance and avarice and lust for power.”
“My brother is undoubtedly arrogant,” Tyrion Lannister replied. “My father is the soul of avarice, and my sweet sister Cersei lusts for power with every waking breath. I, however, am innocent as a little lamb. Shall I bleat for you?” He grinned.
The drawbridge came creaking down before she could reply, and they heard the sound of oiled chains as the portcullis was drawn up. Men-at-arms carried burning brands out to light their way, and her uncle led them across the moat. Lord Nestor Royce, High Steward of the Vale and Keeper of the Gates of the Moon, was waiting in the yard to greet them, surrounded by his knights. “Lady Stark,” he said, bowing. He was a massive, barrel-chested man, and his bow was clumsy.
Catelyn dismounted to stand before him. “Lord Nestor,” she said. She knew the man only by reputation; Bronze Yohn’s cousin, from a lesser branch of House Royce, yet still a formidable lord in his own right. “We have had a long and tiring journey. I would beg the hospitality of your roof tonight, if I might.”
“My roof is yours, my lady,” Lord Nestor returned gruffly, “but your sister the Lady Lysa has sent down word from the Eyrie. She wishes to see you at once. The rest of your party will be housed here and sent up at first light.”
Her uncle swung off his horse. “What madness is this?” he said bluntly. Brynden Tully had never been a man to blunt the edge of his words. “A night ascent, with the moon not even full? Even Lysa should know that’s an invitation to a broken neck.”
“The mules know the way, Ser Brynden.” A wiry girl of seventeen or eighteen years stepped up beside Lord Nestor. Her dark hair was cropped short and straight around her head, and she wore riding leathers and a light shirt of silvered ringmail. She bowed to Catelyn, more gracefully than her lord. “I promise you, my lady, no harm will come to you. It would be my honor to take you up. I’ve made the dark climb a hundred times. Mychel says my father must have been a goat.”
She sounded so cocky that Catelyn had to smile. “Do you have a name, child?”
“Mya Stone, if it please you, my lady,” the girl said.
It did not please her; it was an effort for Catelyn to keep the smile on her face. Stone was a bastard’s name in the Vale, as Snow was in the north, and Flowers in Highgarden; in each of the Seven Kingdoms, custom had fashioned a surname for children born with no names of their own. Catelyn had nothing against this girl, but suddenly she could not help but think of Ned’s bastard on the Wall, and the thought made her angry and guilty, both at once. She struggled to find words for a reply.
Lord Nestor filled the silence. “Mya’s a clever girl, and if she vows she will bring you safely to the Lady Lysa, I believe her. She has not failed me yet.”
“Then I put myself in your hands, Mya Stone,” Catelyn said. “Lord Nestor, I charge you to keep a close guard on my prisoner.”
“And I charge you to bring the prisoner a cup of wine and a nicely crisped capon, before he dies of hunger,” Lannister said. “A girl would be pleasant as well, but I suppose that’s too much to ask of you.” The sellsword Bronn laughed aloud.
Lord Nestor ignored the banter. “As you say, my lady, so it will be done.” Only then did he look at the dwarf. “See our lord of Lannister to a tower cell, and bring him meat and mead.”
Catelyn took her leave of her uncle and the others as Tyrion Lannister was led off, then followed the bastard girl through the castle. Two mules were waiting in the upper bailey, saddled and ready. Mya helped her mount one while a guardsman in a sky-blue cloak opened the narrow postern gate. Beyond was dense forest of pine and spruce, and the mountain like a black wall, but the steps were there, chiseled deep into the rock, ascending into the sky. “Some people find it easier if they close their eyes,” Mya said as she led the mules through the gate into the dark wood. “When they get frightened or dizzy, sometimes they hold on to the mule too tight. They don’t like that.”
“I was born a Tully and wed to a Stark,” Catelyn said. “I do not frighten easily. Do you plan to light a torch?” The steps were black as pitch.
The girl made a face. “Torches just blind you. On a clear night like this, the moon and the stars are enough. Mychel says I have the eyes of the owl.” She mounted and urged her mule up the first step. Catelyn’s animal followed of its own accord.
“You mentioned Mychel before,” Catelyn said. The mules set the pace, slow but steady. She was perfectly content with that.
“Mychel’s my love,” Mya explained. “Mychel Redfort. He’s squire to Ser Lyn Corbray. We’re to wed as soon as he becomes a knight, next year or the year after.”
She sounded so like Sansa, so happy and innocent with her dreams. Catelyn smiled, but the smile was tinged with sadness. The Redforts were an old name in the Vale, she knew, with the blood of the First Men in their veins. His love she might be, but no Redfort would ever wed a bastard. His family would arrange a more suitable match for him, to a Corbray or a Waynwood or a Royce, or perhaps a daughter of some greater house outside the Vale. If Mychel Redfort laid with this girl at all, it would be on the wrong side of the sheet.
The ascent was easier than Catelyn had dared hope. The trees pressed close, leaning over the path to make a rustling green roof that shut out even the moon, so it seemed as though they were moving up a long black tunnel. But the mules were surefooted and tireless, and Mya Stone did indeed seem blessed with night-eyes. They plodded upward, winding their way back and forth across the face of the mountain as the steps twisted and turned. A thick layer of fallen needles carpeted the path, so the shoes of their mules made only the softest sound on the rock. The quiet soothed her, and the gentle rocking motion set Catelyn to swaying in her saddle. Before long she was fighting sleep.
Perhaps she did doze for a moment, for suddenly a massive ironbound gate was looming before them. “Stone,” Mya announced cheerily, dismounting. Iron spikes were set along the tops of formidable stone walls, and two fat round towers overtopped the keep. The gate swung open at Mya’s shout. Inside, the portly knight who commanded the waycastle greeted Mya by name and offered them skewers of charred meat and onions still hot from the spit. Catelyn had not realized how hungry she was. She ate standing in the yard, as stablehands moved their saddles to fresh mules. The hot juices ran down her chin and dripped onto her cloak, but she was too famished to care.
Then it was up onto a new mule and out again into the starlight. The second part of the ascent seemed more treacherous to Catelyn. The trail was steeper, the steps more worn, and here and there littered with pebbles and broken stone. Mya had to dismount a half-dozen times to move fallen rocks from their path. “You don’t want your mule to break a leg up here,” she said. Catelyn was forced to agree. She could feel the altitude more now. The trees were sparser up here, and the wind blew more vigorously, sharp gusts that tugged at her clothing and pushed her hair into her eyes. From time to time the steps doubled back on themselves, and she could see Stone below them, and the Gates of the Moon farther down, its torches no brighter than candles.
Snow was smaller than Stone, a single fortified tower and a timber keep and stable hidden behind a low wall of unmortared rock. Yet it nestled against the Giant’s Lance in such a way as to command the entire stone stair above the lower waycastle. An enemy intent on the Eyrie would have to fight his way from Stone step by step, while rocks and arrows rained down from Snow above. The commander, an anxious young knight with a pockmarked face, offered bread and cheese and the chance to warm themselves before his fire, but Mya declined. “We ought to keep going, my lady,” she said. “If it please you.” Catelyn nodded.
Again they were given fresh mules. Hers was white. Mya smiled when she saw him. “Whitey’s a good one, my lady. Sure of foot, even on ice, but you need to be careful. He’ll kick if he doesn’t like you.”
The white mule seemed to like Catelyn; there was no kicking, thank the gods. There was no ice either, and she was grateful for that as well. “My mother says that hundreds of years ago, this was where the snow began,” Mya told her. “It was always white above here, and the ice never melted.” She shrugged. “I can’t remember ever seeing snow this far down the mountain, but maybe it was that way once, in the olden times.”
So young, Catelyn thought, trying to remember if she had ever been like that. The girl had lived half her life in summer, and that was all she knew. Winter is coming, child, she wanted to tell her. The words were on her lips; she almost said them. Perhaps she was becoming a Stark at last.
Above Snow, the wind was a living thing, howling around them like a wolf in the waste, then falling off to nothing as if to lure them into complacency. The stars seemed brighter up here, so close that she could almost touch them, and the horned moon was huge in the clear black sky. As they climbed, Catelyn found it was better to look up than down. The steps were cracked and broken from centuries of freeze and thaw and the tread of countless mules, and even in the dark the heights put her heart in her throat. When they came to a high saddle between two spires of rock, Mya dismounted. “It’s best to lead the mules over,” she said. “The wind can be a little scary here, my lady.”
Catelyn climbed stiffly from the shadows and looked at the path ahead; twenty feet long and close to three feet wide, but with a precipitous drop to either side. She could hear the wind shrieking. Mya stepped lightly out, her mule following as calmly as if they were crossing a bailey. It was her turn. Yet no sooner had she taken her first step than fear caught Catelyn in its jaws. She could feel the emptiness, the vast black gulfs of air that yawned around her. She stopped, trembling, afraid to move. The wind screamed at her and wrenched at her cloak, trying to pull her over the edge. Catelyn edged her foot backward, the most timid of steps, but the mule was behind her, and she could not retreat. I am going to die here, she thought. She could feel cold sweat trickling down her back.
“Lady Stark,” Mya called across the gulf. The girl sounded a thousand leagues away. “Are you well?”
Catelyn Tully Stark swallowed what remained of her pride. “I … I cannot do this, child,” she called out.
“Yes you can,” the bastard girl said. “I know you can. Look how wide the path is.”
“I don’t want to look.” The world seemed to be spinning around her, mountain and sky and mules, whirling like a child’s top. Catelyn closed her eyes to steady her ragged breathing.
“I’ll come back for you,” Mya said. “Don’t move, my lady.”
Moving was about the last thing Catelyn was about to do. She listened to the skirling of the wind and the scuffling sound of leather on stone. Then Mya was there, taking her gently by the arm. “Keep your eyes closed if you like. Let go of the rope now, Whitey will take care of himself. Very good, my lady. I’ll lead you over, it’s easy, you’ll see. Give me a step now. That’s it, move your foot, just slide it forward. See. Now another. Easy. You could run across. Another one, go on. Yes.” And so, foot by foot, step by step, the bastard girl led Catelyn across, blind and trembling, while the white mule followed placidly behind them.
The waycastle called Sky was no more than a high, crescent-shaped wall of unmortared stone raised against the side of the mountain, but even the topless towers of Valyria could not have looked more beautiful to Catelyn Stark. Here at last the snow crown began; Sky’s weathered stones were rimed with frost, and long spears of ice hung from the slopes above.
Dawn was breaking in the east as Mya Stone hallooed for the guards, and the gates opened before them. Inside the walls there was only a series of ramps and a great tumble of boulders and stones of all sizes. No doubt it would be the easiest thing in the world to begin an avalanche from here. A mouth yawned in the rock face in front of them. “The stables and barracks are in there,” Mya said. “The last part is inside the mountain. It can be a little dark, but at least you’re out of the wind. This is as far as the mules can go. Past here, well, it’s a sort of chimney, more like a stone ladder than proper steps, but it’s not too bad. Another hour and we’ll be there.”
Catelyn looked up. Directly overhead, pale in the dawn light, she could see the foundations of the Eyrie. It could not be more than six hundred feet above them. From below it looked like a small white honeycomb. She remembered what her uncle had said of baskets and winches. “The Lannisters may have their pride,” she told Mya, “but the Tullys are born with better sense. I have ridden all day and the best part of a night. Tell them to lower a basket. I shall ride with the turnips.”
The sun was well above the mountains by the time Catelyn Stark finally reached the Eyrie. A stocky, silver-haired man in a sky-blue cloak and hammered moon-and-falcon breastplate helped her from the basket; Ser Vardis Egen, captain of Jon Arryn’s household guard. Beside him stood Maester Colemon, thin and nervous, with too little hair and too much neck. “Lady Stark,” Ser Vardis said, “the pleasure is as great as it is unanticipated.” Maester Colemon bobbed his head in agreement. “Indeed it is, my lady, indeed it is. I have sent word to your sister. She left orders to be awakened the instant you arrived.”
“I hope she had a good night’s rest,” Catelyn said with a certain bite in her tone that seemed to go unnoticed.
The men escorted her from the winch room up a spiral stair. The Eyrie was a small castle by the standards of the great houses; seven slender white towers bunched as tightly as arrows in a quiver on a shoulder of the great mountain. It had no need of stables nor smithys nor kennels, but Ned said its granary was as large as Winterfell’s, and its towers could house five hundred men. Yet it seemed strangely deserted to Catelyn as she passed through it, its pale stone halls echoing and empty.
Lysa was waiting alone in her solar, still clad in her bed robes. Her long auburn hair tumbled unbound across bare white shoulders and down her back. A maid stood behind her, brushing out the night’s tangles, but when Catelyn entered, her sister rose to her feet, smiling. “Cat,” she said. “Oh, Cat, how good it is to see you. My sweet sister.” She ran across the chamber and wrapped her sister in her arms. “How long it has been,” Lysa murmured against her. “Oh, how very very long.”
It had been five years, in truth; five cruel years, for Lysa. They had taken their toll. Her sister was two years the younger, yet she looked older now. Shorter than Catelyn, Lysa had grown thick of body, pale and puffy of face. She had the blue eyes of the Tullys, but hers were pale and watery, never still. Her small mouth had turned petulant. As Catelyn held her, she remembered the slender, high-breasted girl who’d waited beside her that day in the sept at Riverrun. How lovely and full of hope she had been. All that remained of her sister’s beauty was the great fall of thick auburn hair that cascaded to her waist.
“You look well,” Catelyn lied, “but … tired.”
Her sister broke the embrace. “Tired. Yes. Oh, yes.” She seemed to notice the others then; her maid, Maester Colemon, Ser Vardis. “Leave us,” she told them. “I wish to speak to my sister alone.” She held Catelyn’s hand as they withdrew …
 … and dropped it the instant the door closed. Catelyn saw her face change. It was as if the sun had gone behind a cloud. “Have you taken leave of your senses?” Lysa snapped at her. “To bring him here, without a word of permission, without so much as a warning, to drag us into your quarrels with the Lannisters …”
“My quarrels?” Catelyn could scarce believe what she was hearing. A great fire burned in the hearth, but there was no trace of warmth in Lysa’s voice. “They were your quarrels first, sister. It was you who sent me that cursed letter, you who wrote that the Lannisters had murdered your husband.”
“To warn you, so you could stay away from them! I never meant to fight them! Gods, Cat, do you know what you’ve done?”
“Mother?” a small voice said. Lysa whirled, her heavy robe swirling around her. Robert Arryn, Lord of the Eyrie, stood in the doorway, clutching a ragged cloth doll and looking at them with large eyes. He was a painfully thin child, small for his age and sickly all his days, and from time to time he trembled. The shaking sickness, the maesters called it. “I heard voices.”
Small wonder, Catelyn thought; Lysa had almost been shouting. Still, her sister looked daggers at her. “This is your aunt Catelyn, baby. My sister, Lady Stark. Do you remember?”
The boy glanced at her blankly. “I think so,” he said, blinking, though he had been less than a year old the last time Catelyn had seen him.
Lysa seated herself near the fire and said, “Come to Mother, my sweet one.” She straightened his bedclothes and fussed with his fine brown hair. “Isn’t he beautiful? And strong too, don’t you believe the things you hear. Jon knew. The seed is strong, he told me. His last words. He kept saying Robert’s name, and he grabbed my arm so hard he left marks. Tell them, the seed is strong. His seed. He wanted everyone to know what a good strong boy my baby was going to be.”
“Lysa,” Catelyn said, “if you’re right about the Lannisters, all the more reason we must act quickly. We—”
“Not in front of the baby,” Lysa said. “He has a delicate temper, don’t you, sweet one?”
“The boy is Lord of the Eyrie and Defender of the Vale,” Catelyn reminded her, “and these are not times for delicacy. Ned thinks it may come to war.”
“Quiet!” Lysa snapped at her. “You’re scaring the boy.” Little Robert took a quick peek over his shoulder at Catelyn and began to tremble. His doll fell to the rushes, and he pressed himself against his mother. “Don’t be afraid, my sweet baby,” Lysa whispered. “Mother’s here, nothing will hurt you.” She opened her robe and drew out a pale, heavy breast, tipped with red. The boy grabbed for it eagerly, buried his face against her chest, and began to suck. Lysa stroked his hair.
Catelyn was at a loss for words, Jon Arryn’s son, she thought incredulously. She remembered her own baby, three-year-old Rickon, half the age of this boy and five times as fierce. Small wonder the lords of the Vale were restive. For the first time she understood why the king had tried to take the child away from his mother to foster with the Lannisters …
“We’re safe here,” Lysa was saying. Whether to her or to the boy, Catelyn was not sure.
“Don’t be a fool,” Catelyn said, the anger rising in her. “No one is safe. If you think hiding here will make the Lannisters forget you, you are sadly mistaken.”
Lysa covered her boy’s ear with her hand. “Even if they could bring an army through the mountains and past the Bloody Gate, the Eyrie is impregnable. You saw for yourself. No enemy could ever reach us up here.”
Catelyn wanted to slap her. Uncle Brynden had tried to warn her, she realized. “No castle is impregnable.”
“This one is,” Lysa insisted. “Everyone says so. The only thing is, what am I to do with this Imp you have brought me?”
“Is he a bad man?” the Lord of the Eyrie asked, his mother’s breast popping from his mouth, the nipple wet and red.
“A very bad man,” Lysa told him as she covered herself, “but Mother won’t let him harm my little baby.”
“Make him fly,” Robert said eagerly.
Lysa stroked her son’s hair. “Perhaps we will,” she murmured. “Perhaps that is just what we will do.”

The eastern sky was rose and gold as the sun broke over the Vale of Arryn. Catelyn Stark watched the light spread, her hands resting on the delicate carved stone of the balustrade outside her window. Below her the world turned from black to indigo to green as dawn crept across fields and forests. Pale white mists rose off Alyssa’s Tears, where the ghost waters plunged over the shoulder of the mountain to begin their long tumble down the face of the Giant’s Lance. Catelyn could feel the faint touch of spray on her face.
Alyssa Arryn had seen her husband, her brothers, and all her children slain, and yet in life she had never shed a tear. So in death, the gods had decreed that she would know no rest until her weeping watered the black earth of the Vale, where the men she had loved were buried. Alyssa had been dead six thousand years now, and still no drop of the torrent had ever reached the valley floor far below. Catelyn wondered how large a waterfall her own tears would make when she died. “Tell me the rest of it,” she said.
“The Kingslayer is massing a host at Casterly Rock,” Ser Rodrik Cassel answered from the room behind her. “Your brother writes that he has sent riders to the Rock, demanding that Lord Tywin proclaim his intent, but he has had no answer. Edmure has commanded Lord Vance and Lord Piper to guard the pass below the Golden Tooth. He vows to you that he will yield no foot of Tully land without first watering it with Lannister blood.”
Catelyn turned away from the sunrise. Its beauty did little to lighten her mood; it seemed cruel for a day to dawn so fair and end so foul as this one promised to. “Edmure has sent riders and made vows,” she said, “but Edmure is not the Lord of Riverrun. What of my lord father?”
“The message made no mention of Lord Hoster, my lady.” Ser Rodrik tugged at his whiskers. They had grown in white as snow and bristly as a thornbush while he was recovering from his wounds; he looked almost himself again.
“My father would not have given the defense of Riverrun over to Edmure unless he was very sick,” she said, worried. “I should have been woken as soon as this bird arrived.”
“Your lady sister thought it better to let you sleep, Maester Colemon told me.”
“I should have been woken,” she insisted.
“The maester tells me your sister planned to speak with you after the combat,” Ser Rodrik said.
“Then she still plans to go through with this mummer’s farce?” Catelyn grimaced. “The dwarf has played her like a set of pipes, and she is too deaf to hear the tune. Whatever happens this morning, Ser Rodrik, it is past time we took our leave. My place is at Winterfell with my sons. If you are strong enough to travel, I shall ask Lysa for an escort to see us to Gulltown. We can take ship from there.”
“Another ship?” Ser Rodrik looked a shade green, yet he managed not to shudder. “As you say, my lady.”
The old knight waited outside her door as Catelyn summoned the servants Lysa had given her. If she spoke to her sister before the duel, perhaps she could change her mind, she thought as they dressed her. Lysa’s policies varied with her moods, and her moods changed hourly. The shy girl she had known at Riverrun had grown into a woman who was by turns proud, fearful, cruel, dreamy, reckless, timid, stubborn, vain, and, above all, inconstant.
When that vile turnkey of hers had come crawling to tell them that Tyrion Lannister wished to confess, Catelyn had urged Lysa to have the dwarf brought to them privately, but no, nothing would do but that her sister must make a show of him before half the Vale. And now this …
“Lannister is my prisoner,” she told Ser Rodrik as they descended the tower stairs and made their way through the Eyrie’s cold white halls. Catelyn wore plain grey wool with a silvered belt. “My sister must be reminded of that.”
At the doors to Lysa’s apartments, they met her uncle storming out. “Going to join the fool’s festival?” Ser Brynden snapped. “I’d tell you to slap some sense into your sister, if I thought it would do any good, but you’d only bruise your hand.”
“There was a bird from Riverrun,” Catelyn began, “a letter from Edmure …”
“I know, child.” The black fish that fastened his cloak was Brynden’s only concession to ornament. “I had to hear it from Maester Colemon. I asked your sister for leave to take a thousand seasoned men and ride for Riverrun with all haste. Do you know what she told me? The Vale cannot spare a thousand swords, nor even one, Uncle, she said. You are the Knight of the Gate. Your place is here.” A gust of childish laughter drifted through the open doors behind him, and her uncle glanced darkly over his shoulder. “Well, I told her she could bloody well find herself a new Knight of the Gate. Black fish or no, I am still a Tully. I shall leave for Riverrun by evenfall.”
Catelyn could not pretend to surprise. “Alone? You know as well as I that you will never survive the high road. Ser Rodrik and I are returning to Winterfell. Come with us, Uncle. I will give you your thousand men. Riverrun will not fight alone.”
Brynden thought a moment, then nodded a brusque agreement. “As you say. It’s the long way home, but I’m more like to get there. I’ll wait for you below.” He went striding off, his cloak swirling behind him.
Catelyn exchanged a look with Ser Rodrik. They went through the doors to the high, nervous sound of a child’s giggles.
Lysa’s apartments opened over a small garden, a circle of dirt and grass planted with blue flowers and ringed on all sides by tall white towers. The builders had intended it as a godswood, but the Eyrie rested on the hard stone of the mountain, and no matter how much soil was hauled up from the Vale, they could not get a weirwood to take root here. So the Lords of the Eyrie planted grass and scattered statuary amidst low, flowering shrubs. It was there the two champions would meet to place their lives, and that of Tyrion Lannister, into the hands of the gods.
Lysa, freshly scrubbed and garbed in cream velvet with a rope of sapphires and moonstones around her milk-white neck, was holding court on the terrace overlooking the scene of the combat, surrounded by her knights, retainers, and lords high and low. Most of them still hoped to wed her, bed her, and rule the Vale of Arryn by her side. From what Catelyn had seen during her stay at the Eyrie, it was a vain hope.
A wooden platform had been built to elevate Robert’s chair; there the Lord of the Eyrie sat, giggling and clapping his hands as a humpbacked puppeteer in blue-and-white motley made two wooden knights hack and slash at each other. Pitchers of thick cream and baskets of blackberries had been set out, and the guests were sipping a sweet orange-scented wine from engraved silver cups. A fool’s festival, Brynden had called it, and small wonder.
Across the terrace, Lysa laughed gaily at some jest of Lord Hunter’s, and nibbled a blackberry from the point of Ser Lyn Corbray’s dagger. They were the suitors who stood highest in Lysa’s favor … today, at least. Catelyn would have been hard-pressed to say which man was more unsuitable. Eon Hunter was even older than Jon Arryn had been, half-crippled by gout, and cursed with three quarrelsome sons, each more grasping than the last. Ser Lyn was a different sort of folly; lean and handsome, heir to an ancient but impoverished house, but vain, reckless, hot-tempered … and, it was whispered, notoriously uninterested in the intimate charms of women.
When Lysa espied Catelyn, she welcomed her with a sisterly embrace and a moist kiss on the cheek. “Isn’t it a lovely morning? The gods are smiling on us. Do try a cup of the wine, sweet sister. Lord Hunter was kind enough to send for it, from his own cellars.”
“Thank you, no. Lysa, we must talk.”
“After,” her sister promised, already beginning to turn away from her.
“Now.” Catelyn spoke more loudly than she’d intended. Men were turning to look. “Lysa, you cannot mean to go ahead with this folly. Alive, the Imp has value. Dead, he is only food for crows. And if his champion should prevail here—”
“Small chance of that, my lady,” Lord Hunter assured her, patting her shoulder with a liver-spotted hand. “Ser Vardis is a doughty fighter. He will make short work of the sellsword.”
“Will he, my lord?” Catelyn said coolly. “I wonder.” She had seen Bronn fight on the high road; it was no accident that he had survived the journey while other men had died. He moved like a panther, and that ugly sword of his seemed a part of his arm.
Lysa’s suitors were gathering around them like bees round a blossom. “Women understand little of these things,” Ser Morton Waynwood said. “Ser Vardis is a knight, sweet lady. This other fellow, well, his sort are all cowards at heart. Useful enough in a battle, with thousands of their fellows around them, but stand them up alone and the manhood leaks right out of them.”
“Say you have the truth of it, then,” Catelyn said with a courtesy that made her mouth ache. “What will we gain by the dwarf’s death? Do you imagine that Jaime will care a fig that we gave his brother a trial before we flung him off a mountain?”
“Behead the man,” Ser Lyn Corbray suggested. “When the Kingslayer receives the Imp’s head, it will be a warning to him.”
Lysa gave an impatient shake of her waist-long auburn hair. “Lord Robert wants to see him fly,” she said, as if that settled the matter. “And the Imp has only himself to blame. It was he who demanded a trial by combat.”
“Lady Lysa had no honorable way to deny him, even if she’d wished to,” Lord Hunter intoned ponderously.
Ignoring them all, Catelyn turned all her force on her sister. “I remind you, Tyrion Lannister is my prisoner.”
“And I remind you, the dwarf murdered my lord husband!” Her voice rose. “He poisoned the Hand of the King and left my sweet baby fatherless, and now I mean to see him pay!” Whirling, her skirts swinging around her, Lysa stalked across the terrace. Ser Lyn and Ser Morton and the other suitors excused themselves with cool nods and trailed after her.
“Do you think he did?” Ser Rodrik asked her quietly when they were alone again. “Murder Lord Jon, that is? The Imp still denies it, and most fiercely …”
“I believe the Lannisters murdered Lord Arryn,” Catelyn replied, “but whether it was Tyrion, or Ser Jaime, or the queen, or all of them together, I could not begin to say.” Lysa had named Cersei in the letter she had sent to Winterfell, but now she seemed certain that Tyrion was the killer … perhaps because the dwarf was here, while the queen was safe behind the walls of the Red Keep, hundreds of leagues to the south. Catelyn almost wished she had burned her sister’s letter before reading it.
Ser Rodrik tugged at his whiskers. “Poison, well … that could be the dwarf’s work, true enough. Or Cersei’s. It’s said poison is a woman’s weapon, begging your pardons, my lady. The Kingslayer, now … I have no great liking for the man, but he’s not the sort. Too fond of the sight of blood on that golden sword of his. Was it poison, my lady?”
Catelyn frowned, vaguely uneasy. “How else could they make it look a natural death?” Behind her, Lord Robert shrieked with delight as one of the puppet knights sliced the other in half, spilling a flood of red sawdust onto the terrace. She glanced at her nephew and sighed. “The boy is utterly without discipline. He will never be strong enough to rule unless he is taken away from his mother for a time.”
“His lord father agreed with you,” said a voice at her elbow. She turned to behold Maester Colemon, a cup of wine in his hand. “He was planning to send the boy to Dragonstone for fostering, you know … oh, but I’m speaking out of turn.” The apple of his throat bobbed anxiously beneath the loose maester’s chain. “I fear I’ve had too much of Lord Hunter’s excellent wine. The prospect of bloodshed has my nerves all a-fray …”
“You are mistaken, Maester,” Catelyn said. “It was Casterly Rock, not Dragonstone, and those arrangements were made after the Hand’s death, without my sister’s consent.”
The maester’s head jerked so vigorously at the end of his absurdly long neck that he looked half a puppet himself. “No, begging your forgiveness, my lady, but it was Lord Jon who—”
A bell tolled loudly below them. High lords and serving girls alike broke off what they were doing and moved to the balustrade. Below, two guardsmen in sky-blue cloaks led forth Tyrion Lannister. The Eyrie’s plump septon escorted him to the statue in the center of the garden, a weeping woman carved in veined white marble, no doubt meant to be Alyssa.
“The bad little man,” Lord Robert said, giggling. “Mother, can I make him fly? I want to see him fly.”
“Later, my sweet baby,” Lysa promised him.
“Trial first,” drawled Ser Lyn Corbray, “then execution.”
A moment later the two champions appeared from opposite sides of the garden. The knight was attended by two young squires, the sellsword by the Eyrie’s master-at-arms.
Ser Vardis Egen was steel from head to heel, encased in heavy plate armor over mail and padded surcoat. Large circular rondels, enameled cream-and-blue in the moon-and-falcon sigil of House Arryn, protected the vulnerable juncture of arm and breast. A skirt of lobstered metal covered him from waist to midthigh, while a solid gorget encircled his throat. Falcon’s wings sprouted from the temples of his helm, and his visor was a pointed metal beak with a narrow slit for vision.
Bronn was so lightly armored he looked almost naked beside the knight. He wore only a shirt of black oiled ringmail over boiled leather, a round steel halfhelm with a noseguard, and a mail coif. High leather boots with steel shinguards gave some protection to his legs, and discs of black iron were sewn into the fingers of his gloves. Yet Catelyn noted that the sellsword stood half a hand taller than his foe, with a longer reach … and Bronn was fifteen years younger, if she was any judge.
They knelt in the grass beneath the weeping woman, facing each other, with Lannister between them. The septon removed a faceted crystal sphere from the soft cloth bag at his waist. He lifted it high above his head, and the light shattered. Rainbows danced across the Imp’s face. In a high, solemn, singsong voice, the septon asked the gods to look down and bear witness, to find the truth in this man’s soul, to grant him life and freedom if he was innocent, death if he was guilty. His voice echoed off the surrounding towers.
When the last echo had died away, the septon lowered his crystal and made a hasty departure. Tyrion leaned over and whispered something in Bronn’s ear before the guardsmen led him away. The sellsword rose laughing and brushed a blade of grass from his knee.
Robert Arryn, Lord of the Eyrie and Defender of the Vale, was fidgeting impatiently in his elevated chair. “When are they going to fight?” he asked plaintively.
Ser Vardis was helped back to his feet by one of his squires. The other brought him a triangular shield almost four feet tall, heavy oak dotted with iron studs. They strapped it to his left forearm. When Lysa’s master-at-arms offered Bronn a similar shield, the sellsword spat and waved it away. Three days growth of coarse black beard covered his jaw and cheeks, but if he did not shave it was not for want of a razor; the edge of his sword had the dangerous glimmer of steel that had been honed every day for hours, until it was too sharp to touch.
Ser Vardis held out a gauntleted hand, and his squire placed a handsome double-edged longsword in his grasp. The blade was engraved with a delicate silver tracery of a mountain sky; its pommel was a falcon’s head, its crossguard fashioned into the shape of wings. “I had that sword crafted for Jon in King’s Landing,” Lysa told her guests proudly as they watched Ser Vardis try a practice cut. “He wore it whenever he sat the Iron Throne in King Robert’s place. Isn’t it a lovely thing? I thought it only fitting that our champion avenge Jon with his own blade.”
The engraved silver blade was beautiful beyond a doubt, but it seemed to Catelyn that Ser Vardis might have been more comfortable with his own sword. Yet she said nothing; she was weary of futile arguments with her sister.
“Make them fight!” Lord Robert called out.
Ser Vardis faced the Lord of the Eyrie and lifted his sword in salute. “For the Eyrie and the Vale!”
Tyrion Lannister had been seated on a balcony across the garden, flanked by his guards. It was to him that Bronn turned with a cursory salute.
“They await your command,” Lady Lysa said to her lord son.
“Fight!” the boy screamed, his arms trembling as they clutched at his chair.
Ser Vardis swiveled, bringing up his heavy shield. Bronn turned to face him. Their swords rang together, once, twice, a testing. The sellsword backed off a step. The knight came after, holding his shield before him. He tried a slash, but Bronn jerked back, just out of reach, and the silver blade cut only air. Bronn circled to his right. Ser Vardis turned to follow, keeping his shield between them. The knight pressed forward, placing each foot carefully on the uneven ground. The sellsword gave way, a faint smile playing over his lips. Ser Vardis attacked, slashing, but Bronn leapt away from him, hopping lightly over a low, moss-covered stone. Now the sellsword circled left, away from the shield, toward the knight’s unprotected side. Ser Vardis tried a hack at his legs, but he did not have the reach. Bronn danced farther to his left. Ser Vardis turned in place.
“The man is craven,” Lord Hunter declared. “Stand and fight, coward!” Other voices echoed the sentiment.
Catelyn looked to Ser Rodrik. Her master-at-arms gave a curt shake of his head. “He wants to make Ser Vardis chase him. The weight of armor and shield will tire even the strongest man.”
She had seen men practice at their swordplay near every day of her life, had viewed half a hundred tourneys in her time, but this was something different and deadlier: a dance where the smallest misstep meant death. And as she watched, the memory of another duel in another time came back to Catelyn Stark, as vivid as if it had been yesterday.
They met in the lower bailey of Riverrun. When Brandon saw that Petyr wore only helm and breastplate and mail, he took off most of his armor. Petyr had begged her for a favor he might wear, but she had turned him away. Her lord father promised her to Brandon Stark, and so it was to him that she gave her token, a pale blue handscarf she had embroidered with the leaping trout of Riverrun. As she pressed it into his hand, she pleaded with him. “He is only a foolish boy, but I have loved him like a brother. It would grieve me to see him die.” And her betrothed looked at her with the cool grey eyes of a Stark and promised to spare the boy who loved her.
That fight was over almost as soon as it began. Brandon was a man grown, and he drove Littlefinger all the way across the bailey and down the water stair, raining steel on him with every step, until the boy was staggering and bleeding from a dozen wounds. “Yield!” he called, more than once, but Petyr would only shake his head and fight on, grimly. When the river was lapping at their ankles, Brandon finally ended it, with a brutal backhand cut that bit through Petyr’s rings and leather into the soft flesh below the ribs, so deep that Catelyn was certain that the wound was mortal. He looked at her as he fell and murmured “Cat” as the bright blood came flowing out between his mailed fingers. She thought she had forgotten that.
That was the last time she had seen his face … until the day she was brought before him in King’s Landing.
A fortnight passed before Littlefinger was strong enough to leave Riverrun, but her lord father forbade her to visit him in the tower where he lay abed. Lysa helped their maester nurse him; she had been softer and shyer in those days. Edmure had called on him as well, but Petyr had sent him away. Her brother had acted as Brandon’s squire at the duel, and Littlefinger would not forgive that. As soon as he was strong enough to be moved, Lord Hoster Tully sent Petyr Baelish away in a closed litter, to finish his healing on the Fingers, upon the windswept jut of rock where he’d been born.
The ringing clash of steel on steel jarred Catelyn back to the present. Ser Vardis was coming hard at Bronn, driving into him with shield and sword. The sellsword scrambled backward, checking each blow, stepping lithely over rock and root, his eyes never leaving his foe. He was quicker, Catelyn saw; the knight’s silvered sword never came near to touching him, but his own ugly grey blade hacked a notch from Ser Vardis’s shoulder plate.
The brief flurry of fighting ended as swiftly as it had begun when Bronn sidestepped and slid behind the statue of the weeping woman. Ser Vardis lunged at where he had been, striking a spark off the pale marble of Alyssa’s thigh.
“They’re not fighting good, Mother,” the Lord of the Eyrie complained. “I want them to fight.”
“They will, sweet baby,” his mother soothed him. “The sellsword can’t run all day.”
Some of the lords on Lysa’s terrace were making wry jests as they refilled their wine cups, but across the garden, Tyrion Lannister’s mismatched eyes watched the champions dance as if there were nothing else in the world.
Bronn came out from behind the statue hard and fast, still moving left, aiming a two-handed cut at the knight’s unshielded right side. Ser Vardis blocked, but clumsily, and the sellsword’s blade flashed upward at his head. Metal rang, and a falcon’s wing collapsed with a crunch. Ser Vardis took a half step back to brace himself, raised his shield. Oak chips flew as Bronn’s sword hacked at the wooden wall. The sellsword stepped left again, away from the shield, and caught Ser Vardis across the stomach, the razor edge of his blade leaving a bright gash when it bit into the knight’s plate.
Ser Vardis drove forward off his back foot, his own silver blade descending in a savage arc. Bronn slammed it aside and danced away. The knight crashed into the weeping woman, rocking her on her plinth. Staggered, he stepped backward, his head turning this way and that as he searched for his foe. The slit visor of his helm narrowed his vision.
“Behind you, ser!” Lord Hunter shouted, too late. Bronn brought his sword down with both hands, catching Ser Vardis in the elbow of his sword arm. The thin lobstered metal that protected the joint crunched. The knight grunted, turning, wrenching his weapon up. This time Bronn stood his ground. The swords flew at each other, and their steel song filled the garden and rang off the white towers of the Eyrie.
“Ser Vardis is hurt,” Ser Rodrik said, his voice grave.
Catelyn did not need to be told; she had eyes, she could see the bright finger of blood running along the knight’s forearm, the wetness inside the elbow joint. Every parry was a little slower and a little lower than the one before. Ser Vardis turned his side to his foe, trying to use his shield to block instead, but Bronn slid around him, quick as a cat. The sellsword seemed to be getting stronger. His cuts were leaving their marks now. Deep shiny gashes gleamed all over the knight’s armor, on his right thigh, his beaked visor, crossing on his breastplate, a long one along the front of his gorget. The moon-and-falcon rondel over Ser Vardis’s right arm was sheared clean in half, hanging by its strap. They could hear his labored breath, rattling through the air holes in his visor.
Blind with arrogance as they were, even the knights and lords of the Vale could see what was happening below them, yet her sister could not. “Enough, Ser Vardis!” Lady Lysa called down. “Finish him now, my baby is growing tired.”
And it must be said of Ser Vardis Egen that he was true to his lady’s command, even to the last. One moment he was reeling backward, half-crouched behind his scarred shield; the next he charged. The sudden bull rush caught Bronn off balance. Ser Vardis crashed into him and slammed the lip of his shield into the sellsword’s face. Almost, almost, Bronn lost his feet … he staggered back, tripped over a rock, and caught hold of the weeping woman to keep his balance. Throwing aside his shield, Ser Vardis lurched after him, using both hands to raise his sword. His right arm was blood from elbow to fingers now, yet his last desperate blow would have opened Bronn from neck to navel … if the sellsword had stood to receive it.
But Bronn jerked back. Jon Arryn’s beautiful engraved silver sword glanced off the marble elbow of the weeping woman and snapped clean a third of the way up the blade. Bronn put his shoulder into the statue’s back. The weathered likeness of Alyssa Arryn tottered and fell with a great crash, and Ser Vardis Egen went down beneath her.
Bronn was on him in a heartbeat, kicking what was left of his shattered rondel aside to expose the weak spot between arm and breastplate. Ser Vardis was lying on his side, pinned beneath the broken torso of the weeping woman. Catelyn heard the knight groan as the sellsword lifted his blade with both hands and drove it down and in with all his weight behind it, under the arm and through the ribs. Ser Vardis Egen shuddered and lay still.
Silence hung over the Eyrie. Bronn yanked off his halfhelm and let it fall to the grass. His lip was smashed and bloody where the shield had caught him, and his coal-black hair was soaked with sweat. He spit out a broken tooth.
“Is it over, Mother?” the Lord of the Eyrie asked.
No, Catelyn wanted to tell him, it’s only now beginning.
“Yes,” Lysa said glumly, her voice as cold and dead as the captain of her guard.
“Can I make the little man fly now?”
Across the garden, Tyrion Lannister got to his feet. “Not this little man,” he said. “This little man is going down in the turnip hoist, thank you very much.”
“You presume—” Lysa began.
“I presume that House Arryn remembers its own words,” the Imp said. “As High as Honor.”
“You promised I could make him fly,” the Lord of the Eyrie screamed at his mother. He began to shake.
Lady Lysa’s face was flushed with fury. “The gods have seen fit to proclaim him innocent, child. We have no choice but to free him.” She lifted her voice. “Guards. Take my lord of Lannister and his … creature here out of my sight. Escort them to the Bloody Gate and set them free. See that they have horses and supplies sufficient to reach the Trident, and make certain all their goods and weapons are returned to them. They shall need them on the high road.”
“The high road,” Tyrion Lannister said. Lysa allowed herself a faint, satisfied smile. It was another sort of death sentence, Catelyn realized. Tyrion Lannister must know that as well. Yet the dwarf favored Lady Arryn with a mocking bow. “As you command, my lady,” he said. “I believe we know the way.”

It was too far to make out the banners clearly, but even through the drifting fog she could see that they were white, with a dark smudge in their center that could only be the direwolf of Stark, grey upon its icy field. When she saw it with her own eyes, Catelyn reined up her horse and bowed her head in thanks. The gods were good. She was not too late.
“They await our coming, my lady,” Ser Wylis Manderly said, “as my lord father swore they would.”
“Let us not keep them waiting any longer, ser.” Ser Brynden Tully put the spurs to his horse and trotted briskly toward the banners. Catelyn rode beside him.
Ser Wylis and his brother Ser Wendel followed, leading their levies, near fifteen hundred men: some twenty-odd knights and as many squires, two hundred mounted lances, swordsmen, and freeriders, and the rest foot, armed with spears, pikes and tridents. Lord Wyman had remained behind to see to the defenses of White Harbor. A man of near sixty years, he had grown too stout to sit a horse. “If I had thought to see war again in my lifetime, I should have eaten a few less eels,” he’d told Catelyn when he met her ship, slapping his massive belly with both hands. His fingers were fat as sausages. “My boys will see you safe to your son, though, have no fear.”
His “boys” were both older than Catelyn, and she might have wished that they did not take after their father quite so closely. Ser Wylis was only a few eels short of not being able to mount his own horse; she pitied the poor animal. Ser Wendel, the younger boy, would have been the fattest man she’d ever known, had she only neglected to meet his father and brother. Wylis was quiet and formal, Wendel loud and boisterous; both had ostentatious walrus mustaches and heads as bare as a baby’s bottom; neither seemed to own a single garment that was not spotted with food stains. Yet she liked them well enough; they had gotten her to Robb, as their father had vowed, and nothing else mattered.
She was pleased to see that her son had sent eyes out, even to the east. The Lannisters would come from the south when they came, but it was good that Robb was being careful. My son is leading a host to war, she thought, still only half believing it. She was desperately afraid for him, and for Winterfell, yet she could not deny feeling a certain pride as well. A year ago he had been a boy. What was he now? she wondered.
Outriders spied the Manderly banners—the white merman with trident in hand, rising from a blue-green sea—and hailed them warmly. They were led to a spot of high ground dry enough for a camp. Ser Wylis called a halt there, and remained behind with his men to see the fires laid and the horses tended, while his brother Wendel rode on with Catelyn and her uncle to present their father’s respects to their liege lord.
The ground under their horses’ hooves was soft and wet. It fell away slowly beneath them as they rode past smoky peat fires, lines of horses, and wagons heavy-laden with hardbread and salt beef. On a stony outcrop of land higher than the surrounding country, they passed a lord’s pavilion with walls of heavy sailcloth. Catelyn recognized the banner, the bull moose of the Hornwoods, brown on its dark orange field.
Just beyond, through the mists, she glimpsed the walls and towers of Moat Cailin … or what remained of them. Immense blocks of black basalt, each as large as a crofter’s cottage, lay scattered and tumbled like a child’s wooden blocks, half-sunk in the soft boggy soil. Nothing else remained of a curtain wall that had once stood as high as Winterfell’s. The wooden keep was gone entirely, rotted away a thousand years past, with not so much as a timber to mark where it had stood. All that was left of the great stronghold of the First Men were three towers … three where there had once been twenty, if the taletellers could be believed.
The Gatehouse Tower looked sound enough, and even boasted a few feet of standing wall to either side of it. The Drunkard’s Tower, off in the bog where the south and west walls had once met, leaned like a man about to spew a bellyful of wine into the gutter. And the tall, slender Children’s Tower, where legend said the children of the forest had once called upon their nameless gods to send the hammer of the waters, had lost half its crown. It looked as if some great beast had taken a bite out of the crenellations along the tower top, and spit the rubble across the bog. All three towers were green with moss. A tree was growing out between the stones on the north side of the Gatehouse Tower, its gnarled limbs festooned with ropy white blankets of ghostskin.
“Gods have mercy,” Ser Brynden exclaimed when he saw what lay before them. “This is Moat Cailin? It’s no more than a—”
“—death trap,” Catelyn finished. “I know how it looks, Uncle. I thought the same the first time I saw it, but Ned assured me that this ruin is more formidable than it seems. The three surviving towers command the causeway from all sides, and any enemy must pass between them. The bogs here are impenetrable, full of quicksands and suckholes and teeming with snakes. To assault any of the towers, an army would need to wade through waist-deep black muck, cross a moat full of lizard-lions, and scale walls slimy with moss, all the while exposing themselves to fire from archers in the other towers.” She gave her uncle a grim smile. “And when night falls, there are said to be ghosts, cold vengeful spirits of the north who hunger for southron blood.”
Ser Brynden chuckled. “Remind me not to linger here. Last I looked, I was southron myself.”
Standards had been raised atop all three towers. The Karstark sunburst hung from the Drunkard’s Tower, beneath the direwolf; on the Children’s Tower it was the Greatjon’s giant in shattered chains. But on the Gatehouse Tower, the Stark banner flew alone. That was where Robb had made his seat. Catelyn made for it, with Ser Brynden and Ser Wendel behind her, their horses stepping slowly down the log-and-plank road that had been laid across the green-and-black fields of mud.
She found her son surrounded by his father’s lords bannermen, in a drafty hall with a peat fire smoking in a black hearth. He was seated at a massive stone table, a pile of maps and papers in front of him, talking intently with Roose Bolton and the Greatjon. At first he did not notice her … but his wolf did. The great grey beast was lying near the fire, but when Catelyn entered he lifted his head, and his golden eyes met hers. The lords fell silent one by one, and Robb looked up at the sudden quiet and saw her. “Mother!” he said, his voice thick with emotion.
Catelyn wanted to run to him, to kiss his sweet brow, to wrap him in her arms and hold him so tightly that he would never come to harm … but here in front of his lords, she dared not. He was playing a man’s part now, and she would not take that away from him. So she held herself at the far end of the basalt slab they were using for a table. The direwolf got to his feet and padded across the room to where she stood. It seemed bigger than a wolf ought to be. “You’ve grown a beard,” she said to Robb, while Grey Wind sniffed her hand.
He rubbed his stubbled jaw, suddenly awkward. “Yes.” His chin hairs were redder than the ones on his head.
“I like it.” Catelyn stroked the wolf’s head, gently. “It makes you look like my brother Edmure.” Grey Wind nipped at her fingers, playful, and trotted back to his place by the fire.
Ser Helman Tallhart was the first to follow the direwolf across the room to pay his respects, kneeling before her and pressing his brow to her hand. “Lady Catelyn,” he said, “you are fair as ever, a welcome sight in troubled times.” The Glovers followed, Galbart and Robett, and Greatjon Umber, and the rest, one by one. Theon Greyjoy was the last. “I had not looked to see you here, my lady,” he said as he knelt.
“I had not thought to be here,” Catelyn said, “until I came ashore at White Harbor, and Lord Wyman told me that Robb had called the banners. You know his son, Ser Wendel,” Wendel Manderly stepped forward and bowed as low as his girth would allow. “And my uncle, Ser Brynden Tully, who has left my sister’s service for mine.”
“The Blackfish,” Robb said. “Thank you for joining us, ser. We need men of your courage. And you, Ser Wendel, I am glad to have you here. Is Ser Rodrik with you as well, Mother? I’ve missed him.”
“Ser Rodrik is on his way north from White Harbor. I have named him castellan and commanded him to hold Winterfell till our return. Maester Luwin is a wise counsellor, but unskilled in the arts of war.”
“Have no fear on that count, Lady Stark,” the Greatjon told her in his bass rumble. “Winterfell is safe. We’ll shove our swords up Tywin Lannister’s bunghole soon enough, begging your pardons, and then it’s on to the Red Keep to free Ned.”
“My lady, a question, as it please you.” Roose Bolton, Lord of the Dreadfort, had a small voice, yet when he spoke larger men quieted to listen. His eyes were curiously pale, almost without color, and his look disturbing. “It is said that you hold Lord Tywin’s dwarf son as captive. Have you brought him to us? I vow, we should make good use of such a hostage.”
“I did hold Tyrion Lannister, but no longer,” Catelyn was forced to admit. A chorus of consternation greeted the news. “I was no more pleased than you, my lords. The gods saw fit to free him, with some help from my fool of a sister.” She ought not to be so open in her contempt, she knew, but her parting from the Eyrie had not been pleasant. She had offered to take Lord Robert with her, to foster him at Winterfell for a few years. The company of other boys would do him good, she had dared to suggest. Lysa’s rage had been frightening to behold. “Sister or no,” she had replied, “if you try to steal my son, you will leave by the Moon Door.” After that there was no more to be said.
The lords were anxious to question her further, but Catelyn raised a hand. “No doubt we will have time for all this later, but my journey has fatigued me. I would speak with my son alone. I know you will forgive me, my lords.” She gave them no choice; led by the ever-obliging Lord Hornwood, the bannermen bowed and took their leave. “And you, Theon,” she added when Greyjoy lingered. He smiled and left them.
There was ale and cheese on the table. Catelyn filled a horn, sat, sipped, and studied her son. He seemed taller than when she’d left, and the wisps of beard did make him look older. “Edmure was sixteen when he grew his first whiskers.”
“I will be sixteen soon enough,” Robb said.
“And you are fifteen now. Fifteen, and leading a host to battle. Can you understand why I might fear, Robb?”
His look grew stubborn. “There was no one else.”
“No one?” she said. “Pray, who were those men I saw here a moment ago? Roose Bolton, Rickard Karstark, Galbart and Robett Glover, the Greatjon, Helman Tallhart … you might have given the command to any of them. Gods be good, you might even have sent Theon, though he would not be my choice.”
“They are not Starks,” he said.
“They are men, Robb, seasoned in battle. You were fighting with wooden swords less than a year past.”
She saw anger in his eyes at that, but it was gone as quick as it came, and suddenly he was a boy again. “I know,” he said, abashed. “Are you … are you sending me back to Winterfell?”
Catelyn sighed. “I should. You ought never have left. Yet I dare not, not now. You have come too far. Someday these lords will look to you as their liege. If I pack you off now, like a child being sent to bed without his supper, they will remember, and laugh about it in their cups. The day will come when you need them to respect you, even fear you a little. Laughter is poison to fear. I will not do that to you, much as I might wish to keep you safe.”
“You have my thanks, Mother,” he said, his relief obvious beneath the formality.
She reached across his table and touched his hair. “You are my firstborn, Robb. I have only to look at you to remember the day you came into the world, red-faced and squalling.”
He rose, clearly uncomfortable with her touch, and walked to the hearth. Grey Wind rubbed his head against his leg. “You know … about Father?”
“Yes.” The reports of Robert’s sudden death and Ned’s fall had frightened Catelyn more than she could say, but she would not let her son see her fear. “Lord Manderly told me when I landed at White Harbor. Have you had any word of your sisters?”
“There was a letter,” Robb said, scratching his direwolf under the jaw. “One for you as well, but it came to Winterfell with mine.” He went to the table, rummaged among some maps and papers, and returned with a crumpled parchment. “This is the one she wrote me, I never thought to bring yours.”
Something in Robb’s tone troubled her. She smoothed out the paper and read. Concern gave way to disbelief, then to anger, and lastly to fear. “This is Cersei’s letter, not your sister’s,” she said when she was done. “The real message is in what Sansa does not say. All this about how kindly and gently the Lannisters are treating her … I know the sound of a threat, even whispered. They have Sansa hostage, and they mean to keep her.”
“There’s no mention of Arya,” Robb pointed out, miserable.
“No.” Catelyn did not want to think what that might mean, not now, not here.
“I had hoped … if you still held the Imp, a trade of hostages …” He took Sansa’s letter and crumpled it in his fist, and she could tell from the way he did it that it was not the first time. “Is there word from the Eyrie? I wrote to Aunt Lysa, asking help. Has she called Lord Arryn’s banners, do you know? Will the knights of the Vale come join us?”
“Only one,” she said, “the best of them, my uncle … but Brynden Blackfish was a Tully first. My sister is not about to stir beyond her Bloody Gate.”
Robb took it hard. “Mother, what are we going to do? I brought this whole army together, eighteen thousand men, but I don’t … I’m not certain …” He looked to her, his eyes shining, the proud young lord melted away in an instant, and quick as that he was a child again, a fifteen-year-old boy looking to his mother for answers.
It would not do.
“What are you so afraid of, Robb?” she asked gently.
“I …” He turned his head away, to hide the first tear. “If we march … even if we win … the Lannisters hold Sansa, and Father. They’ll kill them, won’t they?”
“They want us to think so.”
“You mean they’re lying?”
“I do not know, Robb. What I do know is that you have no choice. If you go to King’s Landing and swear fealty, you will never be allowed to leave. If you turn your tail and retreat to Winterfell, your lords will lose all respect for you. Some may even go over to the Lannisters. Then the queen, with that much less to fear, can do as she likes with her prisoners. Our best hope, our only true hope, is that you can defeat the foe in the field. If you should chance to take Lord Tywin or the Kingslayer captive, why then a trade might very well be possible, but that is not the heart of it. So long as you have power enough that they must fear you, Ned and your sister should be safe. Cersei is wise enough to know that she may need them to make her peace, should the fighting go against her.”
“What if the fighting doesn’t go against her?” Robb asked. “What if it goes against us?”
Catelyn took his hand. “Robb, I will not soften the truth for you. If you lose, there is no hope for any of us. They say there is naught but stone at the heart of Casterly Rock. Remember the fate of Rhaegar’s children.”
She saw the fear in his young eyes then, but there was a strength as well. “Then I will not lose,” he vowed.
“Tell me what you know of the fighting in the riverlands,” she said. She had to learn if he was truly ready.
“Less than a fortnight past, they fought a battle in the hills below the Golden Tooth,” Robb said. “Uncle Edmure had sent Lord Vance and Lord Piper to hold the pass, but the Kingslayer descended on them and put them to flight. Lord Vance was slain. The last word we had was that Lord Piper was falling back to join your brother and his other bannermen at Riverrun, with Jaime Lannister on his heels. That’s not the worst of it, though. All the time they were battling in the pass, Lord Tywin was bringing a second Lannister army around from the south. It’s said to be even larger than Jaime’s host.
“Father must have known that, because he sent out some men to oppose them, under the king’s own banner. He gave the command to some southron lordling, Lord Erik or Derik or something like that, but Ser Raymun Darry rode with him, and the letter said there were other knights as well, and a force of Father’s own guardsmen. Only it was a trap. Lord Derik had no sooner crossed the Red Fork than the Lannisters fell upon him, the king’s banner be damned, and Gregor Clegane took them in the rear as they tried to pull back across the Mummer’s Ford. This Lord Derik and a few others may have escaped, no one is certain, but Ser Raymun was killed, and most of our men from Winterfell. Lord Tywin has closed off the kingsroad, it’s said, and now he’s marching north toward Harrenhal, burning as he goes.”
Grim and grimmer, thought Catelyn. It was worse than she’d imagined. “You mean to meet him here?” she asked.
“If he comes so far, but no one thinks he will,” Robb said. “I’ve sent word to Howland Reed, Father’s old friend at Greywater Watch. If the Lannisters come up the Neck, the crannogmen will bleed them every step of the way, but Galbart Glover says Lord Tywin is too smart for that, and Roose Bolton agrees. He’ll stay close to the Trident, they believe, taking the castles of the river lords one by one, until Riverrun stands alone. We need to march south to meet him.”
The very idea of it chilled Catelyn to the bone. What chance would a fifteen-year-old boy have against seasoned battle commanders like Jaime and Tywin Lannister? “Is that wise? You are strongly placed here. It’s said that the old Kings in the North could stand at Moat Cailin and throw back hosts ten times the size of their own.”
“Yes, but our food and supplies are running low, and this is not land we can live off easily. We’ve been waiting for Lord Manderly, but now that his sons have joined us, we need to march.”
She was hearing the lords bannermen speaking with her son’s voice, she realized. Over the years, she had hosted many of them at Winterfell, and been welcomed with Ned to their own hearths and tables. She knew what sorts of men they were, each one. She wondered if Robb did.
And yet there was sense in what they said. This host her son had assembled was not a standing army such as the Free Cities were accustomed to maintain, nor a force of guardsmen paid in coin. Most of them were smallfolk: crofters, fieldhands, fishermen, sheepherders, the sons of innkeeps and traders and tanners, leavened with a smattering of sellswords and freeriders hungry for plunder. When their lords called, they came … but not forever. “Marching is all very well,” she said to her son, “but where, and to what purpose? What do you mean to do?”
Robb hesitated. “The Greatjon thinks we should take the battle to Lord Tywin and surprise him,” he said, “but the Glovers and the Karstarks feel we’d be wiser to go around his army and join up with Uncle Ser Edmure against the Kingslayer.” He ran his fingers through his shaggy mane of auburn hair, looking unhappy. “Though by the time we reach Riverrun … I’m not certain …”
“Be certain,” Catelyn told her son, “or go home and take up that wooden sword again. You cannot afford to seem indecisive in front of men like Roose Bolton and Rickard Karstark. Make no mistake, Robb—these are your bannermen, not your friends. You named yourself battle commander. Command.”
Her son looked at her, startled, as if he could not credit what he was hearing. “As you say, Mother.”
“I’ll ask you again. What do you mean to do?”
Robb drew a map across the table, a ragged piece of old leather covered with lines of faded paint. One end curled up from being rolled; he weighed it down with his dagger. “Both plans have virtues, but … look, if we try to swing around Lord Tywin’s host, we take the risk of being caught between him and the Kingslayer, and if we attack him … by all reports, he has more men than I do, and a lot more armored horse. The Greatjon says that won’t matter if we catch him with his breeches down, but it seems to me that a man who has fought as many battles as Tywin Lannister won’t be so easily surprised.”
“Good,” she said. She could hear echoes of Ned in his voice, as he sat there, puzzling over the map. “Tell me more.”
“I’d leave a small force here to hold Moat Cailin, archers mostly, and march the rest down the causeway,” he said, “but once we’re below the Neck, I’d split our host in two. The foot can continue down the kingsroad, while our horsemen cross the Green Fork at the Twins.” He pointed. “When Lord Tywin gets word that we’ve come south, he’ll march north to engage our main host, leaving our riders free to hurry down the west bank to Riverrun.” Robb sat back, not quite daring to smile, but pleased with himself and hungry for her praise.
Catelyn frowned down at the map. “You’d put a river between the two parts of your army.”
“And between Jaime and Lord Tywin,” he said eagerly. The smile came at last. “There’s no crossing on the Green Fork above the ruby ford, where Robert won his crown. Not until the Twins, all the way up here, and Lord Frey controls that bridge. He’s your father’s bannerman, isn’t that so?”
The Late Lord Frey, Catelyn thought. “He is,” she admitted, “but my father has never trusted him. Nor should you.”
“I won’t,” Robb promised. “What do you think?”
She was impressed despite herself. He looks like a Tully, she thought, yet he’s still his father’s son, and Ned taught him well. “Which force would you command?”
“The horse,” he answered at once. Again like his father; Ned would always take the more dangerous task himself.
“And the other?”
“The Greatjon is always saying that we should smash Lord Tywin. I thought I’d give him the honor.”
It was his first misstep, but how to make him see it without wounding his fledgling confidence? “Your father once told me that the Greatjon was as fearless as any man he had ever known.”
Robb grinned. “Grey Wind ate two of his fingers, and he laughed about it. So you agree, then?”
“Your father is not fearless,” Catelyn pointed out. “He is brave, but that is very different.”
Her son considered that for a moment. “The eastern host will be all that stands between Lord Tywin and Winterfell,” he said thoughtfully. “Well, them and whatever few bowmen I leave here at the Moat. So I don’t want someone fearless, do I?”
“No. You want cold cunning, I should think, not courage.”
“Roose Bolton,” Robb said at once. “That man scares me.”
“Then let us pray he will scare Tywin Lannister as well.”
Robb nodded and rolled up the map. “I’ll give the commands, and assemble an escort to take you home to Winterfell.”
Catelyn had fought to keep herself strong, for Ned’s sake and for this stubborn brave son of theirs. She had put despair and fear aside, as if they were garments she did not choose to wear … but now she saw that she had donned them after all.
“I am not going to Winterfell,” she heard herself say, surprised at the sudden rush of tears that blurred her vision. “My father may be dying behind the walls of Riverrun. My brother is surrounded by foes. I must go to them.”

As the host trooped down the causeway through the black bogs of the Neck and spilled out into the riverlands beyond, Catelyn’s apprehensions grew. She masked her fears behind a face kept still and stern, yet they were there all the same, growing with every league they crossed. Her days were anxious, her nights restless, and every raven that flew overhead made her clench her teeth.
She feared for her lord father, and wondered at his ominous silence. She feared for her brother Edmure, and prayed that the gods would watch over him if he must face the Kingslayer in battle. She feared for Ned and her girls, and for the sweet sons she had left behind at Winterfell. And yet there was nothing she could do for any of them, and so she made herself put all thought of them aside. You must save your strength for Robb, she told herself. He is the only one you can help. You must be as fierce and hard as the north, Catelyn Tully. You must be a Stark for true now, like your son.
Robb rode at the front of the column, beneath the flapping white banner of Winterfell. Each day he would ask one of his lords to join him, so they might confer as they marched; he honored every man in turn, showing no favorites, listening as his lord father had listened, weighing the words of one against the other. He has learned so much from Ned, she thought as she watched him, but has he learned enough?
The Blackfish had taken a hundred picked men and a hundred swift horses and raced ahead to screen their movements and scout the way. The reports Ser Brynden’s riders brought back did little to reassure her. Lord Tywin’s host was still many days to the south … but Walder Frey, Lord of the Crossing, had assembled a force of near four thousand men at his castles on the Green Fork.
“Late again,” Catelyn murmured when she heard. It was the Trident all over, damn the man. Her brother Edmure had called the banners; by rights, Lord Frey should have gone to join the Tully host at Riverrun, yet here he sat.
“Four thousand men,” Robb repeated, more perplexed than angry. “Lord Frey cannot hope to fight the Lannisters by himself. Surely he means to join his power to ours.”
“Does he?” Catelyn asked. She had ridden forward to join Robb and Robett Glover, his companion of the day. The vanguard spread out behind them, a slow-moving forest of lances and banners and spears. “I wonder. Expect nothing of Walder Frey, and you will never be surprised.”
“He’s your father’s bannerman.”
“Some men take their oaths more seriously than others, Robb. And Lord Walder was always friendlier with Casterly Rock than my father would have liked. One of his sons is wed to Tywin Lannister’s sister. That means little of itself, to be sure. Lord Walder has sired a great many children over the years, and they must needs marry someone. Still …”
“Do you think he means to betray us to the Lannisters, my lady?” Robett Glover asked gravely.
Catelyn sighed. “If truth be told, I doubt even Lord Frey knows what Lord Frey intends to do. He has an old man’s caution and a young man’s ambition, and has never lacked for cunning.”
“We must have the Twins, Mother,” Robb said heatedly. “There is no other way across the river. You know that.”
“Yes. And so does Walder Frey, you can be sure of that.”
That night they made camp on the southern edge of the bogs, halfway between the kingsroad and the river. It was there Theon Greyjoy brought them further word from her uncle. “Ser Brynden says to tell you he’s crossed swords with the Lannisters. There are a dozen scouts who won’t be reporting back to Lord Tywin anytime soon. Or ever.” He grinned. “Ser Addam Marbrand commands their outriders, and he’s pulling back south, burning as he goes. He knows where we are, more or less, but the Blackfish vows he will not know when we split.”
“Unless Lord Frey tells him,” Catelyn said sharply. “Theon, when you return to my uncle, tell him he is to place his best bowmen around the Twins, day and night, with orders to bring down any raven they see leaving the battlements. I want no birds bringing word of my son’s movements to Lord Tywin.”
“Ser Brynden has seen to it already, my lady,” Theon replied with a cocky smile. “A few more blackbirds, and we should have enough to bake a pie. I’ll save you their feathers for a hat.”
She ought to have known that Brynden Blackfish would be well ahead of her. “What have the Freys been doing while the Lannisters burn their fields and plunder their holdfasts?”
“There’s been some fighting between Ser Addam’s men and Lord Walder’s,” Theon answered. “Not a day’s ride from here, we found two Lannister scouts feeding the crows where the Freys had strung them up. Most of Lord Walder’s strength remains massed at the Twins, though.”
That bore Walder Frey’s seal beyond a doubt, Catelyn thought bitterly; hold back, wait, watch, take no risk unless forced to it.
“If he’s been fighting the Lannisters, perhaps he does mean to hold to his vows,” Robb said.
Catelyn was less encouraged. “Defending his own lands is one thing, open battle against Lord Tywin quite another.”
Robb turned back to Theon Greyjoy. “Has the Blackfish found any other way across the Green Fork?”
Theon shook his head. “The river’s running high and fast. Ser Brynden says it can’t be forded, not this far north.”
“I must have that crossing!” Robb declared, fuming. “Oh, our horses might be able to swim the river, I suppose, but not with armored men on their backs. We’d need to build rafts to pole our steel across, helms and mail and lances, and we don’t have the trees for that. Or the time. Lord Tywin is marching north …” He balled his hand into a fist.
“Lord Frey would be a fool to try and bar our way,” Theon Greyjoy said with his customary easy confidence. “We have five times his numbers. You can take the Twins if you need to, Robb.”
“Not easily,” Catelyn warned them, “and not in time. While you were mounting your siege, Tywin Lannister would bring up his host and assault you from the rear.”
Robb glanced from her to Greyjoy, searching for an answer and finding none. For a moment he looked even younger than his fifteen years, despite his mail and sword and the stubble on his cheeks. “What would my lord father do?” he asked her.
“Find a way across,” she told him. “Whatever it took.”
The next morning it was Ser Brynden Tully himself who rode back to them. He had put aside the heavy plate and helm he’d worn as the Knight of the Gate for the lighter leather-and-mail of an outrider, but his obsidian fish still fastened his cloak.
Her uncle’s face was grave as he swung down off his horse. “There has been a battle under the walls of Riverrun,” he said, his mouth grim. “We had it from a Lannister outrider we took captive. The Kingslayer has destroyed Edmure’s host and sent the lords of the Trident reeling in flight.”
A cold hand clutched at Catelyn’s heart. “And my brother?”
“Wounded and taken prisoner,” Ser Brynden said. “Lord Blackwood and the other survivors are under siege inside Riverrun, surrounded by Jaime’s host.”
Robb looked fretful. “We must get across this accursed river if we’re to have any hope of relieving them in time.”
“That will not be easily done,” her uncle cautioned. “Lord Frey has pulled his whole strength back inside his castles, and his gates are closed and barred.”
“Damn the man,” Robb swore. “If the old fool does not relent and let me cross, he’ll leave me no choice but to storm his walls. I’ll pull the Twins down around his ears if I have to, we’ll see how well he likes that!”
“You sound like a sulky boy, Robb,” Catelyn said sharply. “A child sees an obstacle, and his first thought is to run around it or knock it down. A lord must learn that sometimes words can accomplish what swords cannot.”
Robb’s neck reddened at the rebuke. “Tell me what you mean, Mother,” he said meekly.
“The Freys have held the crossing for six hundred years, and for six hundred years they have never failed to exact their toll.”
“What toll? What does he want?”
She smiled. “That is what we must discover.”
“And what if I do not choose to pay this toll?”
“Then you had best retreat back to Moat Cailin, deploy to meet Lord Tywin in battle … or grow wings. I see no other choices.” Catelyn put her heels to her horse and rode off, leaving her son to ponder her words. It would not do to make him feel as if his mother were usurping his place. Did you teach him wisdom as well as valor, Ned? she wondered. Did you teach him how to kneel? The graveyards of the Seven Kingdoms were full of brave men who had never learned that lesson.
It was near midday when their vanguard came in sight of the Twins, where the Lords of the Crossing had their seat.
The Green Fork ran swift and deep here, but the Freys had spanned it many centuries past and grown rich off the coin men paid them to cross. Their bridge was a massive arch of smooth grey rock, wide enough for two wagons to pass abreast; the Water Tower rose from the center of the span, commanding both road and river with its arrow slits, murder holes, and portcullises. It had taken the Freys three generations to complete their bridge; when they were done they’d thrown up stout timber keeps on either bank, so no one might cross without their leave.
The timber had long since given way to stone. The Twins—two squat, ugly, formidable castles, identical in every respect, with the bridge arching between—had guarded the crossing for centuries. High curtain walls, deep moats, and heavy oak-and-iron gates protected the approaches, the bridge footings rose from within stout inner keeps, there was a barbican and portcullis on either bank, and the Water Tower defended the span itself.
One glance was sufficient to tell Catelyn that the castle would not be taken by storm. The battlements bristled with spears and swords and scorpions, there was an archer at every crenel and arrow slit, the drawbridge was up, the portcullis down, the gates closed and barred.
The Greatjon began to curse and swear as soon as he saw what awaited them. Lord Rickard Karstark glowered in silence. “That cannot be assaulted, my lords,” Roose Bolton announced.
“Nor can we take it by siege, without an army on the far bank to invest the other castle,” Helman Tallhart said gloomily. Across the deep-running green waters, the western twin stood like a reflection of its eastern brother. “Even if we had the time. Which, to be sure, we do not.”
As the northern lords studied the castle, a sally port opened, a plank bridge slid across the moat, and a dozen knights rode forth to confront them, led by four of Lord Walder’s many sons. Their banner bore twin towers, dark blue on a field of pale silver-grey. Ser Stevron Frey, Lord Walder’s heir, spoke for them. The Freys all looked like weasels; Ser Stevron, past sixty with grandchildren of his own, looked like an especially old and tired weasel, yet he was polite enough. “My lord father has sent me to greet you, and inquire as to who leads this mighty host.”
“I do.” Robb spurred his horse forward. He was in his armor, with the direwolf shield of Winterfell strapped to his saddle and Grey Wind padding by his side.
The old knight looked at her son with a faint flicker of amusement in his watery grey eyes, though his gelding whickered uneasily and sidled away from the direwolf. “My lord father would be most honored if you would share meat and mead with him in the castle and explain your purpose here.”
His words crashed among the lords bannermen like a great stone from a catapult. Not one of them approved. They cursed, argued, shouted down each other.
“You must not do this, my lord,” Galbart Glover pleaded with Robb. “Lord Walder is not to be trusted.”
Roose Bolton nodded. “Go in there alone and you’re his. He can sell you to the Lannisters, throw you in a dungeon, or slit your throat, as he likes.”
“If he wants to talk to us, let him open his gates, and we will all share his meat and mead,” declared Ser Wendel Manderly.
“Or let him come out and treat with Robb here, in plain sight of his men and ours,” suggested his brother, Ser Wylis.
Catelyn Stark shared all their doubts, but she had only to glance at Ser Stevron to see that he was not pleased by what he was hearing. A few more words and the chance would be lost. She had to act, and quickly. “I will go,” she said loudly.
“You, my lady?” The Greatjon furrowed his brow.
“Mother, are you certain?” Clearly, Robb was not.
“Never more,” Catelyn lied glibly. “Lord Walder is my father’s bannerman. I have known him since I was a girl. He would never offer me any harm.” Unless he saw some profit in it, she added silently, but some truths did not bear saying, and some lies were necessary.
“I am certain my lord father would be pleased to speak to the Lady Catelyn,” Ser Stevron said. “To vouchsafe for our good intentions, my brother Ser Perwyn will remain here until she is safely returned to you.”
“He shall be our honored guest,” said Robb. Ser Perwyn, the youngest of the four Freys in the party, dismounted and handed the reins of his horse to a brother. “I require my lady mother’s return by evenfall, Ser Stevron,” Robb went on. “It is not my intent to linger here long.”
Ser Stevron Frey gave a polite nod. “As you say, my lord.” Catelyn spurred her horse forward and did not look back. Lord Walder’s sons and envoys fell in around her.
Her father had once said of Walder Frey that he was the only lord in the Seven Kingdoms who could field an army out of his breeches. When the Lord of the Crossing welcomed Catelyn in the great hall of the east castle, surrounded by twenty living sons (minus Ser Perwyn, who would have made twenty-one), thirty-six grandsons, nineteen great-grandsons, and numerous daughters, granddaughters, bastards, and grandbastards, she understood just what he had meant.
Lord Walder was ninety, a wizened pink weasel with a bald spotted head, too gouty to stand unassisted. His newest wife, a pale frail girl of sixteen years, walked beside his litter when they carried him in. She was the eighth Lady Frey.
“It is a great pleasure to see you again after so many years, my lord,” Catelyn said.
The old man squinted at her suspiciously. “Is it? I doubt that. Spare me your sweet words, Lady Catelyn, I am too old. Why are you here? Is your boy too proud to come before me himself? What am I to do with you?”
Catelyn had been a girl the last time she had visited the Twins, but even then Lord Walder had been irascible, sharp of tongue, and blunt of manner. Age had made him worse than ever, it would seem. She would need to choose her words with care, and do her best to take no offense from his.
“Father,” Ser Stevron said reproachfully, “you forget yourself. Lady Stark is here at your invitation.”
“Did I ask you? You are not Lord Frey yet, not until I die. Do I look dead? I’ll hear no instructions from you.”
“This is no way to speak in front of our noble guest, Father,” one of his younger sons said.
“Now my bastards presume to teach me courtesy,” Lord Walder complained. “I’ll speak any way I like, damn you. I’ve had three kings to guest in my life, and queens as well, do you think I require lessons from the likes of you, Ryger? Your mother was milking goats the first time I gave her my seed.” He dismissed the red-faced youth with a flick of his fingers and gestured to two of his other sons. “Danwell, Whalen, help me to my chair.”
They shifted Lord Walder from his litter and carried him to the high seat of the Freys, a tall chair of black oak whose back was carved in the shape of two towers linked by a bridge. His young wife crept up timidly and covered his legs with a blanket. When he was settled, the old man beckoned Catelyn forward and planted a papery dry kiss on her hand. “There,” he announced. “Now that I have observed the courtesies, my lady, perhaps my sons will do me the honor of shutting their mouths. Why are you here?”
“To ask you to open your gates, my lord,” Catelyn replied politely. “My son and his lords bannermen are most anxious to cross the river and be on their way.”
“To Riverrun?” He sniggered. “Oh, no need to tell me, no need. I’m not blind yet. The old man can still read a map.”
“To Riverrun,” Catelyn confirmed. She saw no reason to deny it. “Where I might have expected to find you, my lord. You are still my father’s bannerman, are you not?”
“Heh,” said Lord Walder, a noise halfway between a laugh and a grunt. “I called my swords, yes I did, here they are, you saw them on the walls. It was my intent to march as soon as all my strength was assembled. Well, to send my sons. I am well past marching myself, Lady Catelyn.” He looked around for likely confirmation and pointed to a tall, stooped man of fifty years. “Tell her, Jared. Tell her that was my intent.”
“It was, my lady,” said Ser Jared Frey, one of his sons by his second wife. “On my honor.”
“Is it my fault that your fool brother lost his battle before we could march?” He leaned back against his cushions and scowled at her, as if challenging her to dispute his version of events. “I am told the Kingslayer went through him like an axe through ripe cheese. Why should my boys hurry south to die? All those who did go south are running north again.”
Catelyn would gladly have spitted the querulous old man and roasted him over a fire, but she had only till evenfall to open the bridge. Calmly, she said, “All the more reason that we must reach Riverrun, and soon. Where can we go to talk, my lord?”
“We’re talking now,” Lord Frey complained. The spotted pink head snapped around. “What are you all looking at?” he shouted at his kin. “Get out of here. Lady Stark wants to speak to me in private. Might be she has designs on my fidelity, heh. Go, all of you, find something useful to do. Yes, you too, woman. Out, out, out.” As his sons and grandsons and daughters and bastards and nieces and nephews streamed from the hall, he leaned close to Catelyn and confessed, “They’re all waiting for me to die. Stevron’s been waiting for forty years, but I keep disappointing him. Heh. Why should I die just so he can be a lord? I ask you. I won’t do it.”
“I have every hope that you will live to be a hundred.”
“That would boil them, to be sure. Oh, to be sure. Now, what do you want to say?”
“We want to cross,” Catelyn told him.
“Oh, do you? That’s blunt. Why should I let you?”
For a moment her anger flared. “If you were strong enough to climb your own battlements, Lord Frey, you would see that my son has twenty thousand men outside your walls.”
“They’ll be twenty thousand fresh corpses when Lord Tywin gets here,” the old man shot back. “Don’t you try and frighten me, my lady. Your husband’s in some traitor’s cell under the Red Keep, your father’s sick, might be dying, and Jaime Lannister’s got your brother in chains. What do you have that I should fear? That son of yours? I’ll match you son for son, and I’ll still have eighteen when yours are all dead.”
“You swore an oath to my father,” Catelyn reminded him.
He bobbed his head side to side, smiling. “Oh, yes, I said some words, but I swore oaths to the crown too, it seems to me. Joffrey’s the king now, and that makes you and your boy and all those fools out there no better than rebels. If I had the sense the gods gave a fish, I’d help the Lannisters boil you all.”
“Why don’t you?” she challenged him.
Lord Walder snorted with disdain. “Lord Tywin the proud and splendid, Warden of the West, Hand of the King, oh, what a great man that one is, him and his gold this and gold that and lions here and lions there. I’ll wager you, he eats too many beans, he breaks wind just like me, but you’ll never hear him admit it, oh, no. What’s he got to be so puffed up about anyway? Only two sons, and one of them’s a twisted little monster. I’ll match him son for son, and I’ll still have nineteen and a half left when all of his are dead!” He cackled. “If Lord Tywin wants my help, he can bloody well ask for it.”
That was all Catelyn needed to hear. “I am asking for your help, my lord,” she said humbly. “And my father and my brother and my lord husband and my sons are asking with my voice.”
Lord Walder jabbed a bony finger at her face. “Save your sweet words, my lady. Sweet words I get from my wife. Did you see her? Sixteen she is, a little flower, and her honey’s only for me. I wager she gives me a son by this time next year. Perhaps I’ll make him heir, wouldn’t that boil the rest of them?”
“I’m certain she will give you many sons.”
His head bobbed up and down. “Your lord father did not come to the wedding. An insult, as I see it. Even if he is dying. He never came to my last wedding either. He calls me the Late Lord Frey, you know. Does he think I’m dead? I’m not dead, and I promise you, I’ll outlive him as I outlived his father. Your family has always pissed on me, don’t deny it, don’t lie, you know it’s true. Years ago, I went to your father and suggested a match between his son and my daughter. Why not? I had a daughter in mind, sweet girl, only a few years older than Edmure, but if your brother didn’t warm to her, I had others he might have had, young ones, old ones, virgins, widows, whatever he wanted. No, Lord Hoster would not hear of it. Sweet words he gave me, excuses, but what I wanted was to get rid of a daughter.
“And your sister, that one, she’s full as bad. It was, oh, a year ago, no more, Jon Arryn was still the King’s Hand, and I went to the city to see my sons ride in the tourney. Stevron and Jared are too old for the lists now, but Danwell and Hosteen rode, Perwyn as well, and a couple of my bastards tried the melee. If I’d known how they’d shame me, I would never have troubled myself to make the journey. Why did I need to ride all that way to see Hosteen knocked off his horse by that Tyrell whelp? I ask you. The boy’s half his age, Ser Daisy they call him, something like that. And Danwell was unhorsed by a hedge knight! Some days I wonder if those two are truly mine. My third wife was a Crakehall, all of the Crakehall women are sluts. Well, never mind about that, she died before you were born, what do you care?
“I was speaking of your sister. I proposed that Lord and Lady Arryn foster two of my grandsons at court, and offered to take their own son to ward here at the Twins. Are my grandsons unworthy to be seen at the king’s court? They are sweet boys, quiet and mannerly. Walder is Merrett’s son, named after me, and the other one … heh, I don’t recall … he might have been another Walder, they’re always naming them Walder so I’ll favor them, but his father … which one was his father now?” His face wrinkled up. “Well, whoever he was, Lord Arryn wouldn’t have him, or the other one, and I blame your lady sister for that. She frosted up as if I’d suggested selling her boy to a mummer’s show or making a eunuch out of him, and when Lord Arryn said the child was going to Dragonstone to foster with Stannis Baratheon, she stormed off without a word of regrets and all the Hand could give me was apologies. What good are apologies? I ask you.”
Catelyn frowned, disquieted. “I had understood that Lysa’s boy was to be fostered with Lord Tywin at Casterly Rock.”
“No, it was Lord Stannis,” Walder Frey said irritably. “Do you think I can’t tell Lord Stannis from Lord Tywin? They’re both bungholes who think they’re too noble to shit, but never mind about that, I know the difference. Or do you think I’m so old I can’t remember? I’m ninety and I remember very well. I remember what to do with a woman too. That wife of mine will give me a son before this time next year, I’ll wager. Or a daughter, that can’t be helped. Boy or girl, it will be red, wrinkled, and squalling, and like as not she’ll want to name it Walder or Walda.”
Catelyn was not concerned with what Lady Frey might choose to name her child. “Jon Arryn was going to foster his son with Lord Stannis, you are quite certain of that?”
“Yes, yes, yes,” the old man said. “Only he died, so what does it matter? You say you want to cross the river?”
“We do.”
“Well, you can’t!” Lord Walder announced crisply. “Not unless I allow it, and why should I? The Tullys and the Starks have never been friends of mine.” He pushed himself back in his chair and crossed his arms, smirking, waiting for her answer.
The rest was only haggling.
A swollen red sun hung low against the western hills when the gates of the castle opened. The drawbridge creaked down, the portcullis winched up, and Lady Catelyn Stark rode forth to rejoin her son and his lords bannermen. Behind her came Ser Jared Frey, Ser Hosteen Frey, Ser Danwell Frey, and Lord Walder’s bastard son Ronel Rivers, leading a long column of pikemen, rank on rank of shuffling men in blue steel ringmail and silvery grey cloaks.
Robb galloped out to meet her, with Grey Wind racing beside his stallion. “It’s done,” she told him. “Lord Walder will grant you your crossing. His swords are yours as well, less four hundred he means to keep back to hold the Twins. I suggest that you leave four hundred of your own, a mixed force of archers and swordsmen. He can scarcely object to an offer to augment his garrison … but make certain you give the command to a man you can trust. Lord Walder may need help keeping faith.”
“As you say, Mother,” Robb answered, gazing at the ranks of pikemen. “Perhaps … Ser Helman Tallhart, do you think?”
“A fine choice.”
“What … what did he want of us?”
“If you can spare a few of your swords, I need some men to escort two of Lord Frey’s grandsons north to Winterfell,” she told him. “I have agreed to take them as wards. They are young boys, aged eight years and seven. It would seem they are both named Walder. Your brother Bran will welcome the companionship of lads near his own age, I should think.”
“Is that all? Two fosterlings? That’s a small enough price to—”
“Lord Frey’s son Olyvar will be coming with us,” she went on. “He is to serve as your personal squire. His father would like to see him knighted, in good time.”
“A squire.” He shrugged. “Fine, that’s fine, if he’s—”
“Also, if your sister Arya is returned to us safely, it is agreed that she will marry Lord Walder’s youngest son, Elmar, when the two of them come of age.”
Robb looked nonplussed. “Arya won’t like that one bit.”
“And you are to wed one of his daughters, once the fighting is done,” she finished. “His lordship has graciously consented to allow you to choose whichever girl you prefer. He has a number he thinks might be suitable.”
To his credit, Robb did not flinch. “I see.”
“Do you consent?”
“Can I refuse?”
“Not if you wish to cross.”
“I consent,” Robb said solemnly. He had never seemed more manly to her than he did in that moment. Boys might play with swords, but it took a lord to make a marriage pact, knowing what it meant.
They crossed at evenfall as a horned moon floated upon the river. The double column wound its way through the gate of the eastern twin like a great steel snake, slithering across the courtyard, into the keep and over the bridge, to issue forth once more from the second castle on the west bank.
Catelyn rode at the head of the serpent, with her son and her uncle Ser Brynden and Ser Stevron Frey. Behind followed nine tenths of their horse; knights, lancers, freeriders, and mounted bowmen. It took hours for them all to cross. Afterward, Catelyn would remember the clatter of countless hooves on the drawbridge, the sight of Lord Walder Frey in his litter watching them pass, the glitter of eyes peering down through the slats of the murder holes in the ceiling as they rode through the Water Tower.
The larger part of the northern host, pikes and archers and great masses of men-at-arms on foot, remained upon the east bank under the command of Roose Bolton. Robb had commanded him to continue the march south, to confront the huge Lannister army coming north under Lord Tywin.
For good or ill, her son had thrown the dice.

The woods were full of whispers.
Moonlight winked on the tumbling waters of the stream below as it wound its rocky way along the floor of the valley. Beneath the trees, warhorses whickered softly and pawed at the moist, leafy ground, while men made nervous jests in hushed voices. Now and again, she heard the chink of spears, the faint metallic slither of chain mail, but even those sounds were muffled.
“It should not be long now, my lady,” Hallis Mollen said. He had asked for the honor of protecting her in the battle to come; it was his right, as Winterfell’s captain of guards, and Robb had not refused it to him. She had thirty men around her, charged to keep her unharmed and see her safely home to Winterfell if the fighting went against them. Robb had wanted fifty; Catelyn had insisted that ten would be enough, that he would need every sword for the fight. They made their peace at thirty, neither happy with it.
“It will come when it comes,” Catelyn told him. When it came, she knew it would mean death. Hal’s death perhaps … or hers, or Robb’s. No one was safe. No life was certain. Catelyn was content to wait, to listen to the whispers in the woods and the faint music of the brook, to feel the warm wind in her hair.
She was no stranger to waiting, after all. Her men had always made her wait. “Watch for me, little cat,” her father would always tell her, when he rode off to court or fair or battle. And she would, standing patiently on the battlements of Riverrun as the waters of the Red Fork and the Tumblestone flowed by. He did not always come when he said he would, and days would ofttimes pass as Catelyn stood her vigil, peering out between crenels and through arrow loops until she caught a glimpse of Lord Hoster on his old brown gelding, trotting along the river-shore toward the landing. “Did you watch for me?” he’d ask when he bent to hug her. “Did you, little cat?”
Brandon Stark had bid her wait as well. “I shall not be long, my lady,” he had vowed. “We will be wed on my return.” Yet when the day came at last, it was his brother Eddard who stood beside her in the sept.
Ned had lingered scarcely a fortnight with his new bride before he too had ridden off to war with promises on his lips. At least he had left her with more than words; he had given her a son. Nine moons had waxed and waned, and Robb had been born in Riverrun while his father still warred in the south. She had brought him forth in blood and pain, not knowing whether Ned would ever see him. Her son. He had been so small …
And now it was for Robb that she waited … for Robb, and for Jaime Lannister, the gilded knight who men said had never learned to wait at all. “The Kingslayer is restless, and quick to anger,” her uncle Brynden had told Robb. And he had wagered their lives and their best hope of victory on the truth of what he said.
If Robb was frightened, he gave no sign of it. Catelyn watched her son as he moved among the men, touching one on the shoulder, sharing a jest with another, helping a third to gentle an anxious horse. His armor clinked softly when he moved. Only his head was bare. Catelyn watched a breeze stir his auburn hair, so like her own, and wondered when her son had grown so big. Fifteen, and near as tall as she was.
Let him grow taller, she asked the gods. Let him know sixteen, and twenty, and fifty. Let him grow as tall as his father, and hold his own son in his arms. Please, please, please. As she watched him, this tall young man with the new beard and the direwolf prowling at his heels, all she could see was the babe they had laid at her breast at Riverrun, so long ago.
The night was warm, but the thought of Riverrun was enough to make her shiver. Where are they? she wondered. Could her uncle have been wrong? So much rested on the truth of what he had told them. Robb had given the Blackfish three hundred picked men, and sent them ahead to screen his march. “Jaime does not know,” Ser Brynden said when he rode back. “I’ll stake my life on that. No bird has reached him, my archers have seen to that. We’ve seen a few of his outriders, but those that saw us did not live to tell of it. He ought to have sent out more. He does not know.”
“How large is his host?” her son asked.
“Twelve thousand foot, scattered around the castle in three separate camps, with the rivers between,” her uncle said, with the craggy smile she remembered so well. “There is no other way to besiege Riverrun, yet still, that will be their undoing. Two or three thousand horse.”
“The Kingslayer has us three to one,” said Galbart Glover.
“True enough,” Ser Brynden said, “yet there is one thing Ser Jaime lacks.”
“Yes?” Robb asked.
“Patience.”
Their host was greater than it had been when they left the Twins. Lord Jason Mallister had brought his power out from Seagard to join them as they swept around the headwaters of the Blue Fork and galloped south, and others had crept forth as well, hedge knights and small lords and masterless men-at-arms who had fled north when her brother Edmure’s army was shattered beneath the walls of Riverrun. They had driven their horses as hard as they dared to reach this place before Jaime Lannister had word of their coming, and now the hour was at hand.
Catelyn watched her son mount up. Olyvar Frey held his horse for him, Lord Walder’s son, two years older than Robb, and ten years younger and more anxious. He strapped Robb’s shield in place and handed up his helm. When he lowered it over the face she loved so well, a tall young knight sat on his grey stallion where her son had been. It was dark among the trees, where the moon did not reach. When Robb turned his head to look at her, she could see only black inside his visor. “I must ride down the line, Mother,” he told her. “Father says you should let the men see you before a battle.”
“Go, then,” she said. “Let them see you.”
“It will give them courage,” Robb said.
And who will give me courage? she wondered, yet she kept her silence and made herself smile for him. Robb turned the big grey stallion and walked him slowly away from her, Grey Wind shadowing his steps. Behind him his battle guard formed up. When he’d forced Catelyn to accept her protectors, she had insisted that he be guarded as well, and the lords bannermen had agreed. Many of their sons had clamored for the honor of riding with the Young Wolf, as they had taken to calling him. Torrhen Karstark and his brother Eddard were among his thirty, and Patrek Mallister, Smalljon Umber, Daryn Hornwood, Theon Greyjoy, no less than five of Walder Frey’s vast brood, along with older men like Ser Wendel Manderly and Robin Flint. One of his companions was even a woman: Dacey Mormont, Lady Maege’s eldest daughter and heir to Bear Island, a lanky six-footer who had been given a morningstar at an age when most girls were given dolls. Some of the other lords muttered about that, but Catelyn would not listen to their complaints. “This is not about the honor of your houses,” she told them. “This is about keeping my son alive and whole.”
And if it comes to that, she wondered, will thirty be enough? Will six thousand be enough?
A bird called faintly in the distance, a high sharp trill that felt like an icy hand on Catelyn’s neck. Another bird answered; a third, a fourth. She knew their call well enough, from her years at Winterfell. Snow shrikes. Sometimes you saw them in the deep of winter, when the godswood was white and still. They were northern birds.
They are coming, Catelyn thought.
“They’re coming, my lady,” Hal Mollen whispered. He was always a man for stating the obvious. “Gods be with us.”
She nodded as the woods grew still around them. In the quiet she could hear them, far off yet moving closer; the tread of many horses, the rattle of swords and spears and armor, the murmur of human voices, with here a laugh, and there a curse.
Eons seemed to come and go. The sounds grew louder. She heard more laughter, a shouted command, splashing as they crossed and recrossed the little stream. A horse snorted. A man swore. And then at last she saw him … only for an instant, framed between the branches of the trees as she looked down at the valley floor, yet she knew it was him. Even at a distance, Ser Jaime Lannister was unmistakable. The moonlight had silvered his armor and the gold of his hair, and turned his crimson cloak to black. He was not wearing a helm.
He was there and he was gone again, his silvery armor obscured by the trees once more. Others came behind him, long columns of them, knights and sworn swords and freeriders, three quarters of the Lannister horse.
“He is no man for sitting in a tent while his carpenters build siege towers,” Ser Brynden had promised. “He has ridden out with his knights thrice already, to chase down raiders or storm a stubborn holdfast.”
Nodding, Robb had studied the map her uncle had drawn him. Ned had taught him to read maps. “Raid him here,” he said, pointing. “A few hundred men, no more. Tully banners. When he comes after you, we will be waiting”—his finger moved an inch to the left—“here.”
Here was a hush in the night, moonlight and shadows, a thick carpet of dead leaves underfoot, densely wooded ridges sloping gently down to the streambed, the underbrush thinning as the ground fell away.
Here was her son on his stallion, glancing back at her one last time and lifting his sword in salute.
Here was the call of Maege Mormont’s warhorn, a long low blast that rolled down the valley from the east, to tell them that the last of Jaime’s riders had entered the trap.
And Grey Wind threw back his head and howled.
The sound seemed to go right through Catelyn Stark, and she found herself shivering. It was a terrible sound, a frightening sound, yet there was music in it too. For a second she felt something like pity for the Lannisters below. So this is what death sounds like, she thought.
HAAroooooooooooooooooooooooo came the answer from the far ridge as the Greatjon winded his own horn. To east and west, the trumpets of the Mallisters and Freys blew vengeance. North, where the valley narrowed and bent like a cocked elbow, Lord Karstark’s warhorns added their own deep, mournful voices to the dark chorus. Men were shouting and horses rearing in the stream below.
The whispering wood let out its breath all at once, as the bowmen Robb had hidden in the branches of the trees let fly their arrows and the night erupted with the screams of men and horses. All around her, the riders raised their lances, and the dirt and leaves that had buried the cruel bright points fell away to reveal the gleam of sharpened steel. “Winterfell!” she heard Robb shout as the arrows sighed again. He moved away from her at a trot, leading his men downhill.
Catelyn sat on her horse, unmoving, with Hal Mollen and her guard around her, and she waited as she had waited before, for Brandon and Ned and her father. She was high on the ridge, and the trees hid most of what was going on beneath her. A heartbeat, two, four, and suddenly it was as if she and her protectors were alone in the wood. The rest were melted away into the green.
Yet when she looked across the valley to the far ridge, she saw the Greatjon’s riders emerge from the darkness beneath the trees. They were in a long line, an endless line, and as they burst from the wood there was an instant, the smallest part of a heartbeat, when all Catelyn saw was the moonlight on the points of their lances, as if a thousand willowisps were coming down the ridge, wreathed in silver flame.
Then she blinked, and they were only men, rushing down to kill or die.
Afterward, she could not claim she had seen the battle. Yet she could hear, and the valley rang with echoes. The crack of a broken lance, the clash of swords, the cries of “Lannister” and “Winterfell” and “Tully! Riverrun and Tully!” When she realized there was no more to see, she closed her eyes and listened. The battle came alive around her. She heard hoofbeats, iron boots splashing in shallow water, the woody sound of swords on oaken shields and the scrape of steel against steel, the hiss of arrows, the thunder of drums, the terrified screaming of a thousand horses. Men shouted curses and begged for mercy, and got it (or not), and lived (or died). The ridges seemed to play queer tricks with sound. Once she heard Robb’s voice, as clear as if he’d been standing at her side, calling, “To me! To me!” And she heard his direwolf, snarling and growling, heard the snap of those long teeth, the tearing of flesh, shrieks of fear and pain from man and horse alike. Was there only one wolf? It was hard to be certain.
Little by little, the sounds dwindled and died, until at last there was only the wolf. As a red dawn broke in the east, Grey Wind began to howl again.
Robb came back to her on a different horse, riding a piebald gelding in the place of the grey stallion he had taken down into the valley. The wolf’s head on his shield was slashed half to pieces, raw wood showing where deep gouges had been hacked in the oak, but Robb himself seemed unhurt. Yet when he came closer, Catelyn saw that his mailed glove and the sleeve of his surcoat were black with blood. “You’re hurt,” she said.
Robb lifted his hand, opened and closed his fingers. “No,” he said. “This is … Torrhen’s blood, perhaps, or …” He shook his head. “I do not know.”
A mob of men followed him up the slope, dirty and dented and grinning, with Theon and the Greatjon at their head. Between them they dragged Ser Jaime Lannister. They threw him down in front of her horse. “The Kingslayer,” Hal announced, unnecessarily.
Lannister raised his head. “Lady Stark,” he said from his knees. Blood ran down one cheek from a gash across his scalp, but the pale light of dawn had put the glint of gold back in his hair. “I would offer you my sword, but I seem to have mislaid it.”
“It is not your sword I want, ser,” she told him. “Give me my father and my brother Edmure. Give me my daughters. Give me my lord husband.”
“I have mislaid them as well, I fear.”
“A pity,” Catelyn said coldly.
“Kill him, Robb,” Theon Greyjoy urged. “Take his head off.”
“No,” her son answered, peeling off his bloody glove. “He’s more use alive than dead. And my lord father never condoned the murder of prisoners after a battle.”
“A wise man,” Jaime Lannister said, “and honorable.”
“Take him away and put him in irons,” Catelyn said.
“Do as my lady mother says,” Robb commanded, “and make certain there’s a strong guard around him. Lord Karstark will want his head on a pike.”
“That he will,” the Greatjon agreed, gesturing. Lannister was led away to be bandaged and chained.
“Why should Lord Karstark want him dead?” Catelyn asked.
Robb looked away into the woods, with the same brooding look that Ned often got. “He … he killed them …”
“Lord Karstark’s sons,” Galbart Glover explained.
“Both of them,” said Robb. “Torrhen and Eddard. And Daryn Hornwood as well.”
“No one can fault Lannister on his courage,” Glover said. “When he saw that he was lost, he rallied his retainers and fought his way up the valley, hoping to reach Lord Robb and cut him down. And almost did.”
“He mislaid his sword in Eddard Karstark’s neck, after he took Torrhen’s hand off and split Daryn Hornwood’s skull open,” Robb said. “All the time he was shouting for me. If they hadn’t tried to stop him—”
“—I should then be mourning in place of Lord Karstark,” Catelyn said. “Your men did what they were sworn to do, Robb. They died protecting their liege lord. Grieve for them. Honor them for their valor. But not now. You have no time for grief. You may have lopped the head off the snake, but three quarters of the body is still coiled around my father’s castle. We have won a battle, not a war.”
“But such a battle!” said Theon Greyjoy eagerly. “My lady, the realm has not seen such a victory since the Field of Fire. I vow, the Lannisters lost ten men for every one of ours that fell. We’ve taken close to a hundred knights captive, and a dozen lords bannermen. Lord Westerling, Lord Banefort, Ser Garth Greenfield, Lord Estren, Ser Tytos Brax, Mallor the Dornishman … and three Lannisters besides Jaime, Lord Tywin’s own nephews, two of his sister’s sons and one of his dead brother’s …”
“And Lord Tywin?” Catelyn interrupted. “Have you perchance taken Lord Tywin, Theon?”
“No,” Greyjoy answered, brought up short.
“Until you do, this war is far from done.”
Robb raised his head and pushed his hair back out of his eyes. “My mother is right. We still have Riverrun.”

It seemed a thousand years ago that Catelyn Stark had carried her infant son out of Riverrun, crossing the Tumblestone in a small boat to begin their journey north to Winterfell. And it was across the Tumblestone that they came home now, though the boy wore plate and mail in place of swaddling clothes.
Robb sat in the bow with Grey Wind, his hand resting on his direwolf’s head as the rowers pulled at their oars. Theon Greyjoy was with him. Her uncle Brynden would come behind in the second boat, with the Greatjon and Lord Karstark.
Catelyn took a place toward the stern. They shot down the Tumblestone, letting the strong current push them past the looming Wheel Tower. The splash and rumble of the great waterwheel within was a sound from her girlhood that brought a sad smile to Catelyn’s face. From the sandstone walls of the castle, soldiers and servants shouted down her name, and Robb’s, and “Winterfell!” From every rampart waved the banner of House Tully: a leaping trout, silver, against a rippling blue-and-red field. It was a stirring sight, yet it did not lift her heart. She wondered if indeed her heart would ever lift again. Oh, Ned …
Below the Wheel Tower, they made a wide turn and knifed through the churning water. The men put their backs into it. The wide arch of the Water Gate came into view, and she heard the creak of heavy chains as the great iron portcullis was winched upward. It rose slowly as they approached, and Catelyn saw that the lower half of it was red with rust. The bottom foot dripped brown mud on them as they passed underneath, the barbed spikes mere inches above their heads. Catelyn gazed up at the bars and wondered how deep the rust went and how well the portcullis would stand up to a ram and whether it ought to be replaced. Thoughts like that were seldom far from her mind these days.
They passed beneath the arch and under the walls, moving from sunlight to shadow and back into sunlight. Boats large and small were tied up all around them, secured to iron rings set in the stone. Her father’s guards waited on the water stair with her brother. Ser Edmure Tully was a stocky young man with a shaggy head of auburn hair and a fiery beard. His breastplate was scratched and dented from battle, his blue-and-red cloak stained by blood and smoke. At his side stood the Lord Tytos Blackwood, a hard pike of a man with close-cropped salt-and-pepper whiskers and a hook nose. His bright yellow armor was inlaid with jet in elaborate vine-and-leaf patterns, and a cloak sewn from raven feathers draped his thin shoulders. It had been Lord Tytos who led the sortie that plucked her brother from the Lannister camp.
“Bring them in,” Ser Edmure commanded. Three men scrambled down the stairs knee-deep in the water and pulled the boat close with long hooks. When Grey Wind bounded out, one of them dropped his pole and lurched back, stumbling and sitting down abruptly in the river. The others laughed, and the man got a sheepish look on his face. Theon Greyjoy vaulted over the side of the boat and lifted Catelyn by the waist, setting her on a dry step above him as water lapped around his boots.
Edmure came down the steps to embrace her. “Sweet sister,” he murmured hoarsely. He had deep blue eyes and a mouth made for smiles, but he was not smiling now. He looked worn and tired, battered by battle and haggard from strain. His neck was bandaged where he had taken a wound. Catelyn hugged him fiercely.
“Your grief is mine, Cat,” he said when they broke apart. “When we heard about Lord Eddard … the Lannisters will pay, I swear it, you will have your vengeance.”
“Will that bring Ned back to me?” she said sharply. The wound was still too fresh for softer words. She could not think about Ned now. She would not. It would not do. She had to be strong. “All that will keep. I must see Father.”
“He awaits you in his solar,” Edmure said.
“Lord Hoster is bedridden, my lady,” her father’s steward explained. When had that good man grown so old and grey? “He instructed me to bring you to him at once.”
“I’ll take her.” Edmure escorted her up the water stair and across the lower bailey, where Petyr Baelish and Brandon Stark had once crossed swords for her favor. The massive sandstone walls of the keep loomed above them. As they pushed through a door between two guardsmen in fish-crest helms, she asked, “How bad is he?” dreading the answer even as she said the words.
Edmure’s look was somber. “He will not be with us long, the maesters say. The pain is … constant, and grievous.”
A blind rage filled her, a rage at all the world; at her brother Edmure and her sister Lysa, at the Lannisters, at the maesters, at Ned and her father and the monstrous gods who would take them both away from her. “You should have told me,” she said. “You should have sent word as soon as you knew.”
“He forbade it. He did not want his enemies to know that he was dying. With the realm so troubled, he feared that if the Lannisters suspected how frail he was …”
“…   they might attack?” Catelyn finished, hard. It was your doing, yours, a voice whispered inside her. If you had not taken it upon yourself to seize the dwarf …
They climbed the spiral stair in silence.
The keep was three-sided, like Riverrun itself, and Lord Hoster’s solar was triangular as well, with a stone balcony that jutted out to the east like the prow of some great sandstone ship. From there the lord of the castle could look down on his walls and battlements, and beyond, to where the waters met. They had moved her father’s bed out onto the balcony. “He likes to sit in the sun and watch the rivers,” Edmure explained. “Father, see who I’ve brought. Cat has come to see you …”
Hoster Tully had always been a big man; tall and broad in his youth, portly as he grew older. Now he seemed shrunken, the muscle and meat melted off his bones. Even his face sagged. The last time Catelyn had seen him, his hair and beard had been brown, well streaked with grey. Now they had gone white as snow.
His eyes opened to the sound of Edmure’s voice. “Little cat,” he murmured in a voice thin and wispy and wracked by pain. “My little cat.” A tremulous smile touched his face as his hand groped for hers. “I watched for you …”
“I shall leave you to talk,” her brother said, kissing their lord father gently on the brow before he withdrew.
Catelyn knelt and took her father’s hand in hers. It was a big hand, but fleshless now, the bones moving loosely under the skin, all the strength gone from it. “You should have told me,” she said. “A rider, a raven …”
“Riders are taken, questioned,” he answered. “Ravens are brought down …” A spasm of pain took him, and his fingers clutched hers hard. “The crabs are in my belly … pinching, always pinching. Day and night. They have fierce claws, the crabs. Maester Vyman makes me dreamwine, milk of the poppy … I sleep a lot … but I wanted to be awake to see you, when you came. I was afraid … when the Lannisters took your brother, the camps all around us … I was afraid I would go, before I could see you again … I was afraid …”
“I’m here, Father,” she said. “With Robb, my son. He’ll want to see you too.”
“Your boy,” he whispered. “He had my eyes, I remember …”
“He did, and does. And we’ve brought you Jaime Lannister, in irons. Riverrun is free again, Father.”
Lord Hoster smiled. “I saw. Last night, when it began, I told them … had to see. They carried me to the gatehouse … watched from the battlements. Ah, that was beautiful … the torches came in a wave, I could hear the cries floating across the river … sweet cries … when that siege tower went up, gods … would have died then, and glad, if only I could have seen you children first. Was it your boy who did it? Was it your Robb?”
“Yes,” Catelyn said, fiercely proud. “It was Robb … and Brynden. Your brother is here as well, my lord.”
“Him.” Her father’s voice was a faint whisper. “The Blackfish … came back? From the Vale?”
“Yes.”
“And Lysa?” A cool wind moved through his thin white hair. “Gods be good, your sister … did she come as well?”
He sounded so full of hope and yearning that it was hard to tell the truth. “No. I’m sorry …”
“Oh.” His face fell, and some light went out of his eyes. “I’d hoped … I would have liked to see her, before …”
“She’s with her son, in the Eyrie.”
Lord Hoster gave a weary nod. “Lord Robert now, poor Arryn’s gone … I remember … why did she not come with you?”
“She is frightened, my lord. In the Eyrie she feels safe.” She kissed his wrinkled brow. “Robb will be waiting. Will you see him? And Brynden?”
“Your son,” he whispered. “Yes. Cat’s child … he had my eyes, I remember. When he was born. Bring him … yes.”
“And your brother?”
Her father glanced out over the rivers. “Blackfish,” he said. “Has he wed yet? Taken some … girl to wife?”
Even on his deathbed, Catelyn thought sadly. “He has not wed. You know that, Father. Nor will he ever.”
“I told him … commanded him. Marry! I was his lord. He knows. My right, to make his match. A good match. A Redwyne. Old House. Sweet girl, pretty … freckles … Bethany, yes. Poor child. Still waiting. Yes. Still …”
“Bethany Redwyne wed Lord Rowan years ago,” Catelyn reminded him. “She has three children by him.”
“Even so,” Lord Hoster muttered. “Even so. Spit on the girl. The Redwynes. Spit on me. His lord, his brother … that Blackfish. I had other offers. Lord Bracken’s girl. Walder Frey … any of three, he said … Has he wed? Anyone? Anyone?”
“No one,” Catelyn said, “yet he has come many leagues to see you, fighting his way back to Riverrun. I would not be here now, if Ser Brynden had not helped us.”
“He was ever a warrior,” her father husked. “That he could do. Knight of the Gate, yes.” He leaned back and closed his eyes, inutterably weary. “Send him. Later. I’ll sleep now. Too sick to fight. Send him up later, the Blackfish …”
Catelyn kissed him gently, smoothed his hair, and left him there in the shade of his keep, with his rivers flowing beneath. He was asleep before she left the solar.
When she returned to the lower bailey, Ser Brynden Tully stood on the water stairs with wet boots, talking with the captain of Riverrun’s guards. He came to her at once. “Is he—?”
“Dying,” she said. “As we feared.”
Her uncle’s craggy face showed his pain plain. He ran his fingers through his thick grey hair. “Will he see me?”
She nodded. “He says he is too sick to fight.”
Brynden Blackfish chuckled. “I am too old a soldier to believe that. Hoster will be chiding me about the Redwyne girl even as we light his funeral pyre, damn his bones.”
Catelyn smiled, knowing it was true. “I do not see Robb.”
“He went with Greyjoy to the hall, I believe.”
Theon Greyjoy was seated on a bench in Riverrun’s Great Hall, enjoying a horn of ale and regaling her father’s garrison with an account of the slaughter in the Whispering Wood. “Some tried to flee, but we’d pinched the valley shut at both ends, and we rode out of the darkness with sword and lance. The Lannisters must have thought the Others themselves were on them when that wolf of Robb’s got in among them. I saw him tear one man’s arm from his shoulder, and their horses went mad at the scent of him. I couldn’t tell you how many men were thrown—”
“Theon,” she interrupted, “where might I find my son?”
“Lord Robb went to visit the godswood, my lady.”
It was what Ned would have done. He is his father’s son as much as mine, I must remember. Oh, gods, Ned …
She found Robb beneath the green canopy of leaves, surrounded by tall redwoods and great old elms, kneeling before the heart tree, a slender weirwood with a face more sad than fierce. His longsword was before him, the point thrust in the earth, his gloved hands clasped around the hilt. Around him others knelt: Greatjon Umber, Rickard Karstark, Maege Mormont, Galbart Glover, and more. Even Tytos Blackwood was among them, the great raven cloak fanned out behind him. These are the ones who keep the old gods, she realized. She asked herself what gods she kept these days, and could not find an answer.
It would not do to disturb them at their prayers. The gods must have their due … even cruel gods who would take Ned from her, and her lord father as well. So Catelyn waited. The river wind moved through the high branches, and she could see the Wheel Tower to her right, ivy crawling up its side. As she stood there, all the memories came flooding back to her. Her father had taught her to ride amongst these trees, and that was the elm that Edmure had fallen from when he broke his arm, and over there, beneath that bower, she and Lysa had played at kissing with Petyr.
She had not thought of that in years. How young they all had been—she no older than Sansa, Lysa younger than Arya, and Petyr younger still, yet eager. The girls had traded him between them, serious and giggling by turns. It came back to her so vividly she could almost feel his sweaty fingers on her shoulders and taste the mint on his breath. There was always mint growing in the godswood, and Petyr had liked to chew it. He had been such a bold little boy, always in trouble. “He tried to put his tongue in my mouth,” Catelyn had confessed to her sister afterward, when they were alone. “He did with me too,” Lysa had whispered, shy and breathless. “I liked it.”
Robb got to his feet slowly and sheathed his sword, and Catelyn found herself wondering whether her son had ever kissed a girl in the godswood. Surely he must have. She had seen Jeyne Poole giving him moist-eyed glances, and some of the serving girls, even ones as old as eighteen … he had ridden in battle and killed men with a sword, surely he had been kissed. There were tears in her eyes. She wiped them away angrily.
“Mother,” Robb said when he saw her standing there. “We must call a council. There are things to be decided.”
“Your grandfather would like to see you,” she said. “Robb, he’s very sick.”
“Ser Edmure told me. I am sorry, Mother … for Lord Hoster and for you. Yet first we must meet. We’ve had word from the south. Renly Baratheon has claimed his brother’s crown.”
“Renly?” she said, shocked. “I had thought, surely it would be Lord Stannis …”
“So did we all, my lady,” Galbart Glover said.
The war council convened in the Great Hall, at four long trestle tables arranged in a broken square. Lord Hoster was too weak to attend, asleep on his balcony, dreaming of the sun on the rivers of his youth. Edmure sat in the high seat of the Tullys, with Brynden Blackfish at his side, and his father’s bannermen arrayed to right and left and along the side tables. Word of the victory at Riverrun had spread to the fugitive lords of the Trident, drawing them back. Karyl Vance came in, a lord now, his father dead beneath the Golden Tooth. Ser Marq Piper was with him, and they brought a Darry, Ser Raymun’s son, a lad no older than Bran. Lord Jonos Bracken arrived from the ruins of Stone Hedge, glowering and blustering, and took a seat as far from Tytos Blackwood as the tables would permit.
The northern lords sat opposite, with Catelyn and Robb facing her brother across the tables. They were fewer. The Greatjon sat at Robb’s left hand, and then Theon Greyjoy; Galbart Glover and Lady Mormont were to the right of Catelyn. Lord Rickard Karstark, gaunt and hollow-eyed in his grief, took his seat like a man in a nightmare, his long beard uncombed and unwashed. He had left two sons dead in the Whispering Wood, and there was no word of the third, his eldest, who had led the Karstark spears against Tywin Lannister on the Green Fork.
The arguing raged on late into the night. Each lord had a right to speak, and speak they did … and shout, and curse, and reason, and cajole, and jest, and bargain, and slam tankards on the table, and threaten, and walk out, and return sullen or smiling. Catelyn sat and listened to it all.
Roose Bolton had re-formed the battered remnants of their other host at the mouth of the causeway. Ser Helman Tallhart and Walder Frey still held the Twins. Lord Tywin’s army had crossed the Trident, and was making for Harrenhal. And there were two kings in the realm. Two kings, and no agreement.
Many of the lords bannermen wanted to march on Harrenhal at once, to meet Lord Tywin and end Lannister power for all time. Young, hot-tempered Marq Piper urged a strike west at Casterly Rock instead. Still others counseled patience. Riverrun sat athwart the Lannister supply lines, Jason Mallister pointed out; let them bide their time, denying Lord Tywin fresh levies and provisions while they strengthened their defenses and rested their weary troops. Lord Blackwood would have none of it. They should finish the work they began in the Whispering Wood. March to Harrenhal and bring Roose Bolton’s army down as well. What Blackwood urged, Bracken opposed, as ever; Lord Jonos Bracken rose to insist they ought pledge their fealty to King Renly, and move south to join their might to his.
“Renly is not the king,” Robb said. It was the first time her son had spoken. Like his father, he knew how to listen.
“You cannot mean to hold to Joffrey, my lord,” Galbart Glover said. “He put your father to death.”
“That makes him evil,” Robb replied. “I do not know that it makes Renly king. Joffrey is still Robert’s eldest trueborn son, so the throne is rightfully his by all the laws of the realm. Were he to die, and I mean to see that he does, he has a younger brother. Tommen is next in line after Joffrey.”
“Tommen is no less a Lannister,” Ser Marq Piper snapped.
“As you say,” said Robb, troubled. “Yet if neither one is king, still, how could it be Lord Renly? He’s Robert’s younger brother. Bran can’t be Lord of Winterfell before me, and Renly can’t be king before Lord Stannis.”
Lady Mormont agreed. “Lord Stannis has the better claim.”
“Renly is crowned,” said Marq Piper. “Highgarden and Storm’s End support his claim, and the Dornishmen will not be laggardly. If Winterfell and Riverrun add their strength to his, he will have five of the seven great houses behind him. Six, if the Arryns bestir themselves! Six against the Rock! My lords, within the year, we will have all their heads on pikes, the queen and the boy king, Lord Tywin, the Imp, the Kingslayer, Ser Kevan, all of them! That is what we shall win if we join with King Renly. What does Lord Stannis have against that, that we should cast it all aside?”
“The right,” said Robb stubbornly. Catelyn thought he sounded eerily like his father as he said it.
“So you mean us to declare for Stannis?” asked Edmure.
“I don’t know,” said Robb. “I prayed to know what to do, but the gods did not answer. The Lannisters killed my father for a traitor, and we know that was a lie, but if Joffrey is the lawful king and we fight against him, we will be traitors.”
“My lord father would urge caution,” aged Ser Stevron said, with the weaselly smile of a Frey. “Wait, let these two kings play their game of thrones. When they are done fighting, we can bend our knees to the victor, or oppose him, as we choose. With Renly arming, likely Lord Tywin would welcome a truce … and the safe return of his son. Noble lords, allow me to go to him at Harrenhal and arrange good terms and ransoms …”
A roar of outrage drowned out his voice. “Craven!” the Greatjon thundered. “Begging for a truce will make us seem weak,” declared Lady Mormont. “Ransoms be damned, we must not give up the Kingslayer,” shouted Rickard Karstark.
“Why not a peace?” Catelyn asked.
The lords looked at her, but it was Robb’s eyes she felt, his and his alone. “My lady, they murdered my lord father, your husband,” he said grimly. He unsheathed his longsword and laid it on the table before him, the bright steel on the rough wood. “This is the only peace I have for Lannisters.”
The Greatjon bellowed his approval, and other men added their voices, shouting and drawing swords and pounding their fists on the table. Catelyn waited until they had quieted. “My lords,” she said then, “Lord Eddard was your liege, but I shared his bed and bore his children. Do you think I love him any less than you?” Her voice almost broke with her grief, but Catelyn took a long breath and steadied herself. “Robb, if that sword could bring him back, I should never let you sheathe it until Ned stood at my side once more … but he is gone, and a hundred Whispering Woods will not change that. Ned is gone, and Daryn Hornwood, and Lord Karstark’s valiant sons, and many other good men besides, and none of them will return to us. Must we have more deaths still?”
“You are a woman, my lady,” the Greatjon rumbled in his deep voice. “Women do not understand these things.”
“You are the gentle sex,” said Lord Karstark, with the lines of grief fresh on his face. “A man has a need for vengeance.”
“Give me Cersei Lannister, Lord Karstark, and you would see how gentle a woman can be,” Catelyn replied. “Perhaps I do not understand tactics and strategy … but I understand futility. We went to war when Lannister armies were ravaging the riverlands, and Ned was a prisoner, falsely accused of treason. We fought to defend ourselves, and to win my lord’s freedom.
“Well, the one is done, and the other forever beyond our reach. I will mourn for Ned until the end of my days, but I must think of the living. I want my daughters back, and the queen holds them still. If I must trade our four Lannisters for their two Starks, I will call that a bargain and thank the gods. I want you safe, Robb, ruling at Winterfell from your father’s seat. I want you to live your life, to kiss a girl and wed a woman and father a son. I want to write an end to this. I want to go home, my lords, and weep for my husband.”
The hall was very quiet when Catelyn finished speaking.
“Peace,” said her uncle Brynden. “Peace is sweet, my lady … but on what terms? It is no good hammering your sword into a plowshare if you must forge it again on the morrow.”
“What did Torrhen and my Eddard die for, if I am to return to Karhold with nothing but their bones?” asked Rickard Karstark.
“Aye,” said Lord Bracken. “Gregor Clegane laid waste to my fields, slaughtered my smallfolk, and left Stone Hedge a smoking ruin. Am I now to bend the knee to the ones who sent him? What have we fought for, if we are to put all back as it was before?”
Lord Blackwood agreed, to Catelyn’s surprise and dismay. “And if we do make peace with King Joffrey, are we not then traitors to King Renly? What if the stag should prevail against the lion, where would that leave us?”
“Whatever you may decide for yourselves, I shall never call a Lannister my king,” declared Marq Piper.
“Nor I!” yelled the little Darry boy. “I never will!”
Again the shouting began. Catelyn sat despairing. She had come so close, she thought. They had almost listened, almost … but the moment was gone. There would be no peace, no chance to heal, no safety. She looked at her son, watched him as he listened to the lords debate, frowning, troubled, yet wedded to his war. He had pledged himself to marry a daughter of Walder Frey, but she saw his true bride plain before her now: the sword he had laid on the table.
Catelyn was thinking of her girls, wondering if she would ever see them again, when the Greatjon lurched to his feet.
“MY LORDS!” he shouted, his voice booming off the rafters. “Here is what I say to these two kings!” He spat. “Renly Baratheon is nothing to me, nor Stannis neither. Why should they rule over me and mine, from some flowery seat in Highgarden or Dorne? What do they know of the Wall or the wolfswood or the barrows of the First Men? Even their gods are wrong. The Others take the Lannisters too, I’ve had a bellyful of them.” He reached back over his shoulder and drew his immense two-handed greatsword. “Why shouldn’t we rule ourselves again? It was the dragons we married, and the dragons are all dead!” He pointed at Robb with the blade. “There sits the only king I mean to bow my knee to, m’lords,” he thundered. “The King in the North!”
And he knelt, and laid his sword at her son’s feet.
“I’ll have peace on those terms,” Lord Karstark said. “They can keep their red castle and their iron chair as well.” He eased his longsword from its scabbard. “The King in the North!” he said, kneeling beside the Greatjon.
Maege Mormont stood. “The King of Winter!” she declared, and laid her spiked mace beside the swords. And the river lords were rising too, Blackwood and Bracken and Mallister, houses who had never been ruled from Winterfell, yet Catelyn watched them rise and draw their blades, bending their knees and shouting the old words that had not been heard in the realm for more than three hundred years, since Aegon the Dragon had come to make the Seven Kingdoms one … yet now were heard again, ringing from the timbers of her father’s hall:
“The King in the North!”
“The King in the North!”
“THE KING IN THE NORTH!”

Her son’s crown was fresh from the forge, and it seemed to Catelyn Stark 
that the weight of it pressed heavy on Robb’s head.
The ancient crown of the Kings of Winter had been lost three centuries ago, 
yielded up to Aegon the Conqueror when Torrhen Stark knelt in submission. What 
Aegon had done with it no man could say. Lord Hoster’s smith had done his work 
well, and Robb’s crown looked much as the other was said to have looked in the 
tales told of the Stark kings of old; an open circlet of hammered bronze 
incised with the runes of the First Men, surmounted by nine black iron spikes 
wrought in the shape of longswords. Of gold and silver and gemstones, it had 
none; bronze and iron were the metals of winter, dark and strong to fight 
against the cold.
As they waited in Riverrun’s Great Hall for the prisoner to be brought before 
them, she saw Robb push back the crown so it rested upon the thick auburn mop 
of his hair; moments later, he moved it forward again; later he gave it a 
quarter turn, as if that might make it sit more easily on his brow. It is 
no easy thing to wear a crown, Catelyn thought, watching, especially 
for a boy of fifteen years.
When the guards brought in the captive, Robb called for his sword. Olyvar Frey 
offered it up hilt first, and her son drew the blade and laid it bare across 
his knees, a threat plain for all to

see. “Your Grace, here is the man you asked for,” announced Ser Robin Ryger, 
captain of the Tully household guard.
“Kneel before the king, Lannister!” Theon Greyjoy shouted. Ser Robin forced 
the prisoner to his knees.
He did not look a lion, Catelyn reflected. This Ser Cleos Frey was a son of the 
Lady Genna who was sister to Lord Tywin Lannister, but he had none of the 
fabled Lannister beauty, the fair hair and green eyes. Instead he had inherited 
the stringy brown locks, weak chin, and thin face of his sire, Ser Emmon Frey, 
old Lord Walder’s second son. His eyes were pale and watery and he could not 
seem to stop blinking, but perhaps that was only the light. The cells below 
Riverrun were dark and damp . . . and these days crowded as 
well.
“Rise, Ser Cleos.” Her son’s voice was not as icy as his father’s would have 
been, but he did not sound a boy of fifteen either. War had made a man of him 
before his time. Morning light glimmered faintly against the edge of the steel 
across his knees.
Yet it was not the sword that made Ser Cleos Frey anxious; it was the beast. 
Grey Wind, her son had named him. A direwolf large as any elkhound, lean and 
smoke-dark, with eyes like molten gold. When the beast padded forward and 
sniffed at the captive knight, every man in that hall could smell the scent of 
fear. Ser Cleos had been taken during the battle in the Whispering Wood, where 
Grey Wind had ripped out the throats of half a dozen men.
The knight scrambled up, edging away with such alacrity that some of the 
watchers laughed aloud. “Thank you, my lord.”“Your Grace,” barked Lord Umber, the Greatjon, ever the 
loudest of Robb’s northern bannermen . . . and the truest and 
fiercest as well, or so he insisted. He had been the first to proclaim her son 
King in the North, and he would brook no slight to the honor of his new-made 
sovereign.
“Your Grace,” Ser Cleos corrected hastily. “Pardons.”
He is not a bold man, this one, Catelyn thought. More of a Frey than 
a Lannister, in truth. His cousin the Kingslayer would have been a much 
different matter. They would never have gotten that honorific through Ser Jaime 
Lannister’s perfect teeth.
“I brought you from your cell to carry my message to your cousin Cersei 
Lannister in King’s Landing. You’ll travel under a peace banner, with thirty of 
my best men to escort you.”
Ser Cleos was visibly relieved. “Then I should be most glad to bring His 
Grace’s message to the queen.”
“Understand,” Robb said, “I am not giving you your freedom. Your grandfather 
Lord Walder pledged me his support and that of House Frey. Many of your cousins 
and uncles rode with us in the Whispering Wood, but you chose to 
fight beneath the lion banner. That makes you a Lannister, not a Frey. I want 
your pledge, on your honor as a knight, that after you deliver my message 
you’ll return with the queen’s reply, and resume your captivity.”
Ser Cleos answered at once. “I do so vow.”
“Every man in this hall has heard you,” warned
Catelyn’s brother Ser Edmure 
Tully, who spoke for Riverrun and the lords of the Trident in the place of 
their dying father. “If you do not

return, the whole realm will know you forsworn.”
“I will do as I pledged,” Ser Cleos replied stiffly. “What is this 
message?”
“An offer of peace.” Robb stood, longsword in hand. Grey Wind moved to his 
side. The hall grew hushed. “Tell the Queen Regent that if she meets my terms, 
I will sheath this sword, and make an end to the war between us.”
In the back of the hall, Catelyn glimpsed the tall, gaunt figure of Lord 
Rickard Karstark shove through a rank of guards and out the door. No one else 
moved. Robb paid the disruption no mind. “Olyvar, the paper,” he commanded. 
The squire took his longsword and handed up a rolled parchment.
Robb unrolled it. “First, the queen must release my sisters and provide them 
with transport by sea from King’s Landing to White Harbor. It is to be 
understood that Sansa’s betrothal to Joffrey Baratheon is at an end. When I 
receive word from my castellan that my sisters have returned unharmed to 
Winterfell, I will release the queen’s cousins, the squire Willem Lannister and 
your brother Tion Frey, and give them safe escort to Casterly Rock or 
wheresoever she desires them delivered.”
Catelyn Stark wished she could read the thoughts that hid behind each face, 
each furrowed brow and pair of tightened lips.
“Secondly, my lord father’s bones will be returned to us, so he may rest 
beside his brother and sister in the crypts beneath Winterfell, as he would 
have wished. The remains of the men of his household guard who died in his 
service at King’s Landing must

also be returned.”
Living men had gone south, and cold bones would return. Ned had the truth 
of it, she thought. His place was at Winterfell, he said as much, but 
would I hear him? No. Go, I told him, you must be Robert’s Hand, for the good 
of our House, for the sake of our children . . . my doing, 
mine, no other . . .
“Third, my father’s greatsword Ice will be delivered to my hand, here at 
Riverrun.”
She watched her brother Ser Edmure Tully as he stood with his thumbs hooked 
over his swordbelt, his face as still as stone.
“Fourth, the queen will command her father Lord Tywin to release those knights 
and lords bannermen of mine that he took captive in the battle on the Green 
Fork of the Trident. Once he does so, I shall release my own captives taken in 
the Whispering Wood and the Battle of the Camps, save Jaime Lannister alone, 
who will remain my hostage for his father’s good behavior.”
She studied Theon Greyjoy’s sly smile, wondering what it meant. That young man 
had a way of looking as though he knew some secret jest that only he was privy 
to; Catelyn had never liked it.
“Lastly, King Joffrey and the Queen Regent must renounce all claims to 
dominion over the north. Henceforth we are no part of their realm, but a free 
and independent kingdom, as of old. Our domain shall include all the Stark 
lands north of the Neck, and in addition the lands watered by the River Trident 
and its vassal streams, bounded by the Golden Tooth to the west and the 
Mountains of the Moon in the east.”“THE KING IN THE NORTH!” boomed Greatjon Umber, a ham-sized 
fist hammering at the air as he shouted. “Stark! Stark! The King in the 
North!”
Robb rolled up the parchment again. “Maester Vyman has drawn a map, showing 
the borders we claim. You shall have a copy for the queen. Lord Tywin must 
withdraw beyond these borders, and cease his raiding, burning, and pillage. The 
Queen Regent and her son shall make no claims to taxes, incomes, nor service 
from my people, and shall free my lords and knights from all oaths of fealty, 
vows, pledges, debts, and obligations owed to the Iron Throne and the Houses 
Baratheon and Lannister. Additionally, the Lannisters shall deliver ten 
highborn hostages, to be mutually agreed upon, as a pledge of peace. These I 
will treat as honored guests, according to their station. So long as the terms 
of this pact are abided with faithfully, I shall release two hostages every 
year, and return them safely to their families.” Robb tossed the rolled 
parchment at the knight’s feet. “There are the terms. If she meets them, I’ll 
give her peace. If not”—he whistled, and Grey Wind moved forward 
snarling—“I’ll give her another Whispering Wood.”
“Stark!” the Greatjon roared again, and now other voices took up 
the cry. “Stark, Stark, King in the North!” The direwolf threw back 
his head and howled.
Ser Cleos had gone the color of curdled milk. “The queen shall hear your 
message, my—Your Grace.”
“Good,” Robb said. “Ser Robin, see that he has a good meal

and clean clothing. He’s to ride at first light.”
“As you command, Your Grace,” Ser Robin Ryger replied.
“Then we are done.” The assembled knights and lords bannermen bent their 
knees as Robb turned to leave, Grey Wind at his heels. Olyvar Frey scrambled 
ahead to open the door. Catelyn followed them out, her brother at her 
side.
“You did well,” she told her son in the gallery that led from the rear of the 
hall, “though that business with the wolf was japery more befitting a boy than 
a king.”
Robb scratched Grey Wind behind the ear. “Did you see the look on his face, 
Mother?” he asked, smiling.
“What I saw was Lord Karstark, walking out.”
“As did I.” Robb lifted off his crown with both hands and gave it to Olyvar. 
“Take this thing back to my bedchamber.”
“At once, Your Grace.” The squire hurried off.
“I’ll wager there were others who felt the same as Lord Karstark,” her 
brother Edmure declared. “How can we talk of peace while the Lannisters spread 
like a pestilence over my father’s domains, stealing his crops and slaughtering 
his people? I say again, we ought to be marching on Harrenhal.”
“We lack the strength,” Robb said, though unhappily.
Edmure persisted. “Do we grow stronger sitting here? Our host dwindles every 
day.”
“And whose doing is that?” Catelyn snapped at her brother. It had been at 
Edmure’s insistence that Robb had given the river lords leave to depart after 
his crowning, each to defend his own

lands. Ser Marq Piper and Lord Karyl Vance had been the first to go. Lord Jonos 
Bracken had followed, vowing to reclaim the burnt shell of his castle and bury 
his dead, and now Lord Jason Mallister had announced his intent to return to 
his seat at Seagard, still mercifully untouched by the fighting.
“You cannot ask my river lords to remain idle while their fields are being 
pillaged and their people put to the sword,” Ser Edmure said, “but Lord 
Karstark is a northman. It would be an ill thing if he were to leave 
us.”
“I’ll speak with him,” said Robb. “He lost two sons in the Whispering Wood. 
Who can blame him if he does not want to make peace with their 
killers . . . with my father’s 
killers . . .”
“More bloodshed will not bring your father back to us, or Lord Rickard’s 
sons,” Catelyn said. “An offer had to be made—though a wiser man might 
have offered sweeter terms.”
“Any sweeter and I would have gagged.” Her son’s beard had grown in redder 
than his auburn hair. Robb seemed to think it made him look fierce, 
royal . . . older. But bearded or no, he was still a youth of 
fifteen, and wanted vengeance no less than Rickard Karstark. It had been no 
easy thing to convince him to make even this offer, poor as it was.
“Cersei Lannister will never consent to trade your sisters for a 
pair of cousins. It’s her brother she’ll want, as you know full well.” She had 
told him as much before, but Catelyn was finding that kings do not listen half 
so attentively as sons.
“I can’t release the Kingslayer, not even if I wanted to.

My lords would never abide it.”
“Your lords made you their king.”
“And can unmake me just as easy.”
“If your crown is the price we must pay to have Arya and Sansa returned safe, 
we should pay it willingly. Half your lords would like to murder Lannister in 
his cell. If he should die while he’s your prisoner, men will 
say—”
“—that he well deserved it,” Robb finished.
“And your sisters?” Catelyn asked sharply. “Will they deserve their deaths 
as well? I promise you, if any harm comes to her brother, Cersei will pay us 
back blood for blood—”
“Lannister won’t die,” Robb said. “No one so much as speaks to him without 
my warrant. He has food, water, clean straw, more comfort than he has any right 
to. But I won’t free him, not even for Arya and Sansa.”
Her son was looking down at her, Catelyn realized. Was it war 
that made him grow so fast, she wondered, or the crown they had put 
on his head? “Are you afraid to have Jaime Lannister in the field again, 
is that the truth of it?”
Grey Wind growled, as if he sensed Robb’s anger, and Edmure Tully put a 
brotherly hand on Catelyn’s shoulder. “Cat, don’t. The boy has the right of 
this.”
“Don’t call me the boy,” Robb said, rounding on his uncle, his 
anger spilling out all at once on poor Edmure, who had only meant to support 
him. “I’m almost a man grown, and a king—your king, ser. And 
I don’t fear Jaime Lannister. I defeated him

once, I’ll defeat him again if I must, only . . .” He pushed a 
fall of hair out of his eyes and gave a shake of the head. “I might have been 
able to trade the Kingslayer for Father, but . . .”
“. . . but not for the girls?” Her voice was icy quiet. “Girls 
are not important enough, are they?”
Robb made no answer, but there was hurt in his eyes. Blue eyes, Tully eyes, 
eyes she had given him. She had wounded him, but he was too much his father’s 
son to admit it.
That was unworthy of me, she told herself. Gods be good, what is 
to become of me? He is doing his best, trying so hard, I know it, I see it, and 
yet . . . I have lost my Ned, the rock my life was built on, I 
could not bear to lose the girls as well . . .
“I’ll do all I can for my sisters,” Robb said. “If the queen has any sense, 
she’ll accept my terms. If not, I’ll make her rue the day she refused me.” 
Plainly, he’d had enough of the subject. “Mother, are you certain you will not 
consent to go to the Twins? You would be farther from the fighting, and you 
could acquaint yourself with Lord Frey’s daughters to help me choose my bride 
when the war is done.”
He wants me gone, Catelyn thought wearily. Kings are not 
supposed to have mothers, it would seem, and I tell him things he does not want 
to hear. “You’re old enough to decide which of Lord Walder’s girls you 
prefer without your mother’s help, Robb.”
“Then go with Theon. He leaves on the morrow. He’ll help the Mallisters escort 
that lot of captives to Seagard and then take ship for the Iron Islands. You 
could find a ship as well,

and be back at Winterfell with a moon’s turn, if the winds are kind. Bran and 
Rickon need you.”
And you do not, is that what you mean to say? “My lord father has 
little enough time remaining him. So long as your grandfather lives, my place 
is at Riverrun with him.”
“I could command you to go. As king. I could.”
Catelyn ignored that. “I’ll say again, I would sooner you sent someone else to 
Pyke, and kept Theon close to you.”
“Who better to treat with Balon Greyjoy than his son?”
“Jason Mallister,” offered Catelyn. “Tytos Blackwood. Stevron Frey. 
Anyone . . . but not Theon.”
Her son squatted beside Grey Wind, ruffling the wolf’s fur and incidentally 
avoiding her eyes. “Theon’s fought bravely for us. I told you how he saved 
Bran from those wildlings in the wolfswood. If the Lannisters won’t make peace, 
I’ll have need of Lord Greyjoy’s longships.”
“You’ll have them sooner if you keep his son as hostage.”
“He’s been a hostage half his life.”
“For good reason,” Catelyn said. “Balon Greyjoy is not a man to be trusted. 
He wore a crown himself, remember, if only for a season. He may aspire to wear 
one again.”
Robb stood. “I will not grudge him that. If I’m King in the North, let him be 
King of the Iron Islands, if that’s his desire. I’ll give him a crown gladly, 
so long as he helps us bring down the Lannisters.”
“Robb—”“I’m sending Theon. Good day, Mother. Grey Wind, come.” Robb walked off 
briskly, the direwolf padding beside him.
Catelyn could only watch him go. Her son and now her king. How queer that felt. 
Command, she had told him back in Moat Cailin. And so he did. “I am 
going to visit Father,” she announced abruptly. “Come with me, 
Edmure.”
“I need to have a word with those new bowmen Ser Desmond is training. I’ll 
visit him later.”
If he still lives, Catelyn thought, but she said nothing. Her brother 
would sooner face battle than that sickroom.
The shortest way to the central keep where her father lay dying was through the 
godswood, with its grass and wildflowers and thick stands of elm and redwood. A 
wealth of rustling leaves still clung to the branches of the trees, all 
ignorant of the word the white raven had brought to Riverrun a fortnight past. 
Autumn had come, the Conclave had declared, but the gods had not seen fit to 
tell the winds and woods as yet. For that Catelyn was duly grateful. Autumn was 
always a fearful time, with the specter of winter looming ahead. Even the 
wisest man never knew whether his next harvest would be the last.
Hoster Tully, Lord of Riverrun, lay abed in his solar, with its commanding view 
to the east where the rivers Tumblestone and Red Fork met beyond the walls of 
his castle. He was sleeping when Catelyn entered, his hair and beard as white 
as his featherbed, his once portly frame turned small and frail by the death 
that grew within him.Beside the bed, still dressed in mail hauberk and travel-stained cloak, 
sat her father’s brother, the Blackfish. His boots were dusty and spattered 
with dried mud. “Does Robb know you are returned, Uncle?” Ser Brynden Tully 
was Robb’s eyes and ears, the commander of his scouts and outriders.
“No. I came here straight from the stables, when they told me the king was 
holding court. His Grace will want to hear my tidings in private first, I’d 
think.” The Blackfish was a tall, lean man, grey of hair and precise in his 
movements, his clean-shaven face lined and windburnt. “How is he?” he asked, 
and she knew he did not mean Robb.
“Much the same. The maester gives him dreamwine and milk of the poppy for his 
pain, so he sleeps most of the time, and eats too little. He seems weaker with 
each day that passes.”
“Does he speak?”
“Yes . . . but there is less and less sense to the things he 
says. He talks of his regrets, of unfinished tasks, of people long dead and 
times long past. Sometimes he does not know what season it is, or who I am. 
Once he called me by Mother’s name.”
“He misses her still,” Ser Brynden answered. “You have her face. I can see 
it in your cheekbones, and your jaw . . .”
“You remember more of her than I do. It has been a long time.” She seated 
herself on the bed and brushed away a strand of fine white hair that had fallen 
across her father’s face.
“Each time I ride out, I wonder if I shall find him alive or dead on my 
return.” Despite their quarrels, there was a deep bond

between her father and the brother he had once disowned.
“At least you made your peace with him.”
They sat for a time in silence, until Catelyn raised her head. “You spoke of 
tidings that Robb needed to hear?” Lord Hoster moaned and rolled onto his 
side, almost as if he had heard.
Brynden stood. “Come outside. Best if we do not wake him.”
She followed him out onto the stone balcony that jutted three-sided from the 
solar like the prow of a ship. Her uncle glanced up, frowning. “You can see it 
by day now. My men call it the Red Messenger . . . but what is 
the message?”
Catelyn raised her eyes, to where the faint red line of the comet traced a path 
across the deep blue sky like a long scratch across the face of god. “The 
Greatjon told Robb that the old gods have unfurled a red flag of vengeance for 
Ned. Edmure thinks it’s an omen of victory for Riverrun—he sees a fish 
with a long tail, in the Tully colors, red against blue.” She sighed. “I wish 
I had their faith. Crimson is a Lannister color.”
“That thing’s not crimson,” Ser Brynden said. “Nor Tully red, the mud red of 
the river. That’s blood up there, child, smeared across the sky.”
“Our blood or theirs?”
“Was there ever a war where only one side bled?” Her uncle gave a shake of 
the head. “The riverlands are awash in blood and flame all around the Gods 
Eye. The fighting has spread south to the Blackwater and north across the 
Trident, almost to the Twins. Marq Piper and Karyl Vance have won some small 
victories, and this

southron lordling Beric Dondarrion has been raiding the raiders, falling upon 
Lord Tywin’s foraging parties and vanishing back into the woods. It’s said that 
Ser Burton Crakehall was boasting that he’d slain Dondarrion, until he led his 
column into one of Lord Beric’s traps and got every man of them 
killed.”
“Some of Ned’s guard from King’s Landing are with this Lord Beric,” Catelyn 
recalled. “May the gods preserve them.”
“Dondarrion and this red priest who rides with him are clever enough to 
preserve themselves, if the tales be true,” her uncle said, “but your 
father’s bannermen make a sadder tale. Robb should never have let them go. 
They’ve scattered like quail, each man trying to protect his own, and it’s 
folly, Cat, folly. Jonos Bracken was wounded in the fighting amidst the ruins of 
his castle, and his nephew Hendry slain. Tytos Blackwood’s swept the Lannisters 
off his lands, but they took every cow and pig and speck of grain and left him 
nothing to defend but Raventree Hall and a scorched desert. Darry men 
recaptured their lord’s keep but held it less than a fortnight before Gregor 
Clegane descended on them and put the whole garrison to the sword, even their 
lord.”
Catelyn was horrorstruck. “Darry was only a child.”
“Aye, and the last of his line as well. The boy would have brought a fine 
ransom, but what does gold mean to a frothing dog like Gregor Clegane? That 
beast’s head would make a noble gift for all the people of the realm, I 
vow.”
Catelyn knew Ser Gregor’s evil reputation, yet 
still . . . “Don’t speak to me of heads, Uncle. Cersei has 
mounted Ned’s on a

spike above the walls of the Red Keep, and left it for the crows and flies.” 
Even now, it was hard for her to believe that he was truly gone. Some nights 
she would wake in darkness, half-asleep, and for an instant expect to find him 
there beside her. “Clegane is no more than Lord Tywin’s catspaw.” For Tywin 
Lannister—Lord of Casterly Rock, Warden of the West, father to Queen 
Cersei, Ser Jaime the Kingslayer, and Tyrion the Imp, and grandfather to 
Joffrey Baratheon, the new-crowned boy king—was the true danger, Catelyn 
believed.
“True enough,” Ser Brynden admitted. “And Tywin Lannister is no man’s fool. 
He sits safe behind the walls of Harrenhal, feeding his host on our harvest and 
burning what he does not take. Gregor is not the only dog he’s loosed. Ser 
Amory Lorch is in the field as well, and some sellsword out of Qohor who’d 
sooner maim a man than kill him. I’ve seen what they leave behind them. Whole 
villages put to the torch, women raped and mutilated, butchered children left 
unburied to draw wolves and wild dogs . . . it would sicken 
even the dead.”
“When Edmure hears this, he will rage.”
“And that will be just as Lord Tywin desires. Even terror has its purpose, 
Cat. Lannister wants to provoke us to battle.”
“Robb is like to give him that wish,” Catelyn said, fretful. “He is restless 
as a cat sitting here, and Edmure and the Greatjon and the others will urge him 
on.” Her son had won two great victories, smashing Jaime Lannister in the 
Whispering Wood and routing his leaderless host outside the walls of Riverrun 
in the

Battle of the Camps, but from the way some of his bannermen spoke of him, he 
might have been Aegon the Conqueror reborn.
Brynden Blackfish arched a bushy grey eyebrow. “More fool they. My first rule 
of war, Cat—never give the enemy his wish. Lord Tywin would 
like to fight on a field of his own choosing. He wants us to march on 
Harrenhal.”
“Harrenhal.” Every child of the Trident knew the tales told of Harrenhal, the 
vast fortress that King Harren the Black had raised beside the waters of Gods 
Eye three hundred years past, when the Seven Kingdoms had been seven 
kingdoms, and the riverlands were ruled by the ironmen from the islands. In his 
pride, Harren had desired the highest hall and tallest towers in all Westeros. 
Forty years it had taken, rising like a great shadow on the shore of the lake 
while Harren’s armies plundered his neighbors for stone, lumber, gold, and 
workers. Thousands of captives died in his quarries, chained to his sledges, or 
laboring on his five colossal towers. Men froze by winter and sweltered in 
summer. Weirwoods that had stood three thousand years were cut down for beams 
and rafters. Harren had beggared the riverlands and the Iron Islands alike to 
ornament his dream. And when at last Harrenhal stood complete, on the very day 
King Harren took up residence, Aegon the Conqueror had come ashore at King’s 
Landing.
Catelyn could remember hearing Old Nan tell the story to her own children, back 
at Winterfell. “And King Harren learned that thick walls and high towers are 
small use against dragons,” the tale always ended. “For dragons 
fly.” Harren and all his line

had perished in the fires that engulfed his monstrous fortress, and every house 
that held Harrenhal since had come to misfortune. Strong it might be, but it 
was a dark place, and cursed.
“I would not have Robb fight a battle in the shadow of that keep,” Catelyn 
admitted. “Yet we must do something, Uncle.”
“And soon,” her uncle agreed. “I have not told you the worst of it, child. 
The men I sent west have brought back word that a new host is gathering at 
Casterly Rock.”
Another Lannister army. The thought made her ill. “Robb must be told 
at once. Who will command?”
“Ser Stafford Lannister, it’s said.” He turned to gaze out over the rivers, 
his red-and-blue cloak stirring in the breeze.
“Another nephew?” The Lannisters of Casterly Rock were a damnably large and 
fertile house.
“Cousin,” Ser Brynden corrected. “Brother to Lord Tywin’s late wife, so 
twice related. An old man and a bit of a dullard, but he has a son, Ser Daven, 
who is more formidable.”
“Then let us hope it is the father and not the son who takes this army into 
the field.”
“We have some time yet before we must face them. This lot will be sellswords, 
freeriders, and green boys from the stews of Lannisport. Ser Stafford must see 
that they are armed and drilled before he dare risk 
battle . . . and make no mistake, Lord Tywin is not the 
Kingslayer. He will not rush in heedless. He will wait patiently for Ser 
Stafford to march before he stirs from behind the walls of Harrenhal.”“Unless . . .” said Catelyn.
“Yes?” Ser Brynden prompted.
“Unless he must leave Harrenhal,” she said, “to face some other 
threat.”
Her uncle looked at her thoughtfully. “Lord Renly.”
“King Renly.” If she would ask help from the man, she would need to 
grant him the style he had claimed for himself.
“Perhaps.” The Blackfish smiled a dangerous smile. “He’ll want something, 
though.”
“He’ll want what kings always want,” she said. “Homage.”

As she slept amidst the rolling grasslands, Catelyn dreamt that Bran was 
whole again, that Arya and Sansa held hands, that Rickon was still a babe at 
her breast. Robb, crownless, played with a wooden sword, and when all were safe 
asleep, she found Ned in her bed, smiling.
Sweet it was, sweet and gone too soon. Dawn came cruel, a dagger of light. She 
woke aching and alone and weary; weary of riding, weary of hurting, weary of 
duty. I want to weep, she thought. I want to be comforted. I’m 
so tired of being strong. I want to be foolish and frightened for once. Just 
for a small while, that’s all . . . a 
day . . . an hour . . .Outside her tent, men were stirring. She heard the whicker of horses, 
Shadd complaining of stiffness in his back, Ser Wendel calling for his bow. 
Catelyn wished they would all go away. They were good men, loyal, yet she was 
tired of them all. It was her children she yearned after. One day, she promised 
herself as she lay abed, one day she would allow herself to be less than 
strong.
But not today. It could not be today.
Her fingers seemed more clumsy than usual as she fumbled on her clothes. She 
supposed she ought to be grateful that she had any use of her hands at all. The 
dagger had been Valyrian steel, and Valyrian steel bites deep and sharp. She 
had only to

look at the scars to remember.
Outside, Shadd was stirring oats into a kettle, while Ser Wendel Manderly sat 
stringing his bow. “My lady,” he said when Catelyn emerged. “There are birds 
in this grass. Would you fancy a roast quail to break your fast this 
morning?”
“Oats and bread are sufficient . . . for all of us, I think. 
We have many leagues yet to ride, Ser Wendel.”
“As you will, my lady.” The knight’s moon face looked crestfallen, the tips 
of his great walrus mustache twitching with disappointment. “Oats and bread, 
and what could be better?” He was one of the fattest men Catelyn had ever 
known, but howevermuch he loved his food, he loved his honor more.
“Found some nettles and brewed a tea,” Shadd announced. “Will m’lady take a 
cup?”
“Yes, with thanks.”
She cradled the tea in her scarred hands and blew on it to cool it. Shadd was 
one of the Winterfell men. Robb had sent twenty of his best to see her safely 
to Renly. He had sent five lordlings as well, whose names and high birth would 
add weight and honor to her mission. As they made their way south, staying well 
clear of towns and holdfasts, they had seen bands of mailed men more than once, 
and glimpsed smoke on the eastern horizon, but none had dared molest them. They 
were too weak to be a threat, too many to be easy prey. Once across the 
Blackwater, the worst was behind. For the past four days, they had seen no 
signs of war.
Catelyn had never wanted this. She had told Robb as

much, back in Riverrun. “When last I saw Renly, he was a boy no older than 
Bran. I do not know him. Send someone else. My place is here with my father, 
for whatever time he has left.”
Her son had looked at her unhappily. “There is no one else. I cannot go 
myself. Your father’s too ill. The Blackfish is my eyes and ears, I dare not 
lose him. Your brother I need to hold Riverrun when we 
march—”
“March?” No one had said a word to her of marching.
“I cannot sit at Riverrun waiting for peace. It makes me look as if I were 
afraid to take the field again. When there are no battles to fight, men start 
to think of hearth and harvest, Father told me that. Even my northmen grow 
restless.”
My northmen, she thought. He is even starting to talk like a 
king. “No one has ever died of restlessness, but rashness is another 
matter. We’ve planted seeds, let them grow.”
Robb shook his head stubbornly. “We’ve tossed some seeds in the wind, that’s 
all. If your sister Lysa was coming to aid us, we would have heard by now. How 
many birds have we sent to the Eyrie, four? I want peace too, but why should 
the Lannisters give me anything if all I do is sit here while my army 
melts away around me swift as summer snow?”
“So rather than look craven, you will dance to Lord Tywin’s pipes?” she threw 
back. “He wants you to march on Harrenhal, ask your uncle Brynden 
if—”
“I said nothing of Harrenhal,” Robb said. “Now, will you go to Renly for me, 
or must I send the Greatjon?”The memory brought a wan smile to her face. Such an obvious ploy, that, 
yet deft for a boy of fifteen. Robb knew how ill-suited a man like Greatjon 
Umber would be to treat with a man like Renly Baratheon, and he knew that she 
knew it as well. What could she do but accede, praying that her father would 
live until her return? Had Lord Hoster been well, he would have gone himself, 
she knew. Still, that leavetaking was hard, hard. He did not even know her when 
she came to say farewell. “Minisa,” he called her, “where are the children? 
My little Cat, my sweet Lysa . . .” Catelyn had kissed him on the 
brow and told him his babes were well. “Wait for me, my lord,” she said as 
his eyes closed. “I waited for you, oh, so many times. Now you must wait for 
me.”
Fate drives me south and south again, Catelyn thought as she sipped 
the astringent tea, when it is north I should be going, north to 
home. She had written to Bran and Rickon, that last night at Riverrun. 
I do not forget you, my sweet ones, you must believe that. It is only that 
your brother needs me more.
“We ought to reach the upper Mander today, my lady,” Ser Wendel announced 
while Shadd spooned out the porridge. “Lord Renly will not be far, if the talk 
be true.”
And what do I tell him when I find him? That my son holds him no true 
king? She did not relish this meeting. They needed friends, not more 
enemies, yet Robb would never bend the knee in homage to a man he felt had no 
claim to the throne.
Her bowl was empty, though she could scarce remember tasting the porridge. She 
laid it aside. “It is time we were away.” The

sooner she spoke to Renly, the sooner she could turn for home. She was the 
first one mounted, and she set the pace for the column. Hal Mollen rode beside 
her, bearing the banner of House Stark, the grey direwolf on an ice-white 
field.
They were still a half day’s ride from Renly’s camp when they were taken. Robin 
Flint had ranged ahead to scout, and he came galloping back with word of a 
far-eyes watching from the roof of a distant windmill. By the time Catelyn’s 
party reached the mill, the man was long gone. They pressed on, covering not 
quite a mile before Renly’s outriders came swooping down on them, twenty men 
mailed and mounted, led by a grizzled greybeard of a knight with bluejays on 
his surcoat.
When he saw her banners, he trotted up to her alone. “My lady,” he called, 
“I am Ser Colen of Greenpools, as it please you. These are dangerous lands you 
cross.”
“Our business is urgent,” she answered him. “I come as envoy from my son, 
Robb Stark, the King in the North, to treat with Renly Baratheon, the King in 
the South.”
“King Renly is the crowned and anointed lord of all the Seven 
Kingdoms, my lady,” Ser Colen answered, though courteously enough. “His Grace 
is encamped with his host near Bitterbridge, where the roseroad crosses the 
Mander. It shall be my great honor to escort you to him.” The knight raised a 
mailed hand, and his men formed a double column flanking Catelyn and her guard. 
Escort or captor? she wondered. There was nothing to be done but 
trust in Ser Colen’s honor, and Lord Renly’s.They saw the smoke of the camp’s fires when they were still an hour from 
the river. Then the sound came drifting across farm and field and rolling 
plain, indistinct as the murmur of some distant sea, but swelling as they rode 
closer. By the time they caught sight of the Mander’s muddy waters glinting in 
the sun, they could make out the voices of men, the clatter of steel, the 
whinny of horses. Yet neither sound nor smoke prepared them for the host 
itself.
Thousands of cookfires filled the air with a pale smoky haze. The horse lines 
alone stretched out over leagues. A forest had surely been felled to make the 
tall staffs that held the banners. Great siege engines lined the grassy verge 
of the roseroad, mangonels and trebuchets and rolling rams mounted on wheels 
taller than a man on horseback. The steel points of pikes flamed red with 
sunlight, as if already blooded, while the pavilions of the knights and high 
lords sprouted from the grass like silken mushrooms. She saw men with spears 
and men with swords, men in steel caps and mail shirts, camp followers 
strutting their charms, archers fletching arrows, teamsters driving wagons, 
swineherds driving pigs, pages running messages, squires honing swords, knights 
riding palfreys, grooms leading ill-tempered destriers. “This is a fearsome 
lot of men,” Ser Wendel Manderly observed as they crossed the ancient stone 
span from which Bitterbridge took its name.
“That it is,” Catelyn agreed.
Near all the chivalry of the south had come to Renly’s call,

it seemed. The golden rose of Highgarden was seen everywhere: sewn on the right 
breast of armsmen and servants, flapping and fluttering from the green silk 
banners that adorned lance and pike, painted upon the shields hung outside the 
pavilions of the sons and brothers and cousins and uncles of House Tyrell. As 
well Catelyn spied the fox-and-flowers of House Florent, Fossoway apples red 
and green, Lord Tarly’s striding huntsman, oak leaves for Oakheart, cranes for 
Crane, a cloud of black-and-orange butterflies for the Mullendores.
Across the Mander, the storm lords had raised their standards—Renly’s 
own bannermen, sworn to House Baratheon and Storm’s End. Catelyn recognized 
Bryce Caron’s nightingales, the Penrose quills, and Lord
Estermont’s sea 
turtle, green on green. Yet for every shield she knew, there were a dozen 
strange to her, borne by the small lords sworn to the bannermen, and by hedge 
knights and freeriders who had come swarming to make Renly Baratheon a king in 
fact as well as name.
Renly’s own standard flew high over all. From the top of his tallest siege 
tower, a wheeled oaken immensity covered with rawhides, streamed the largest 
war banner that Catelyn had ever seen—a cloth big enough to carpet many 
a hall, shimmering gold, with the crowned stag of Baratheon black upon it, 
prancing proud and tall.
“My lady, do you hear that noise?” asked Hallis Mollen, trotting close. 
“What is that?”
She listened. Shouts, and horses screaming, and the clash

of steel, and . . . “Cheering,” she said. They had been 
riding up a gentle slope toward a line of brightly colored pavilions on the 
height. As they passed between them, the press of men grew thicker, the sounds 
louder. And then she saw.
Below, beneath the stone-and-timber battlements of a small castle, a melee was 
in progress.
A field had been cleared off, fences and galleries and tilting barriers thrown 
up. Hundreds were gathered to watch, perhaps thousands. From the looks of the 
grounds, torn and muddy and littered with bits of dinted armor and broken 
lances, they had been at it for a day or more, but now the end was near. Fewer 
than a score of knights remained ahorse, charging and slashing at each other as 
watchers and fallen combatants cheered them on. She saw two destriers collide 
in full armor, going down in a tangle of steel and horseflesh. “A tourney,” 
Hal Mollen declared. He had a penchant for loudly announcing the 
obvious.
“Oh, splendid,” Ser Wendel Manderly said as a knight in a rainbow-striped 
cloak wheeled to deliver a backhand blow with a long-handled axe that shattered 
the shield of the man pursuing him and sent him reeling in his 
stirrups.
The press in front of them made further progress difficult. “Lady Stark,” Ser 
Colen said, “if your men would be so good as to wait here, I’ll present you to 
the king.”
“As you say.” She gave the command, though she had to raise her voice to be 
heard above the tourney din. Ser Colen walked his horse slowly through the 
throngs, with Catelyn riding in his wake.

A roar went up from the crowd as a helmetless red-bearded man with a griffin on 
his shield went down before a big knight in blue armor. His steel was a deep 
cobalt, even the blunt morningstar he wielded with such deadly effect, his 
mount barded in the quartered sun-and-moon heraldry of House Tarth.
“Red Ronnet’s down, gods be damned,” a man cursed.
“Loras’ll do for that blue—” a companion answered before a roar 
drowned out the rest of his words.
Another man was fallen, trapped beneath his injured horse, both of them 
screaming in pain. Squires rushed out to aid them.
This is madness, Catelyn thought. Real enemies on every side and 
half the realm in flames, and Renly sits here playing at war like a boy with 
his first wooden sword.
The lords and ladies in the gallery were as engrossed in the melee as the men 
on the ground. Catelyn marked them well. Her father had oft treated with the 
southron lords, and not a few had been guests at Riverrun. She recognized Lord 
Mathis Rowan, stouter and more florid than ever, the golden tree of his House 
spread across his white doublet. Below him sat Lady Oakheart, tiny and 
delicate, and to her left Lord Randyll Tarly of Horn Hill, his greatsword 
Heartsbane propped up against the back of his seat. Others she knew only by 
their sigils, and some not at all.
In their midst, watching and laughing with his young queen by his side, sat a 
ghost in a golden crown.
Small wonder the lords gather around him with such fervor, she 
thought, he is Robert come again. Renly was handsome as

Robert had been handsome; long of limb and broad of shoulder, with the same 
coal-black hair, fine and straight, the same deep blue eyes, the same easy 
smile. The slender circlet around his brows seemed to suit him well. It was 
soft gold, a ring of roses exquisitely wrought; at the front lifted a stag’s 
head of dark green jade, adorned with golden eyes and golden antlers.
The crowned stag decorated the king’s green velvet tunic as well, worked in 
gold thread upon his chest; the Baratheon sigil in the colors of Highgarden. 
The girl who shared the high seat with him was also of Highgarden: his young 
queen, Margaery, daughter to Lord Mace Tyrell. Their marriage was the mortar 
that held the great southron alliance together, Catelyn knew. Renly was 
one-and-twenty, the girl no older than Robb, very pretty, with a doe’s soft 
eyes and a mane of curling brown hair that fell about her shoulders in lazy 
ringlets. Her smile was shy and sweet.
Out in the field, another man lost his seat to the knight in the 
rainbow-striped cloak, and the king shouted approval with the rest. 
“Loras!” she heard him call. “Loras! Highgarden!” The 
queen clapped her hands together in excitement.
Catelyn turned to see the end of it. Only four men were left in the fight now, 
and there was small doubt whom king and commons favored. She had never met Ser 
Loras Tyrell, but even in the distant north one heard tales of the prowess of 
the young Knight of Flowers. Ser Loras rode a tall white stallion in silver 
mail, and fought with a long-handled axe. A crest of golden roses ran down the 
center of his helm.Two of the other survivors had made common cause. They spurred their 
mounts toward the knight in the cobalt armor. As they closed to either side, 
the blue knight reined hard, smashing one man full in the face with his 
splintered shield while his black destrier lashed out with a steel-shod hoof at 
the other. In a blink, one combatant was unhorsed, the other reeling. The blue 
knight let his broken shield drop to the ground to free his left arm, and then 
the Knight of Flowers was on him. The weight of his steel seemed to 
hardly diminish the grace and quickness with which Ser Loras moved, his rainbow cloak 
swirling about him.
The white horse and the black one wheeled like lovers at a harvest dance, the 
riders throwing steel in place of kisses. Longaxe flashed and morningstar 
whirled. Both weapons were blunted, yet still they raised an awful clangor. 
Shieldless, the blue knight was getting much the worse of it. Ser Loras rained 
down blows on his head and shoulders, to shouts of “Highgarden!” 
from the throng. The other gave answer with his morningstar, but whenever the 
ball came crashing in, Ser Loras interposed his battered green shield, 
emblazoned with three golden roses. When the longaxe caught the blue knight’s 
hand on the backswing and sent the morningstar flying from his grasp, the crowd 
screamed like a rutting beast. The Knight of Flowers raised his axe for the 
final blow.
The blue knight charged into it. The stallions slammed together, the blunted 
axehead smashed against the scarred blue breastplate . . . but 
somehow the blue knight had the haft locked

between steel-gauntleted fingers. He wrenched it from Ser Loras’s hand, and 
suddenly the two were grappling mount-to-mount, and an instant later they were 
falling. As their horses pulled apart, they crashed to the ground with 
bone-jarring force. Loras Tyrell, on the bottom, took the brunt of the impact. 
The blue knight pulled a long dirk free and flicked open Tyrell’s visor. The 
roar of the crowd was too loud for Catelyn to hear what Ser Loras said, but she 
saw the word form on his split, bloody lips. Yield.
The blue knight climbed unsteady to his feet, and raised his dirk in the 
direction of Renly Baratheon, the salute of a champion to his king. Squires 
dashed onto the field to help the vanquished knight to his feet. When they got 
his helm off, Catelyn was startled to see how young he was. He could not have 
had more than two years on Robb. The boy might have been as comely as his sister, 
but the broken lip, unfocused eyes, and blood trickling through his matted hair 
made it hard to be certain.
“Approach,” King Renly called to the champion.
He limped toward the gallery. At close hand, the brilliant blue armor looked 
rather less splendid; everywhere it showed scars, the dents of mace and 
warhammer, the long gouges left by swords, chips in the enameled breastplate 
and helm. His cloak hung in rags. From the way he moved, the man within was no 
less battered. A few voices hailed him with cries of “Tarth!” and, 
oddly, “A Beauty! A Beauty!” but most were silent. The blue knight 
knelt before the king. “Grace,” he said, his voice muffled by his dented 
greathelm.“You are all your lord father claimed you were.” Renly’s voice carried 
over the field. “I’ve seen Ser Loras unhorsed once or 
twice . . . but never quite in that 
fashion.”
“That were no proper unhorsing,” complained a drunken archer nearby, a Tyrell 
rose sewn on his jerkin. “A vile trick, pulling the lad down.”
The press had begun to open up. “Ser Colen,” Catelyn said to her escort, 
“who is this man, and why do they mislike him so?”
Ser Colen frowned. “Because he is no man, my lady. That’s Brienne of Tarth, 
daughter to Lord Selwyn the Evenstar.”
“Daughter?” Catelyn was horrified.
“Brienne the Beauty, they name her . . . though not to her 
face, lest they be called upon to defend those words with their 
bodies.”
She heard King Renly declare the Lady Brienne of Tarth the victor of the great 
melee at Bitterbridge, last mounted of one hundred sixteen knights. “As 
champion, you may ask of me any boon that you desire. If it lies in my power, 
it is yours.”
“Your Grace,” Brienne answered, “I ask the honor of a place among your 
Rainbow Guard. I would be one of your seven, and pledge my life to yours, to go 
where you go, ride at your side, and keep you safe from all hurt and 
harm.”
“Done,” he said. “Rise, and remove your helm.”
She did as he bid her. And when the greathelm was lifted, Catelyn understood 
Ser Colen’s words.
Beauty, they called her . . . mocking. The hair beneath the

visor was a squirrel’s nest of dirty straw, and her 
face . . . Brienne’s eyes were large and very blue, a young 
girl’s eyes, trusting and guileless, but the rest . . . her 
features were broad and coarse, her teeth prominent and crooked, her mouth too 
wide, her lips so plump they seemed swollen. A thousand freckles speckled her 
cheeks and brow, and her nose had been broken more than once. Pity filled 
Catelyn’s heart. Is there any creature on earth as unfortunate as an ugly 
woman?
And yet, when Renly cut away her torn cloak and fastened a rainbow in its 
place, Brienne of Tarth did not look unfortunate. Her smile lit up her face, 
and her voice was strong and proud as she said, “My life for yours, Your 
Grace. From this day on, I am your shield, I swear it by the old gods and the 
new.” The way she looked at the king—looked down at him, she 
was a good hand higher, though Renly was near as tall as his brother had 
been—was painful to see.
“Your Grace!” Ser Colen of Greenpools swung down off his horse to approach 
the gallery. “I beg your leave.” He went to one knee. “I have the honor to 
bring you the Lady Catelyn Stark, sent as envoy by her son Robb, Lord of 
Winterfell.”
“Lord of Winterfell and King in the North, ser,” Catelyn corrected him. She 
dismounted and moved to Ser Colen’s side.
King Renly looked surprised. “Lady Catelyn? We are most pleased.” He turned 
to his young queen. “Margaery my sweet, this is the Lady Catelyn Stark of 
Winterfell.”
“You are most welcome here, Lady Stark,” the girl said, all

soft courtesy. “I am sorry for your loss.”
“You are kind,” said Catelyn.
“My lady, I swear to you, I will see that the Lannisters answer for your 
husband’s murder,” the king declared. “When I take King’s Landing, I’ll send 
you Cersei’s head.”
And will that bring my Ned back to me? she thought. “It will be 
enough to know that justice has been done, my lord.”
“Your Grace,” Brienne the Blue corrected sharply. “And you should 
kneel when you approach the king.”
“The distance between a lord and a grace is a small one, 
my lady,” Catelyn said. “Lord Renly wears a crown, as does my son. If you 
wish, we may stand here in the mud and debate what honors and titles are 
rightly due to each, but it strikes me that we have more pressing matters to 
consider.”
Some of Renly’s lords bristled at that, but the king only laughed. “Well said, 
my lady. There will be time enough for graces when these wars are 
done. Tell me, when does your son mean to march against Harrenhal?”
Until she knew whether this king was friend or foe, Catelyn was not about to 
reveal the least part of Robb’s dispositions. “I do not sit on my son’s war 
councils, my lord.”
“So long as he leaves a few Lannisters for me, I’ll not complain. What has he 
done with the Kingslayer?”
“Jaime Lannister is held prisoner at Riverrun.”
“Still alive?” Lord Mathis Rowan seemed dismayed.
Bemused, Renly said, “It would seem the direwolf is gentler

than the lion.”
“Gentler than the Lannisters,” murmured Lady Oakheart with a bitter smile, 
“is drier than the sea.”
“I call it weak.” Lord Randyll Tarly had a short, bristly grey beard and a 
reputation for blunt speech. “No disrespect to you, Lady Stark, but it would 
have been more seemly had Lord Robb come to pay homage to the king himself, 
rather than hiding behind his mother’s skirts.”
“King Robb is warring, my lord,” Catelyn replied with icy courtesy, 
“not playing at tourney.”
Renly grinned. “Go softly, Lord Randyll, I fear you’re overmatched.” He 
summoned a steward in the livery of Storm’s End. “Find a place for the lady’s 
companions, and see that they have every comfort. Lady Catelyn shall have my 
own pavilion. Since Lord Caswell has been so kind as to give me use of his 
castle, I have no need of it. My lady, when you are rested, I would be honored 
if you would share our meat and mead at the feast Lord Caswell is giving us 
tonight. A farewell feast. I fear his lordship is eager to see the heels of my 
hungry horde.”
“Not true, Your Grace,” protested a wispy young man who must have been 
Caswell. “What is mine is yours.”
“Whenever someone said that to my brother Robert, he took them at their 
word,” Renly said. “Do you have daughters?”
“Yes, Your Grace. Two.”
“Then thank the gods that I am not Robert. My sweet queen is all the woman I 
desire.” Renly held out his hand to help

Margaery to her feet. “We’ll talk again when you’ve had a chance to refresh 
yourself, Lady Catelyn.”
Renly led his bride back toward the castle while his steward conducted Catelyn 
to the king’s green silk pavilion. “If you have need of anything, you have 
only to ask, my lady.”
Catelyn could scarcely imagine what she might need that had not already been 
provided. The pavilion was larger than the common rooms of many an inn and 
furnished with every comfort: feather mattress and sleeping furs, a 
wood-and-copper tub large enough for two, braziers to keep off the night’s 
chill, slung leather camp chairs, a writing table with quills and inkpot, bowls 
of peaches, plums, and pears, a flagon of wine with a set of matched silver 
cups, cedar chests packed full of Renly’s clothing, books, maps, game boards, a 
high harp, a tall bow and a quiver of arrows, a pair of red-tailed hunting 
hawks, a veritable armory of fine weapons. He does not stint himself, this 
Renly, she thought as she looked about. Small wonder this host moves 
so slowly.
Beside the entrance, the king’s armor stood sentry; a suit of forest-green 
plate, its fittings chased with gold, the helm crowned by a great rack of 
golden antlers. The steel was polished to such a high sheen that she could see 
her reflection in the breastplate, gazing back at her as if from the bottom of 
a deep green pond. The face of a drowned woman, Catelyn thought. 
Can you drown in grief? She turned away sharply, angry with her own 
frailty. She had no time for the luxury of self-pity. She must wash the dust 
from her hair and change into a gown more fitting

for a king’s feast.
Ser Wendel Manderly, Lucas Blackwood, Ser Perwyn Frey, and the rest of her 
highborn companions accompanied her to the castle. The great hall of Lord 
Caswell’s keep was great only by courtesy, yet room was found on the crowded 
benches for Catelyn’s men, amidst Renly’s own knights. Catelyn was assigned a 
place on the dais between red-faced Lord Mathis Rowan and genial Ser Jon 
Fossoway of the green-apple Fossoways. Ser Jon made jests, while Lord Mathis 
inquired politely after the health of her father, brother, and 
children.
Brienne of Tarth had been seated at the far end of the high table. She did not 
gown herself as a lady, but chose a knight’s finery instead, a velvet doublet 
quartered rose-and-azure, breeches and boots and a fine-tooled swordbelt, her 
new rainbow cloak flowing down her back. No garb could disguise her plainness, 
though; the huge freckled hands, the wide flat face, the thrust of her teeth. 
Out of armor, her body seemed ungainly, broad of hip and thick of limb, with 
hunched muscular
shoulders but no bosom to speak of. And it was clear from her 
every action that Brienne knew it, and suffered for it. She spoke only in 
answer, and seldom lifted her gaze from her food.
Of food there was plenty. The war had not touched the fabled bounty of 
Highgarden. While singers sang and tumblers tumbled, they began with pears 
poached in wine, and went on to tiny savory fish rolled in salt and cooked 
crisp, and capons stuffed with onions and mushrooms. There were great loaves of

brown bread, mounds of turnips and sweetcorn and pease, immense hams and roast 
geese and trenchers dripping full of venison stewed with beer and barley. For 
the sweet, Lord Caswell’s servants brought down trays of pastries from his 
castle kitchens, cream swans and spun-sugar unicorns, lemon cakes in the shape 
of roses, spiced honey biscuits and blackberry tarts, apple crisps and wheels 
of buttery cheese.
The rich foods made Catelyn queasy, but it would never do to show frailty when 
so much depended on her strength. She ate sparingly, while she watched this man 
who would be king. Renly sat with his young bride on his left hand and her 
brother on the right. Apart from the white linen bandage around his brow, Ser 
Loras seemed none the worse for the day’s misadventures. He was indeed as 
comely as Catelyn had suspected he might be. When not glazed, his eyes were 
lively and intelligent, his hair an artless tumble of brown locks that many a 
maid might have envied. He had replaced his tattered tourney cloak with a new 
one; the same brilliantly striped silk of Renly’s Rainbow Guard, clasped with 
the golden rose of Highgarden.
From time to time, King Renly would feed Margaery some choice morsel off the 
point of his dagger, or lean over to plant the lightest of kisses on her cheek, 
but it was Ser Loras who shared most of his jests and confidences. The king 
enjoyed his food and drink, that was plain to see, yet he seemed neither 
glutton nor drunkard. He laughed often, and well, and spoke amiably to highborn 
lords and lowly serving wenches alike.Some of his guests were less moderate. They drank too much and boasted 
too loudly, to her mind. Lord Willum’s sons Josua and Elyas disputed heatedly 
about who would be first over the walls of King’s Landing. Lord Varner dandled 
a serving girl on his lap, nuzzling at her neck while one hand went exploring 
down her bodice. Guyard the Green, who fancied himself a singer, diddled a harp 
and gave them a verse about tying lions’ tails in knots, parts of which rhymed. 
Ser Mark Mullendore brought a black-and-white monkey and fed him morsels from 
his own plate, while Ser Tanton of the red-apple Fossoways climbed on the table 
and swore to slay Sandor Clegane in single combat. The vow might have been 
taken more solemnly if Ser Tanton had not had one foot in a gravy boat when he 
made it.
The height of folly was reached when a plump fool came capering out in 
gold-painted tin with a cloth lion’s head, and chased a dwarf around the 
tables, whacking him over the head with a bladder. Finally King Renly demanded 
to know why he was beating his brother. “Why, Your Grace, I’m the Kinslayer,” 
the fool said.
“It’s Kingslayer, fool of a fool,” Renly said, and the hall rang 
with laughter.
Lord Rowan beside her did not join the merriment. “They are all so young,” he 
said.
It was true. The Knight of Flowers could not have reached his second name day 
when Robert slew Prince Rhaegar on the Trident. Few of the others were very 
much older. They had been babes during the Sack of King’s Landing, and no more 
than boys

when Balon Greyjoy raised the Iron Islands in rebellion. They are still 
unblooded, Catelyn thought as she watched Lord Bryce goad Ser Robar into 
juggling a brace of daggers. It is all a game to them still, a tourney 
writ large, and all they see is the chance for glory and honor and spoils. They 
are boys drunk on song and story, and like all boys, they think themselves 
immortal.
“War will make them old,” Catelyn said, “as it did us.” She had been a girl 
when Robert and Ned and Jon Arryn raised their banners against Aerys Targaryen, 
a woman by the time the fighting was done. “I pity them.”
“Why?” Lord Rowan asked her. “Look at them. They’re young and strong, full 
of life and laughter. And lust, aye, more lust than they know what to do with. 
There will be many a bastard bred this night, I promise you. Why 
pity?”
“Because it will not last,” Catelyn answered, sadly. “Because they are the 
knights of summer, and winter is coming.”
“Lady Catelyn, you are wrong.” Brienne regarded her with eyes as blue as her 
armor. “Winter will never come for the likes of us. Should we die in battle, 
they will surely sing of us, and it’s always summer in the songs. In the songs 
all knights are gallant, all maids are beautiful, and the sun is always 
shining.”
Winter comes for all of us, Catelyn thought. For me, it came 
when Ned died. It will come for you too, child, and sooner than you like. 
She did not have the heart to say it.
The king saved her. “Lady Catelyn,” Renly called down. “I feel the need of 
some air. Will you walk with me?”Catelyn stood at once. “I should be honored.”
Brienne was on her feet as well. “Your Grace, give me but a moment to don my 
mail. You should not be without protection.”
King Renly smiled. “If I am not safe in the heart of Lord Caswell’s castle, 
with my own host around me, one sword will make no 
matter . . . not even your sword, Brienne. Sit and 
eat. If I have need of you, I’ll send for you.”
His words seemed to strike the girl harder than any blow she had taken that 
afternoon. “As you will, Your Grace.” Brienne sat, eyes downcast. Renly took 
Catelyn’s arm and led her from the hall, past a slouching guardsman who 
straightened so hurriedly that he near dropped his spear. Renly clapped the man 
on the shoulder and made a jest of it.
“This way, my lady.” The king took her through a low door into a stair tower. 
As they started up, he said, “Perchance, is Ser Barristan Selmy with your son 
at Riverrun?”
“No,” she answered, puzzled. “Is he no longer with Joffrey? He was the Lord 
Commander of the Kingsguard.”
Renly shook his head. “The Lannisters told him he was too old and gave his 
cloak to the Hound. I’m told he left King’s Landing vowing to take up service 
with the true king. That cloak Brienne claimed today was the one I was keeping 
for Selmy, in hopes that he might offer me his sword. When he did not turn up 
at Highgarden, I thought perhaps he had gone to Riverrun instead.”
“We have not seen him.”
“He was old, yes, but a good man still. I hope he has not

come to harm. The Lannisters are great fools.” They climbed a few more steps. 
“On the night of Robert’s death, I offered your husband a hundred swords and 
urged him to take Joffrey into his power. Had he listened, he would be regent 
today, and there would have been no need for me to claim the 
throne.”
“Ned refused you.” She did not have to be told.
“He had sworn to protect Robert’s children,” Renly said. “I lacked the 
strength to act alone, so when Lord Eddard turned me away, I had no choice but 
to flee. Had I stayed, I knew the queen would see to it that I did not long 
outlive my brother.”
Had you stayed, and lent your support to Ned, he might still be 
alive, Catelyn thought bitterly.
“I liked your husband well enough, my lady. He was a loyal friend to Robert, I 
know . . . but he would not listen and he would not bend. Here, 
I wish to show you something.” They had reached the top of the stairwell. 
Renly pushed open a wooden door, and they stepped out onto the roof.
Lord Caswell’s keep was scarcely tall enough to call a tower, but the country 
was low and flat and Catelyn could see for leagues in all directions. Wherever 
she looked, she saw fires. They covered the earth like fallen stars, and like 
the stars there was no end to them. “Count them if you like, my lady,” Renly 
said quietly. “You will still be counting when dawn breaks in the east. How 
many fires burn around Riverrun tonight, I wonder?”
Catelyn could hear faint music drifting from the Great Hall, seeping out into 
the night. She dare not count the stars.“I’m told your son crossed the Neck with twenty thousand swords at his 
back,” Renly went on. “Now that the lords of the Trident are with him, 
perhaps he commands forty thousand.”
No, she thought, not near so many, we have lost men in battle, 
and others to the harvest.
“I have twice that number here,” Renly said, “and this is only part of my 
strength. Mace Tyrell remains at Highgarden with another ten thousand, I have a 
strong garrison holding Storm’s End, and soon enough the Dornishmen will join 
me with all their power. And never forget my brother Stannis, who holds 
Dragonstone and commands the lords of the narrow sea.”
“It would seem that you are the one who has forgotten Stannis,” Catelyn said, 
more sharply than she’d intended.
“His claim, you mean?” Renly laughed. “Let us be blunt, my lady. Stannis 
would make an appalling king. Nor is he like to become one. Men respect 
Stannis, even fear him, but precious few have ever loved him.”
“He is still your elder brother. If either of you can be said to have a right 
to the Iron Throne, it must be Lord Stannis.”
Renly shrugged. “Tell me, what right did my brother Robert ever have to the 
Iron Throne?” He did not wait for an answer. “Oh, there was talk of the blood 
ties between Baratheon and Targaryen, of weddings a hundred years past, of 
second sons and elder daughters. No one but the maesters care about any of it. 
Robert won the throne with his warhammer.” He swept a hand across the 
campfires that burned from horizon to horizon. “Well, there

is my claim, as good as Robert’s ever was. If your son supports me as his 
father supported Robert, he’ll not find me ungenerous. I will gladly confirm 
him in all his lands, titles, and honors. He can rule in Winterfell as he 
pleases. He can even go on calling himself King in the North if he likes, so 
long as he bends the knee and does me homage as his overlord. King is 
only a word, but fealty, loyalty, service . . . those I must 
have.”
“And if he will not give them to you, my lord?”
“I mean to be king, my lady, and not of a broken kingdom. I cannot say it 
plainer than that. Three hundred years ago, a Stark king knelt to Aegon the 
Dragon, when he saw he could not hope to prevail. That was wisdom. Your son 
must be wise as well. Once he joins me, this war is good as done. We—” 
Renly broke off suddenly, distracted. “What’s this now?”
The rattle of chains heralded the raising of the portcullis. Down in the yard 
below, a rider in a winged helm urged his well-lathered horse under the spikes. 
“Summon the king!” he called.
Renly vaulted up into a crenel. “I’m here, ser.”
“Your Grace.” The rider spurred his mount closer. “I came swift as I could. 
From Storm’s End. We are besieged, Your Grace, Ser Cortnay defies them, 
but . . .”
“But . . . that’s not possible. I would have been told if Lord 
Tywin left Harrenhal.”
“These are no Lannisters, my liege. It’s Lord Stannis at your gates. 
King Stannis, he calls himself now.”

The meeting place was a grassy sward dotted with pale grey mushrooms and 
the raw stumps of felled trees.
“We are the first, my lady,” Hallis Mollen said as they reined up amidst the 
stumps, alone between the armies. The direwolf banner of House Stark flapped 
and fluttered atop the lance he bore. Catelyn could not see the sea from here, 
but she could feel how close it was. The smell of salt was heavy on the wind 
gusting from the east.Stannis Baratheon’s foragers had cut the trees down for his siege towers 
and catapults. Catelyn wondered how long the grove had stood, and whether Ned 
had rested here when he led his host south to lift the last siege of Storm’s 
End. He had won a great victory that day, all the greater for being 
bloodless.
Gods grant that I shall do the same, Catelyn prayed. Her own liege 
men thought she was mad even to come. “This is no fight of ours, my lady,” 
Ser Wendel Manderly had said. “I know the king would not wish his mother to 
put herself at risk.”
“We are all at risk,” she told him, perhaps too sharply. “Do you think I 
wish to be here, ser?” I belong at Riverrun with my dying father, at 
Winterfell with my sons. “Robb sent me south to speak for him, and speak 
for him I shall.” It would be no easy thing to forge a peace between these 
brothers, Catelyn knew, yet

for the good of the realm, it must be tried.
Across rain-sodden fields and stony ridges, she could see the great castle of 
Storm’s End rearing up against the sky, its back to the unseen sea. Beneath 
that mass of pale grey stone, the encircling army of Lord Stannis Baratheon 
looked as small and insignificant as mice with banners.
The songs said that Storm’s End had been raised in ancient days by Durran, the 
first Storm King, who had won the love of the fair Elenei, daughter of the sea 
god and the goddess of the wind. On the night of their wedding, Elenei had 
yielded her maidenhood to a mortal’s love and thus doomed herself to a mortal’s 
death, and her grieving parents had unleashed their wrath and sent the winds 
and waters to batter down Durran’s hold. His friends and brothers and wedding 
guests were crushed beneath collapsing walls or blown out to sea, but Elenei 
sheltered Durran within her arms so he took no harm, and when the dawn came at 
last he declared war upon the gods and vowed to rebuild.
Five more castles he built, each larger and stronger than the last, only to see 
them smashed asunder when the gale winds came howling up Shipbreaker Bay, 
driving great walls of water before them. His lords pleaded with him to build 
inland; his priests told him he must placate the gods by giving Elenei back to 
the sea; even his smallfolk begged him to relent. Durran would have none of it. 
A seventh castle he raised, most massive of all. Some said the children of the 
forest helped him build it, shaping the stones with magic; others claimed that 
a small boy told him

what he must do, a boy who would grow to be Bran the Builder. No matter how the 
tale was told, the end was the same. Though the angry gods threw storm after 
storm against it, the seventh castle stood defiant, and Durran Godsgrief and 
fair Elenei dwelt there together until the end of their days.
Gods do not forget, and still the gales came raging up the narrow sea. Yet 
Storm’s End endured, through centuries and tens of centuries, a castle like no 
other. Its great curtain wall was a hundred feet high, unbroken by arrow slit 
or postern, everywhere rounded, curving, smooth, its stones fit so 
cunningly together that nowhere was crevice nor angle nor gap by which the wind 
might enter. That wall was said to be forty feet thick at its narrowest, and 
near eighty on the seaward face, a double course of stones with an inner core 
of sand and rubble. Within that mighty bulwark, the kitchens and stables and 
yards sheltered safe from wind and wave. Of towers, there was but one, a 
colossal drum tower, windowless where it faced the sea, so large that it was 
granary and barracks and feast hall and lord’s dwelling all in one, crowned by 
massive battlements that made it look from afar like a spiked fist atop an 
upthrust arm.
“My lady,” Hal Mollen called. Two riders had emerged from the tidy little 
camp beneath the castle, and were coming toward them at a slow walk. “That 
will be King Stannis.”
“No doubt.” Catelyn watched them come. Stannis it must be, yet that is 
not the Baratheon banner. It was a bright yellow, not the rich gold of 
Renly’s standards, and the device it bore was

red, though she could not make out its shape.
Renly would be last to arrive. He had told her as much when she set out. He did 
not propose to mount his horse until he saw his brother well on his way. The 
first to arrive must wait on the other, and Renly would do no waiting. It 
is a sort of game kings play, she told herself. Well, she was no king, so 
she need not play it. Catelyn was practiced at waiting.
As he neared, she saw that Stannis wore a crown of red gold with points 
fashioned in the shape of flames. His belt was studded with garnets and yellow 
topaz, and a great square-cut ruby was set in the hilt of the sword he wore. 
Otherwise his dress was plain: studded leather jerkin over quilted doublet, 
worn boots, breeches of brown roughspun. The device on his sun-yellow banner 
showed a red heart surrounded by a blaze of orange fire. The crowned stag was 
there, yes . . . shrunken and enclosed within the heart. Even 
more curious was his standard bearer—a woman, garbed all in reds, face 
shadowed within the deep hood of her scarlet cloak. A red priestess, 
Catelyn thought, wondering. The sect was numerous and powerful in the Free 
Cities and the distant east, but there were few in the Seven 
Kingdoms.
“Lady Stark,” Stannis Baratheon said with chill courtesy as he reined up. He 
inclined his head, balder than she remembered.
“Lord Stannis,” she returned.
Beneath the tight-trimmed beard his heavy jaw clenched hard, yet he did not 
hector her about titles. For that she was duly grateful. “I had not thought to 
find you at Storm’s End.”“I had not thought to be here.”
His deepset eyes regarded her uncomfortably. This was not a man made for easy 
courtesies. “I am sorry for your lord’s death,” he said, “though Eddard 
Stark was no friend to me.”
“He was never your enemy, my lord. When the Lords Tyrell and Redwyne held you 
prisoned in that castle, starving, it was Eddard Stark who broke the 
siege.”
“At my brother’s command, not for love of me,” Stannis answered. “Lord 
Eddard did his duty, I will not deny it. Did I ever do less? I should 
have been Robert’s Hand.”
“That was your brother’s will. Ned never wanted it.”
“Yet he took it. That which should have been mine. Still, I give you my word, 
you shall have justice for his murder.”
How they loved to promise heads, these men who would be king. “Your 
brother promised me the same. But if truth be told, I would sooner have my 
daughters back, and leave justice to the gods. Cersei still holds my Sansa, and 
of Arya there has been no word since the day of Robert’s death.”
“If your children are found when I take the city, they shall be sent to you.” 
Alive or dead, his tone implied.
“And when shall that be, Lord Stannis? King’s Landing is close to your 
Dragonstone, but I find you here instead.”
“You are frank, Lady Stark. Very well, I’ll answer you frankly. To take the 
city, I need the power of these southron lords I see across the field. My 
brother has them. I must needs take them from him.”“Men give their allegiance where they will, my lord. These lords swore 
fealty to Robert and House Baratheon. If you and your brother were to put aside 
your quarrel—”
“I have no quarrel with Renly, should he prove dutiful. I am his elder, and 
his king. I want only what is mine by rights. Renly owes me loyalty and 
obedience. I mean to have it. From him, and from these other lords.” Stannis 
studied her face. “And what cause brings you to this field, my lady? Has House 
Stark cast its lot with my brother, is that the way of it?”
This one will never bend, she thought, yet she must try nonetheless. 
Too much was at stake. “My son reigns as King in the North, by the will of our 
lords and people. He bends the knee to no man, but holds out the hand of 
friendship to all.”
“Kings have no friends,” Stannis said bluntly, “only subjects and 
enemies.”
“And brothers,” a cheerful voice called out behind her. Catelyn glanced over 
her shoulder as Lord Renly’s palfrey picked her way through the stumps. The 
younger Baratheon was splendid in his green velvet doublet and satin cloak 
trimmed in vair. The crown of golden roses girded his temples, jade stag’s head 
rising over his forehead, long black hair spilling out beneath. Jagged chunks 
of black diamond studded his swordbelt, and a chain of gold and emeralds looped 
around his neck.
Renly had chosen a woman to carry his banner as well, though Brienne hid face 
and form behind plate armor that gave no hint of her sex. Atop her twelve-foot 
lance, the crowned stag pranced

black-on-gold as the wind off the sea rippled the cloth.
His brother’s greeting was curt. “Lord Renly.”
“King Renly. Can that truly be you, Stannis?”
Stannis frowned. “Who else should it be?”
Renly gave an easy shrug. “When I saw that standard, I could not be certain. 
Whose banner do you bear?”
“Mine own.”
The red-clad priestess spoke up. “The king has taken for his sigil the fiery 
heart of the Lord of Light.”
Renly seemed amused by that. “All for the good. If we both use the same 
banner, the battle will be terribly confused.”
Catelyn said, “Let us hope there will be no battle. We three share a common 
foe who would destroy us all.”
Stannis studied her, unsmiling. “The Iron Throne is mine by rights. All those 
who deny that are my foes.”
“The whole of the realm denies it, brother,” said Renly. “Old men deny it 
with their death rattle, and unborn children deny it in their mothers’ wombs. 
They deny it in Dorne and they deny it on the Wall. No one wants you for their 
king. Sorry.”
Stannis clenched his jaw, his face taut. “I swore I would never treat with you 
while you wore your traitor’s crown. Would that I had kept to that 
vow.”
“This is folly,” Catelyn said sharply. “Lord Tywin sits at Harrenhal with 
twenty thousand swords. The remnants of the Kingslayer’s army have regrouped at 
the Golden Tooth, another Lannister host gathers beneath the shadow of Casterly 
Rock, and

Cersei and her son hold King’s Landing and your precious Iron Throne. You each 
name yourself king, yet the kingdom bleeds, and no one lifts a sword 
to defend it but my son.”
Renly shrugged. “Your son has won a few battles. I shall win the war. The 
Lannisters can wait my pleasure.”
“If you have proposals to make, make them,” Stannis said brusquely, “or I 
will be gone.”
“Very well,” said Renly. “I propose that you dismount, bend your knee, and 
swear me your allegiance.”
Stannis choked back rage. “That you shall never have.”
“You served Robert, why not me?”
“Robert was my elder brother. You are the younger.”
“Younger, bolder, and far more comely . . .”
“. . . and a thief and a usurper besides.”
Renly shrugged. “The Targaryens called Robert usurper. He seemed to be able to 
bear the shame. So shall I.”
This will not do. “Listen to yourselves! If you were sons of mine, I 
would bang your heads together and lock you in a bedchamber until you 
remembered that you were brothers.”
Stannis frowned at her. “You presume too much, Lady Stark. I am the rightful 
king, and your son no less a traitor than my brother here. His day will come as 
well.”
The naked threat fanned her fury. “You are very free to name others traitor 
and usurper, my lord, yet how are you any different? You say you alone are the 
rightful king, yet it seems to me that Robert had two sons. By all the laws of 
the Seven

Kingdoms, Prince Joffrey is his rightful heir, and Tommen after 
him . . . and we are all traitors, however good our 
reasons.”
Renly laughed. “You must forgive Lady Catelyn, Stannis. She’s come all the way 
down from Riverrun, a long way ahorse. I fear she never saw your little 
letter.”
“Joffrey is not my brother’s seed,” Stannis said bluntly. “Nor is Tommen. 
They are bastards. The girl as well. All three of them abominations born of 
incest.”
Would even Cersei be so mad? Catelyn was speechless.
“Isn’t that a sweet story, my lady?” Renly asked. “I was camped at Horn Hill 
when Lord Tarly received his letter, and I must say, it took my breath away.” 
He smiled at his brother. “I had never suspected you were so clever, Stannis. 
Were it only true, you would indeed be Robert’s heir.”
“Were it true? Do you name me a liar?”
“Can you prove any word of this fable?”
Stannis ground his teeth.
Robert could never have known, Catelyn thought, or Cersei would 
have lost her head in an instant. “Lord Stannis,” she asked, “if you 
knew the queen to be guilty of such monstrous crimes, why did you keep 
silent?”
“I did not keep silent,” Stannis declared. “I brought my suspicions to Jon 
Arryn.”
“Rather than your own brother?”
“My brother’s regard for me was never more than dutiful,” said Stannis. 
“From me, such accusations would have seemed

peevish and self-serving, a means of placing myself first in the line of 
succession. I believed Robert would be more disposed to listen if the charges 
came from Lord Arryn, whom he loved.”
“Ah,” said Renly. “So we have the word of a dead man.”
“Do you think he died by happenstance, you purblind fool? Cersei had him 
poisoned, for fear he would reveal her. Lord Jon had been gathering certain 
proofs—”
“—which doubtless died with him. How inconvenient.”
Catelyn was remembering, fitting pieces together. “My sister Lysa accused the 
queen of killing her husband in a letter she sent me at Winterfell,” she 
admitted. “Later, in the Eyrie, she laid the murder at the feet of the queen’s 
brother Tyrion.”
Stannis snorted. “If you step in a nest of snakes, does it matter which one 
bites you first?”
“All this of snakes and incest is droll, but it changes nothing. You may well 
have the better claim, Stannis, but I still have the larger army.” Renly’s 
hand slid inside his cloak. Stannis saw, and reached at once for the hilt of 
his sword, but before he could draw steel his brother 
produced . . . a peach. “Would you like one, brother?” Renly 
asked, smiling. “From Highgarden. You’ve never tasted anything so sweet, I 
promise you.” He took a bite. Juice ran from the corner of his 
mouth.
“I did not come here to eat fruit.” Stannis was fuming.
“My lords!” Catelyn said. “We ought to be hammering out the terms 
of an alliance, not trading taunts.”
“A man should never refuse to taste a peach,” Renly said as

he tossed the stone away. “He may never get the chance again. Life is short, 
Stannis. Remember what the Starks say. Winter is coming.” He wiped his mouth 
with the back of his hand.
“I did not come here to be threatened, either.”
“Nor were you,” Renly snapped back. “When I make threats, you’ll know it. If 
truth be told, I’ve never liked you, Stannis, but you are my own 
blood, and I have no wish to slay you. So if it is Storm’s End you want, take 
it . . . as a brother’s gift. As Robert once gave it to me, I 
give it to you.”
“It is not yours to give. It is mine by rights.”
Sighing, Renly half turned in the saddle. “What am I to do with this brother 
of mine, Brienne? He refuses my peach, he refuses my castle, he even shunned my 
wedding . . .”
“We both know your wedding was a mummer’s farce. A year ago you were scheming 
to make the girl one of Robert’s whores.”
“A year ago I was scheming to make the girl Robert’s queen,” Renly said, 
“but what does it matter? The boar got Robert and I got Margaery. You’ll be 
pleased to know she came to me a maid.”
“In your bed she’s like to die that way.”
“Oh, I expect I’ll get a son on her within the year. Pray, how many sons do 
you have, Stannis? Oh, yes—none.” Renly smiled innocently. “As to your 
daughter, I understand. If my wife looked like yours, I’d send my fool to 
service her as well.”
“Enough!” Stannis roared. “I will not be mocked to my face, do you 
hear me? I will not!” He yanked his longsword from its scabbard. The 
steel gleamed strangely bright in the wan sunlight,

now red, now yellow, now blazing white. The air around it seemed to shimmer, as 
if from heat.
Catelyn’s horse whinnied and backed away a step, but Brienne moved between the 
brothers, her own blade in hand. “Put up your steel!” she shouted at 
Stannis.
Cersei Lannister is laughing herself breathless, Catelyn thought 
wearily.
Stannis pointed his shining sword at his brother. “I am not without mercy,” 
thundered he who was notoriously without mercy. “Nor do I wish to sully 
Lightbringer with a brother’s blood. For the sake of the mother who bore us 
both, I will give you this night to rethink your folly, Renly. Strike your 
banners and come to me before dawn, and I will grant you Storm’s End and your 
old seat on the council and even name you my heir until a son is born to me. 
Otherwise, I shall destroy you.”
Renly laughed. “Stannis, that’s a very pretty sword, I’ll grant you, but I 
think the glow off it has ruined your eyes. Look across the fields, brother. 
Can you see all those banners?”
“Do you think a few bolts of cloth will make you king?”
“Tyrell swords will make me king. Rowan and Tarly and Caron will make me king, 
with axe and mace and warhammer. Tarth arrows and Penrose lances, Fossoway, 
Cuy, Mullendore, Estermont, Selmy, Hightower, Oakheart, Crane, Caswell, 
Blackbar, Morrigen, Beesbury, Shermer, Dunn, Footly . . . even 
House Florent, your own wife’s brothers and uncles, they will make me king. All 
the chivalry of the south rides with me, and that is the least part of my 
power. My

foot is coming behind, a hundred thousand swords and spears and pikes. And you 
will destroy me? With what, pray? That paltry rabble I see there 
huddled under the castle walls? I’ll call them five thousand and be generous, 
codfish lords and onion knights and sellswords. Half of them are like to come 
over to me before the battle starts. You have fewer than four hundred horse, my 
scouts tell me—freeriders in boiled leather who will not stand an 
instant against armored lances. I do not care how seasoned a warrior you think 
you are, Stannis, that host of yours won’t survive the first charge of my 
vanguard.”
“We shall see, brother.” Some of the light seemed to go out of the world when 
Stannis slid his sword back into its scabbard. “Come the dawn, we shall 
see.”
“I hope your new god’s a merciful one, brother.”
Stannis snorted and galloped away, disdainful. The red priestess lingered a 
moment behind. “Look to your own sins, Lord Renly,” she said as she wheeled 
her horse around.
Catelyn and Lord Renly returned together to the camp where his thousands and 
her few waited their return. “That was amusing, if not terribly profitable,” 
he commented. “I wonder where I can get a sword like that? Well, doubtless 
Loras will make me a gift of it after the battle. It grieves me that it must 
come to this.”
“You have a cheerful way of grieving,” said Catelyn, whose distress was not 
feigned.
“Do I?” Renly shrugged. “So be it. Stannis was never the most cherished of 
brothers, I confess. Do you suppose this tale

of his is true? If Joffrey is the Kingslayer’s get—”
“—your brother is the lawful heir.”
“While he lives,” Renly admitted. “Though it’s a fool’s law, wouldn’t you 
agree? Why the oldest son, and not the best-fitted? The crown will suit me, as 
it never suited Robert and would not suit Stannis. I have it in me to be a 
great king, strong yet generous, clever, just, diligent, loyal to my friends 
and terrible to my enemies, yet capable of forgiveness, 
patient—”
“—humble?” Catelyn supplied.
Renly laughed. “You must allow a king some flaws, my 
lady.”
Catelyn felt very tired. It had all been for nothing. The Baratheon brothers 
would drown each other in blood while her son faced the Lannisters alone, and 
nothing she could say or do would stop it. It is past time I went back to 
Riverrun to close my father’s eyes, she thought. That much at least I 
can do. I may be a poor envoy, but I am a good mourner, gods save 
me.
Their camp was well sited atop a low stony ridge that ran from north to south. 
It was far more orderly than the sprawling encampment on the Mander, though 
only a quarter as large. When he’d learned of his brother’s assault on Storm’s 
End, Renly had split his forces, much as Robb had done at the Twins. His great 
mass of foot he had left behind at Bitterbridge with his young queen, his 
wagons, carts, draft animals, and all his cumbersome siege machinery, while 
Renly himself led his knights and freeriders in a swift dash east.
How like his brother Robert he was, even in that . . . only

Robert had always had Eddard Stark to temper his boldness with caution. Ned 
would surely have prevailed upon Robert to bring up his whole force, 
to encircle Stannis and besiege the besiegers. That choice Renly had denied 
himself in his headlong rush to come to grips with his brother. He had 
outdistanced his supply lines, left food and forage days behind with all his 
wagons and mules and oxen. He must come to battle soon, or 
starve.
Catelyn sent Hal Mollen to tend to their horses while she accompanied Renly 
back to the royal pavilion at the heart of the encampment. Inside the walls of 
green silk, his captains and lords bannermen were waiting to hear word of the 
parley. “My brother has not changed,” their young king told them as Brienne 
unfastened his cloak and lifted the gold-and-jade crown from his brow. 
“Castles and courtesies will not appease him, he must have blood. Well, I am 
of a mind to grant his wish.”
“Your Grace, I see no need for battle here,” Lord Mathis Rowan put in. “The 
castle is strongly garrisoned and well provisioned, Ser Cortnay Penrose is a 
seasoned commander, and the trebuchet has not been built that could breach the 
walls of Storm’s End. Let Lord Stannis have his siege. He will find no joy in 
it, and whilst he sits cold and hungry and profitless, we will take King’s 
Landing.”
“And have men say I feared to face Stannis?”
“Only fools will say that,” Lord Mathis argued.
Renly looked to the others. “What say you all?”
“I say that Stannis is a danger to you,” Lord Randyll Tarly

declared. “Leave him unblooded and he will only grow stronger, while your own 
power is diminished by battle. The Lannisters will not be beaten in a day. By 
the time you are done with them, Lord Stannis may be as strong as 
you . . . or stronger.”
Others chorused their agreement. The king looked pleased. “We shall fight, 
then.”
I have failed Robb as I failed Ned, Catelyn thought. “My lord,” she 
announced. “If you are set on battle, my purpose here is done. I ask your 
leave to return to Riverrun.”
“You do not have it.” Renly seated himself on a camp chair.
She stiffened. “I had hoped to help you make a peace, my lord. I will not help 
you make a war.”
Renly gave a shrug. “I daresay we’ll prevail without your five-and-twenty, my 
lady. I do not mean for you to take part in the battle, only to watch 
it.”
“I was at the Whispering Wood, my lord. I have seen enough butchery. I came 
here an envoy—”
“And an envoy you shall leave,” Renly said, “but wiser than you came. You 
shall see what befalls rebels with your own eyes, so your son can hear it from 
your own lips. We’ll keep you safe, never fear.” He turned away to make his 
dispositions. “Lord Mathis, you shall lead the center of my main battle. 
Bryce, you’ll have the left. The right is mine. Lord Estermont, you shall 
command the reserve.”
“I shall not fail you, Your Grace,” Lord Estermont replied.
Lord Mathis Rowan spoke up. “Who shall have the van?”“Your Grace,” said Ser Jon Fossoway, “I beg the honor.”
“Beg all you like,” said Ser Guyard the Green, “by rights it should be one 
of the seven who strikes the first blow.”
“It takes more than a pretty cloak to charge a shield wall,” Randyll Tarly 
announced. “I was leading Mace Tyrell’s van when you were still sucking on 
your mother’s teat, Guyard.”
A clamor filled the pavilion, as other men loudly set forth their claims. 
The knights of summer, Catelyn thought. Renly raised a hand. 
“Enough, my lords. If I had a dozen vans, all of you should have one, but the 
greatest glory by rights belongs to the greatest knight. Ser Loras shall strike 
the first blow.”
“With a glad heart, Your Grace.” The Knight of Flowers knelt before the king. 
“Grant me your blessing, and a knight to ride beside me with your banner. Let 
the stag and rose go to battle side by side.”
Renly glanced about him. “Brienne.”
“Your Grace?” She was still armored in her blue steel, though she had taken 
off her helm. The crowded tent was hot, and sweat plastered limp yellow hair to 
her broad, homely face. “My place is at your side. I am your sworn 
shield . . .”
“One of seven,” the king reminded her. “Never fear, four of your fellows 
will be with me in the fight.”
Brienne dropped to her knees. “If I must part from Your Grace, grant me the 
honor of arming you for battle.”
Catelyn heard someone snigger behind her. She loves him, poor thing, 
she thought sadly. She’d play his squire just to

touch him, and never care how great a fool they think her.
“Granted,” Renly said. “Now leave me, all of you. Even kings must rest 
before a battle.”
“My lord,” Catelyn said, “there was a small sept in the last village we 
passed. If you will not permit me to depart for Riverrun, grant me leave to go 
there and pray.”
“As you will. Ser Robar, give Lady Stark safe escort to this 
sept . . . but see that she returns to us by dawn.”
“You might do well to pray yourself,” Catelyn added.
“For victory?”
“For wisdom.”
Renly laughed. “Loras, stay and help me pray. It’s been so long I’ve quite 
forgotten how. As to the rest of you, I want every man in place by first light, 
armed, armored, and horsed. We shall give Stannis a dawn he will not soon 
forget.”
Dusk was falling when Catelyn left the pavilion. Ser Robar Royce fell in beside 
her. She knew him slightly—one of Bronze Yohn’s sons, comely in a 
rough-hewn way, a tourney warrior of some renown. Renly had gifted him with a 
rainbow cloak and a suit of blood red armor, and named him one of his seven. 
“You are a long way from the Vale, ser,” she told him.
“And you far from Winterfell, my lady.”
“I know what brought me here, but why have you come? This is not your battle, 
no more than it is mine.”
“I made it my battle when I made Renly my king.”
“The Royces are bannermen to House Arryn.”“My lord father owes Lady Lysa fealty, as does his heir. A second son 
must find glory where he can.” Ser Robar shrugged. “A man grows weary of 
tourneys.”
He could not be older than one-and-twenty, Catelyn thought, of an age with his 
king . . . but her king, her Robb, had more wisdom at 
fifteen than this youth had ever learned. Or so she prayed.
In Catelyn’s small corner of the camp, Shadd was slicing carrots into a kettle, 
Hal Mollen was dicing with three of his Winterfell men, and Lucas Blackwood sat 
sharpening his dagger. “Lady Stark,” Lucas said when he saw her, “Mollen 
says it is to be battle at dawn.”
“Hal has the truth of it,” she answered. And a loose tongue as well, it 
would seem.
“Do we fight or flee?”
“We pray, Lucas,” she answered him. “We pray.”

It was full dark before they found the village. Catelyn found herself 
wondering if the place had a name. If so, its people had taken that knowledge 
with them when they fled, along with all they owned, down to the candles in the 
sept. Ser Wendel lit a torch and led her through the low door.
Within, the seven walls were cracked and crooked. God is one, Septon 
Osmynd had taught her when she was a girl, with seven aspects, as the sept 
is a single building, with seven walls. The wealthy septs of the cities 
had statues of the Seven and an altar to each. In Winterfell, Septon Chayle 
hung carved masks from each wall. Here Catelyn found only rough charcoal drawings. Ser 
Wendel set the torch in a sconce near the door, and left to wait outside with 
Robar Royce.Catelyn studied the faces. The Father was bearded, as ever. The Mother 
smiled, loving and protective. The Warrior had his sword sketched in beneath 
his face, the Smith his hammer. The Maid was beautiful, the Crone wizened and 
wise.
And the seventh face . . . the Stranger was neither male nor 
female, yet both, ever the outcast, the wanderer from far places, less and more 
than human, unknown and unknowable. Here the face was a black oval, a shadow 
with stars for eyes. It made Catelyn uneasy. She would get scant comfort 
there.She knelt before the Mother. “My lady, look down on this battle with a 
mother’s eyes. They are all sons, every one. Spare them if you can, and spare 
my own sons as well. Watch over Robb and Bran and Rickon. Would that I were 
with them.”
A crack ran down through the Mother’s left eye. It made her look as if she were 
crying. Catelyn could hear Ser Wendel’s booming voice, and now and again Ser 
Robar’s quiet answers, as they talked of the coming battle. Otherwise the night 
was still. Not even a cricket could be heard, and the gods kept their silence. 
Did your old gods ever answer you, Ned? she wondered. When you 
knelt before your heart tree, did they hear you?
Flickering torchlight danced across the walls, making the faces seem 
half-alive, twisting them, changing them. The statues in the great septs of the 
cities wore the faces the stonemasons had given them, but these charcoal 
scratchings were so crude they might be anyone. The Father’s face made her 
think of her own father, dying in his bed at Riverrun. The Warrior was Renly 
and Stannis, Robb and Robert, Jaime Lannister and Jon Snow. She even glimpsed 
Arya in those lines, just for an instant. Then a gust of wind through the door 
made the torch sputter, and the semblance was gone, washed away in orange 
glare.
The smoke was making her eyes burn. She rubbed at them with the heels of her 
scarred hands. When she looked up at the Mother again, it was her own mother 
she saw. Lady Minisa Tully had died in childbed, trying to give Lord Hoster a 
second son. The baby had perished with her, and afterward some of the life had 
gone out

of Father. She was always so calm, Catelyn thought, remembering her 
mother’s soft hands, her warm smile. If she had lived, how different our 
lives might have been. She wondered what Lady Minisa would make of her 
eldest daughter, kneeling here before her. I have come so many thousands 
of leagues, and for what? Who have I served? I have lost my daughters, Robb 
does not want me, and Bran and Rickon must surely think me a cold and unnatural 
mother. I was not even with Ned when he died . . .
Her head swam, and the sept seemed to move around her. The shadows swayed and 
shifted, furtive animals racing across the cracked white walls. Catelyn had not 
eaten today. Perhaps that had been unwise. She told herself that there had been 
no time, but the truth was that food had lost its savor in a world without Ned. 
When they took his head off, they killed me too.
Behind her the torch spit, and suddenly it seemed to her that it was her 
sister’s face on the wall, though the eyes were harder than she recalled, not 
Lysa’s eyes but Cersei’s. Cersei is a mother too. No matter who fathered 
those children, she felt them kick inside her, brought them forth with her pain 
and blood, nursed them at her breast. If they are truly 
Jaime’s . . .
“Does Cersei pray to you too, my lady?” Catelyn asked the Mother. She could 
see the proud, cold, lovely features of the Lannister queen etched upon the 
wall. The crack was still there; even Cersei could weep for her children. 
“Each of the Seven embodies all of the Seven,” Septon Osmynd had told her 
once. There was as much beauty in the Crone as in the Maiden, and the

Mother could be fiercer than the Warrior when her children were in danger. 
Yes . . .
She had seen enough of Robert Baratheon at Winterfell to know that the king did 
not regard Joffrey with any great warmth. If the boy was truly Jaime’s seed, 
Robert would have put him to death along with his mother, and few would have 
condemned him.

Bastards were common enough, but incest was a monstrous sin to both old gods 
and new, and the children of such wickedness were named abominations in sept 
and godswood alike.

The dragon kings had wed brother to sister, but they were the blood of old 
Valyria where such practices had been common, and like their dragons the 
Targaryens answered to neither gods nor men.
Ned must have known, and Lord Arryn before him. Small wonder that the queen had 
killed them both. Would I do any less for my own? Catelyn clenched 
her hands, feeling the tightness in her scarred fingers where the assassin’s 
steel had cut to the bone as she fought to save her son. “Bran knows too,” 
she whispered, lowering her head. Gods be good, he must have seen 
something, heard something, that was why they tried to kill him in his 
bed.
Lost and weary, Catelyn Stark gave herself over to her gods. She knelt before 
the Smith, who fixed things that were broken, and asked that he give her sweet 
Bran his protection. She went to the Maid and beseeched her to lend her courage 
to Arya and Sansa, to guard them in their innocence. To the Father, she prayed 
for justice, the strength to seek it and the wisdom to know it, and she asked 
the Warrior to keep Robb strong and shield him in his battles. Lastly she 
turned to the Crone, whose statues often

showed her with a lamp in one hand. “Guide me, wise lady,” she prayed. “Show 
me the path I must walk, and do not let me stumble in the dark places that lie 
ahead.”
Finally there were footsteps behind her, and a noise at the door. “My lady,” 
Ser Robar said gently, “pardon, but our time is at an end. We must be back 
before the dawn breaks.”
Catelyn rose stiffly. Her knees ached, and she would have given much for a 
featherbed and a pillow just then. “Thank you, ser. I am ready.”
They rode in silence through sparse woodland where the trees leaned drunkenly 
away from the sea. The nervous whinny of horses and the clank of steel guided 
them back to Renly’s camp. The long ranks of man and horse were armored in 
darkness, as black as if the Smith had hammered night itself into steel. There 
were banners to her right, banners to her left, and rank on rank of banners 
before her, but in the predawn gloom, neither colors nor sigils could be 
discerned. A grey army, Catelyn thought. Grey men on grey horses 
beneath grey banners. As they sat their horses waiting, Renly’s shadow 
knights pointed their lances upward, so she rode through a forest of tall naked 
trees, bereft of leaves and life. Where Storm’s End stood was only a deeper 
darkness, a wall of black through which no stars could shine, but she could see 
torches moving across the fields where Lord Stannis had made his 
camp.
The candles within Renly’s pavilion made the shimmering silken walls seem to 
glow, transforming the great tent into a

magical castle alive with emerald light. Two of the Rainbow Guard stood sentry 
at the door to the royal pavilion. The green light shone strangely against the 
purple plums of Ser Parmen’s surcoat, and gave a sickly hue to the sunflowers 
that covered every inch of Ser Emmon’s enameled yellow plate. Long silken 
plumes flew from their helms, and rainbow cloaks draped their 
shoulders.
Within, Catelyn found Brienne armoring the king for battle while the Lords 
Tarly and Rowan spoke of dispositions and tactics. It was pleasantly warm 
inside, the heat shimmering off the coals in a dozen small iron braziers. “I 
must speak with you, Your Grace,” she said, granting him a king’s style for 
once, anything to make him heed her.
“In a moment, Lady Catelyn,” Renly replied. Brienne fit backplate to 
breastplate over his quilted tunic. The king’s armor was a deep green, the 
green of leaves in a summer wood, so dark it drank the candlelight. Gold 
highlights gleamed from inlay and fastenings like distant fires in that wood, 
winking every time he moved. “Pray continue, Lord Mathis.”
“Your Grace,” Mathis Rowan said with a sideways glance at Catelyn. “As I was 
saying, our battles are well drawn up. Why wait for daybreak? Sound the 
advance.”
“And have it said that I won by treachery, with an unchivalrous attack? Dawn 
was the chosen hour.”
“Chosen by Stannis,” Randyll Tarly pointed out. “He’d have us charge into 
the teeth of the rising sun. We’ll be half-blind.”
“Only until first shock,” Renly said confidently. “Ser

Loras will break them, and after that it will be chaos.” Brienne tightened 
green leather straps and buckled golden buckles. “When my brother falls, see 
that no insult is done to his corpse. He is my own blood, I will not have his 
head paraded about on a spear.”
“And if he yields?” Lord Tarly asked.
“Yields?” Lord Rowan laughed. “When Mace Tyrell laid siege to Storm’s End, 
Stannis ate rats rather than open his gates.”
“Well I remember.” Renly lifted his chin to allow Brienne to fasten his 
gorget in place. “Near the end, Ser Gawen Wylde and three of his knights tried 
to steal out a postern gate to surrender. Stannis caught them and ordered them 
flung from the walls with catapults. I can still see Gawen’s face as they 
strapped him down. He had been our master-at-arms.”
Lord Rowan appeared puzzled. “No men were hurled from the walls. I would 
surely remember that.”
“Maester Cressen told Stannis that we might be forced to eat our dead, and 
there was no gain in flinging away good meat.” Renly pushed back his hair. 
Brienne bound it with a velvet tie and pulled a padded cap down over his ears, 
to cushion the weight of his helm. “Thanks to the Onion Knight we were never 
reduced to dining on corpses, but it was a close thing. Too close for Ser 
Gawen, who died in his cell.”
“Your Grace.” Catelyn had waited patiently, but time grew short. “You 
promised me a word.”
Renly nodded. “See to your battles, my lords . . . oh, and if 
Barristan Selmy is at my brother’s side, I want him spared.”“There’s been no word of Ser Barristan since Joffrey cast him out,” 
Lord Rowan objected.
“I know that old man. He needs a king to guard, or who is he? Yet he never 
came to me, and Lady Catelyn says he is not with Robb Stark at Riverrun. Where 
else but with Stannis?”
“As you say, Your Grace. No harm will come to him.” The lords bowed deeply 
and departed.
“Say your say, Lady Stark,” Renly said. Brienne swept his cloak over his 
broad shoulders. It was cloth-of-gold, heavy, with the crowned stag of 
Baratheon picked out in flakes of jet.
“The Lannisters tried to kill my son Bran. A thousand times I have asked 
myself why. Your brother gave me my answer. There was a hunt the day he fell. 
Robert and Ned and most of the other men rode out after boar, but Jaime 
Lannister remained at Winterfell, as did the queen.”
Renly was not slow to take the implication. “So you believe the boy caught 
them at their incest . . .”
“I beg you, my lord, grant me leave to go to your brother Stannis and tell him 
what I suspect.”
“To what end?”
“Robb will set aside his crown if you and your brother will do the same,” she 
said, hoping it was true. She would make it true if she must; Robb 
would listen to her, even if his lords would not. “Let the three of you call 
for a Great Council, such as the realm has not seen for a hundred years. We 
will send to Winterfell, so Bran may tell his tale and all men may know the

Lannisters for the true usurpers. Let the assembled lords of the Seven Kingdoms 
choose who shall rule them.”
Renly laughed. “Tell me, my lady, do direwolves vote on who should lead the 
pack?” Brienne brought the king’s gauntlets and greathelm, crowned with golden 
antlers that would add a foot and a half to his height. “The time for talk is 
done. Now we see who is stronger.” Renly pulled a lobstered green-and-gold 
gauntlet over his left hand, while Brienne knelt to buckle on his belt, heavy 
with the weight of longsword and dagger.
“I beg you in the name of the Mother,” Catelyn began when a sudden gust of 
wind flung open the door of the tent. She thought she glimpsed movement, but 
when she turned her head, it was only the king’s shadow shifting against the 
silken walls. She heard Renly begin a jest, his shadow moving, lifting its 
sword, black on green, candles guttering, shivering, something was queer, 
wrong, and then she saw Renly’s sword still in its scabbard, sheathed still, 
but the shadowsword . . .
“Cold,” said Renly in a small puzzled voice, a heartbeat before the steel of 
his gorget parted like cheesecloth beneath the shadow of a blade that was not 
there. He had time to make a small thick gasp before the blood came gushing out 
of his throat.
“Your Gr—no!” cried Brienne the Blue when she saw that evil 
flow, sounding as scared as any little girl. The king stumbled into her arms, a 
sheet of blood creeping down the front of his armor, a dark red tide that 
drowned his green and gold. More candles guttered out. Renly tried to speak, 
but he was

choking on his own blood. His legs collapsed, and only Brienne’s strength held 
him up. She threw back her head and screamed, wordless in her 
anguish.
The shadow. Something dark and evil had happened here, she knew, 
something that she could not begin to understand. Renly never cast that 
shadow. Death came in that door and blew the life out of him as swift as the 
wind snuffed out his candles.
Only a few instants passed before Robar Royce and Emmon Cuy came bursting in, 
though it felt like half the night. A pair of men-at-arms crowded in behind 
with torches. When they saw Renly in Brienne’s arms, and her drenched with the 
king’s blood, Ser Robar gave a cry of horror. “Wicked woman!” screamed Ser 
Emmon, he of the sunflowered steel. “Away from him, you vile 
creature!”
“Gods be good, Brienne, why?” asked Ser Robar.
Brienne looked up from her king’s body. The rainbow cloak that hung from her 
shoulders had turned red where the king’s blood had soaked into the cloth. 
“I . . . I . . .”
“You’ll die for this.” Ser Emmon snatched up a long-handled battle-axe from 
the weapons piled near the door. “You’ll pay for the king’s life with your 
own!”
“NO!” Catelyn Stark screamed, finding her voice at last, but it was 
too late, the blood madness was on them, and they rushed forward with shouts 
that drowned her softer words.
Brienne moved faster than Catelyn would have believed. Her own sword was not to 
hand, so she snatched Renly’s from its scabbard and raised it to catch Emmon’s 
axe on the downswing. A

spark flashed blue-white as steel met steel with a rending crash, and Brienne 
sprang to her feet, the body of the dead king thrust rudely aside. Ser Emmon 
stumbled over it as he tried to close, and Brienne’s blade sheared through the 
wooden haft to send his axehead spinning. Another man thrust a flaming torch at 
her back, but the rainbow cloak was too sodden with blood to burn. Brienne spun 
and cut, and torch and hand went flying. Flames crept across the carpet. The 
maimed man began to scream. Ser Emmon dropped the axe and fumbled for his 
sword. The second man-at-arms lunged, Brienne parried, and their swords danced 
and clanged against each other. When Emmon Cuy came wading back in, Brienne was 
forced to retreat, yet somehow she held them both at bay. On the ground, 
Renly’s head rolled sickeningly to one side, and a second mouth yawned wide, 
the blood coming from him now in slow pulses.
Ser Robar had hung back, uncertain, but now he was reaching for his hilt. 
“Robar, no, listen.” Catelyn seized his arm. “You do her wrong, it was not 
her. Help her! Hear me, it was Stannis.” The name was on her lips 
before she could think how it got there, but as she said it, she knew that it 
was true. “I swear it, you know me, it was Stannis killed 
him.”
The young rainbow knight stared at this madwoman with pale and frightened eyes. 
“Stannis? How?”
“I do not know. Sorcery, some dark magic, there was a shadow, a 
shadow.” Her own voice sounded wild and crazed to her, but the words 
poured out in a rush as the blades continued to clash behind her. “A shadow 
with a sword, I swear it, I saw. Are

you blind, the girl loved him! Help her!” She glanced 
back, saw the second guardsman fall, his blade dropping from limp fingers. 
Outside there was shouting. More angry men would be bursting in on them any 
instant, she knew. “She is innocent, Robar. You have my word, on my husband’s 
grave and my honor as a Stark!”
That resolved him. “I will hold them,” Ser Robar said. “Get her away.” He 
turned and went out.
The fire had reached the wall and was creeping up the side of the tent. Ser 
Emmon was pressing Brienne hard, him in his enameled yellow steel and her in 
wool. He had forgotten Catelyn, until the iron brazier came crashing into the 
back of his head. Helmed as he was, the blow did no lasting harm, but it sent 
him to his knees. “Brienne, with me,” Catelyn commanded. The girl was not 
slow to see the chance. A slash, and the green silk parted. They stepped out 
into darkness and the chill of dawn. Loud voices came from the other side of 
the pavilion. “This way,” Catelyn urged, “and slowly. We must not run, or 
they will ask why. Walk easy, as if nothing were amiss.”
Brienne thrust her sword blade through her belt and fell in beside Catelyn. The 
night air smelled of rain. Behind them, the king’s pavilion was well ablaze, 
flames rising high against the dark. No one made any move to stop them. Men 
rushed past them, shouting of fire and murder and sorcery. Others stood in 
small groups and spoke in low voices. A few were praying, and one young squire 
was on his knees, sobbing openly.
Renly’s battles were already coming apart as the rumors

spread from mouth to mouth. The nightfires had burned low, and as the east 
began to lighten the immense mass of Storm’s End emerged like a dream of stone 
while wisps of pale mist raced across the field, flying from the sun on wings 
of wind. Morning ghosts, she had heard Old Nan call them once, 
spirits returning to their graves. And Renly one of them now, gone like his 
brother Robert, like her own dear Ned.
“I never held him but as he died,” Brienne said quietly as they walked 
through the spreading chaos. Her voice sounded as if she might break
at any 
instant. “He was laughing one moment, and suddenly the blood 
was everywhere . . . my lady, I 
do not understand. Did you see, did 
you . . . ?”
“I saw a shadow. I thought it was Renly’s shadow at the first, but it was his 
brother’s.”
“Lord Stannis?”
“I felt him. It makes no sense, I know . . .”
It made sense enough for Brienne. “I will kill him,” the tall homely girl 
declared. “With my lord’s own sword, I will kill him. I swear it. I swear it. 
I swear it.”
Hal Mollen and the rest of her escort were waiting with the horses. Ser Wendel 
Manderly was all in a lather to know what was happening. “My lady, the camp 
has gone mad,” he blurted when he saw them. “Lord Renly, is he—” He 
stopped suddenly, staring at Brienne and the blood that drenched her.
“Dead, but not by our hands.”
“The battle—” Hal Mollen began.“There will be no battle.” Catelyn mounted, and her escort formed up 
about her, with Ser Wendel to her left and Ser Perwyn Frey on her right. 
“Brienne, we brought mounts enough for twice our number. Choose one, and come 
with us.”
“I have my own horse, my lady. And my armor—”
“Leave them. We must be well away before they think to look for us. We were 
both with the king when he was killed. That will not be forgotten.” Wordless, 
Brienne turned and did as she was bid. “Ride,” Catelyn commanded her escort 
when they were all ahorse. “If any man tries to stop us, cut him 
down.”
As the long fingers of dawn fanned across the fields, color was returning to 
the world. Where grey men had sat grey horses armed with shadow spears, the 
points of ten thousand lances now glinted silverly cold, and on the myriad 
flapping banners Catelyn saw the blush of red and pink and orange, the richness 
of blues and browns, the blaze of gold and yellow. All the power of Storm’s End 
and Highgarden, the power that had been Renly’s an hour ago. They belong 
to Stannis now, she realized, even if they do not know it themselves 
yet. Where else are they to turn, if not to the last Baratheon? Stannis has won 
all with a single evil stroke.
I am the rightful king, he had declared, his jaw clenched hard as iron, 
and your son no less a traitor than my brother here. His day will come as 
well.
A chill went through her.

Two days ride from Riverrun, a scout spied them watering their horses 
beside a muddy steam. Catelyn had never been so glad to see the twin tower 
badge of House Frey.
When she asked him to lead them to her uncle, he said, “The Blackfish is gone 
west with the king, my lady. Martyn Rivers commands the outriders in his 
stead.”“I see.” She had met Rivers at the Twins; a baseborn son of Lord Walder 
Frey, half brother to Ser Perwyn. It did not surprise her to learn that Robb 
had struck at the heart of Lannister power; clearly he had been contemplating 
just that when he sent her away to treat with Renly. “Where is Rivers 
now?”
“His camp is two hours ride, my lady.”
“Take us to him,” she commanded. Brienne helped her back into her saddle, and 
they set out at once.
“Have you come from Bitterbridge, my lady?” the scout asked.
“No.” She had not dared. With Renly dead, Catelyn had been uncertain of the 
reception she might receive from his young widow and her protectors. Instead 
she had ridden through the heart of the war, through fertile riverlands turned 
to blackened desert by the fury of the Lannisters, and each night her scouts 
brought back tales that made her ill. “Lord Renly is slain,” she 
added.
“We’d hoped that tale was some Lannister lie, or—”“Would that it were. My brother commands in Riverrun?”
“Yes, my lady. His Grace left Ser Edmure to hold Riverrun and guard his 
rear.”

Gods grant him the strength to do so, Catelyn thought. And the 
wisdom as well. “Is there word from Robb in the west?”
“You have not heard?” The man seemed surprised. “His Grace won a great 
victory at Oxcross. Ser Stafford Lannister is dead, his host 
scattered.”
Ser Wendel Manderly gave a whoop of pleasure, but Catelyn only 
nodded. Tomorrow’s trials concerned her more than yesterday’s 
triumphs.
Martyn Rivers had made his camp in the shell of a shattered holdfast, beside a 
roofless stable and a hundred fresh graves. He went to one knee when Catelyn 
dismounted. “Well met, my lady. Your brother charged us to keep an eye out for 
your party, and escort you back to Riverrun in all haste should we come upon 
you.”
Catelyn scarce liked the sound of that. “Is it my father?”
“No, my lady. Lord Hoster is unchanged.” Rivers was a ruddy man with scant 
resemblance to his half brothers. “It is only that we feared you might chance 
upon Lannister scouts. Lord Tywin has left Harrenhal and marches west with all 
his power.”
“Rise,” she told Rivers, frowning. Stannis Baratheon would soon be on the 
march as well, gods help them all. “How long until Lord Tywin is upon 
us?”
“Three days, perhaps four, it is hard to know. We have eyes out along all the 
roads, but it would be best not to linger.”Nor did they. Rivers broke his camp quickly and saddled up beside her, 
and they set off again, near fifty strong now, flying beneath the direwolf, the 
leaping trout, the twin towers.
Her men wanted to hear more of Robb’s victory at Oxcross, and Rivers obliged. 
“There’s a singer come to Riverrun, calls himself Rymund the Rhymer, he’s made 
a song of the fight. Doubtless you’ll hear it sung tonight, my lady. ‘Wolf in the Night,’ this Rymund calls it.” He went on to tell how the remnants of Ser 
Stafford’s host had fallen back on Lannisport. Without siege engines there was 
no way to storm Casterly Rock, so the Young Wolf was paying the Lannisters back 
in kind for the devastation they’d inflicted on the riverlands. Lords Karstark 
and Glover were raiding along the coast, Lady Mormont had captured thousands of 
cattle and was driving them back toward Riverrun, while the Greatjon had seized 
the gold mines at Castamere, Nunn’s Deep, and the Pendric Hills. Ser Wendel 
laughed. “Nothing’s more like to bring a Lannister running than a threat to 
his gold.”
“How did the king ever take the Tooth?” Ser Perwyn Frey asked his bastard 
brother. “That’s a hard strong keep, and it commands the hill 
road.”
“He never took it. He slipped around it in the night. It’s said the direwolf 
showed him the way, that Grey Wind of his. The beast sniffed out a goat track 
that wound down a defile and up along beneath a ridge, a crooked and stony way, 
yet wide enough for men riding single file. The Lannisters in their watchtowers 
got not so much a glimpse of them.” Rivers lowered his voice.

“There’s some say that after the battle, the king cut out Stafford Lannister’s 
heart and fed it to the wolf.”
“I would not believe such tales,” Catelyn said sharply. “My son is no 
savage.”
“As you say, my lady. Still, it’s no more than the beast deserved. That is no 
common wolf, that one. The Greatjon’s been heard to say that the old gods of 
the north sent those direwolves to your children.”
Catelyn remembered the day when her boys had found the pups in the late summer 
snows. There had been five, three male and two female for the five trueborn 
children of House Stark . . . and a sixth, white of fur and red 
of eye, for Ned’s bastard son Jon Snow. No common wolves, she 
thought. No indeed.
That night as they made their camp, Brienne sought out her tent. “My lady, you 
are safely back among your own now, a day’s ride from your brother’s castle. 
Give me leave to go.”
Catelyn should not have been surprised. The homely young woman had kept to 
herself all through their journey, spending most of her time with the horses, 
brushing out their coats and pulling stones from their shoes. She had helped 
Shadd cook and clean game as well, and soon proved that she could hunt as well 
as any. Any task Catelyn asked her to turn her hand to, Brienne had performed 
deftly and without complaint, and when she was spoken to she answered politely, 
but she never chattered, nor wept, nor laughed. She had ridden with them every 
day and slept among them every night without ever truly becoming one of 
them.It was the same when she was with Renly, Catelyn thought. 
At the feast, in the melee, even in Renly’s pavilion with her brothers of 
the Rainbow Guard. There are walls around this one higher than 
Winterfell’s.
“If you left us, where would you go?” Catelyn asked her.
“Back,” Brienne said. “To Storm’s End.”
“Alone.” It was not a question.
The broad face was a pool of still water, giving no hint of what might live in 
the depths below. “Yes.”
“You mean to kill Stannis.”
Brienne closed her thick callused fingers around the hilt of her sword. The 
sword that had been his. “I swore a vow. Three times I swore. You heard 
me.”
“I did,” Catelyn admitted. The girl had kept the
rainbow cloak when she 
discarded the rest of her bloodstained clothing, she knew. Brienne’s own things 
had been left behind during their flight, and she had been forced to clothe 
herself in odd bits of Ser Wendel’s spare garb, since no one else in their 
party had garments large enough to fit her. “Vows should be kept, I agree, but 
Stannis has a great host around him, and his own guards sworn to keep him 
safe.”
“I am not afraid of his guards. I am as good as any of them. I should never 
have fled.”
“Is that what troubles you, that some fool might call you craven?” She 
sighed. “Renly’s death was no fault of yours. You served him valiantly, but 
when you seek to follow him into the

earth, you serve no one.” She stretched out a hand, to give what comfort a 
touch could give. “I know how hard it is—”
Brienne shook off her hand. “No one knows.”
“You’re wrong,” Catelyn said sharply. “Every morning, when I wake, I 
remember that Ned is gone. I have no skill with swords, but that does not mean 
that I do not dream of riding to King’s Landing and wrapping my hands around 
Cersei Lannister’s white throat and squeezing until her face turns 
black.”
The Beauty raised her eyes, the only part of her that was truly beautiful. “If 
you dream that, why would you seek to hold me back? Is it because of what 
Stannis said at the parley?”
Was it? Catelyn glanced across the camp. Two men were walking sentry, 
spears in hand. “I was taught that good men must fight evil in this world, and 
Renly’s death was evil beyond all doubt. Yet I was also taught that the gods 
make kings, not the swords of men. If Stannis is our rightful 
king—”
“He’s not. Robert was never the rightful king either, even Renly said as much. 
Jaime Lannister murdered the rightful king, after Robert killed his 
lawful heir on the Trident. Where were the gods then? The gods don’t care about 
men, no more than kings care about peasants.”
“A good king does care.”
“Lord Renly . . . His Grace, he . . . he would 
have been the best king, my lady, he was so good, 
he . . .”
“He is gone, Brienne,” she said, as gently as she could. “Stannis and 
Joffrey remain . . . and so does my son.”“He wouldn’t . . . you’d never make a peace with Stannis, would you? Bend the knee? You wouldn’t . . .”
“I will tell you true, Brienne. I do not know. My son may be a king, but I am 
no queen . . . only a mother who would keep her children safe, 
however she could.”
“I am not made to be a mother. I need to fight.”
“Then fight . . . but for the living, not the dead. Renly’s 
enemies are Robb’s enemies as well.”
Brienne stared at the ground and shuffled her feet. “I do not know your son, 
my lady.” She looked up. “I could serve you. If you would have 
me.”
Catelyn was startled. “Why me?”
The question seemed to trouble Brienne. “You helped me. In the 
pavilion . . . when they thought that I 
had . . . that I had . . .”
“You were innocent.”
“Even so, you did not have to do that. You could have let them kill me. I was 
nothing to you.”
Perhaps I did not want to be the only one who knew the dark truth of what 
had happened there, Catelyn thought. “Brienne, I have taken many wellborn 
ladies into my service over the years, but never one like you. I am no battle 
commander.”
“No, but you have courage. Not battle courage perhaps 
but . . . I don’t know . . . a kind of 
woman’s courage. And I think, when the time comes, you will not try 
and hold me back. Promise me that. That you will not hold me back from 
Stannis.”
Catelyn could still hear Stannis saying that Robb’s turn too

would come in time. It was like a cold breath on the back of her neck. “When 
the time comes, I will not hold you back.”
The tall girl knelt awkwardly, unsheathed Renly’s longsword, and laid it at her 
feet. “Then I am yours, my lady. Your liege man, 
or . . . whatever you would have me be. I will shield your back 
and keep your counsel and give my life for yours, if need be. I swear it by the 
old gods and the new.”
“And I vow that you shall always have a place by my hearth and meat and mead 
at my table, and pledge to ask no service of you that might bring you into 
dishonor. I swear it by the old gods and the new. Arise.” As she clasped the 
other woman’s hands between her own, Catelyn could not help but smile. How 
many times did I watch Ned accept a man’s oath of service? She wondered 
what he would think if he could see her now.
They forded the Red Fork late the next day, upstream of Riverrun where the 
river made a wide loop and the waters grew muddy and shallow. The crossing was 
guarded by a mixed force of archers and pikemen wearing the eagle badge of the 
Mallisters. When they saw Catelyn’s banners, they emerged from behind their 
sharpened stakes and sent a man over from the far bank to lead her party 
across. “Slow and careful like, milady,” he warned as he took the bridle of 
her horse. “We’ve planted iron spikes under the water, y’see, and there’s 
caltrops scattered among them rocks there. It’s the same on all the fords, by 
your brother’s command.”
Edmure thinks to fight here. The realization gave her a queasy 
feeling in the bowels, but she held her tongue.Between the Red Fork and the Tumblestone, they joined a stream of 
smallfolk making for the safety of Riverrun. Some were driving animals before 
them, others pulling wayns, but they made way as Catelyn rode past, and cheered 
her with cries of “Tully!” or “Stark!” Half a mile from the castle, she 
passed through a large encampment where the scarlet banner of the Blackwoods 
waved above the lord’s tent. Lucas took his leave of her there, to seek out his 
father, Lord Tytos. The rest rode on.
Catelyn spied a second camp strung out along the bank north of the Tumblestone, 
familiar standards flapping in the wind—Marq Piper’s dancing maiden, 
Darry’s plowman, the twining red-and-white snakes of the Paeges. They were all 
her father’s bannermen, lords of the Trident. Most had left Riverrun before she 
had, to defend their own lands. If they were here again, it could only mean 
that Edmure had called them back. Gods save us, it’s true, he means to 
offer battle to Lord Tywin.
Something dark was dangling against the walls of Riverrun, Catelyn saw from a 
distance. When she rode close, she saw dead men hanging from the battlements, 
slumped at the ends of long ropes with hempen nooses tight around their necks, 
their faces swollen and black. The crows had been at them, but their 
crimson cloaks still showed bright against the sandstone walls.
“They have hanged some Lannisters,” Hal Mollen observed.
“A pretty sight,” Ser Wendel Manderly said cheerfully.
“Our friends have begun without us,” Perwyn Frey jested. The others laughed, 
all but Brienne, who gazed up at the row of

bodies unblinking, and neither spoke nor smiled.
If they have slain the Kingslayer, then my daughters are dead as 
well. Catelyn spurred her horse to a canter. Hal Mollen and Robin Flint 
raced past at a gallop, halooing to the gatehouse. The guards on the walls had 
doubtless spied her banners some time ago, for the portcullis was up as they 
approached.
Edmure rode out from the castle to meet her, surrounded by three of her 
father’s sworn men—great-bellied Ser Desmond Grell the master-at-arms, 
Utherydes Wayn the steward, and Ser Robin Ryger, Riverrun’s big bald captain of 
guards. They were all three of an age with Lord Hoster, men who had spent their 
lives in her father’s service. Old men, Catelyn realized.
Edmure wore a blue-and-red cloak over a tunic embroidered with silver fish. 
From the look of him, he had not shaved since she rode south; his beard was a 
fiery bush. “Cat, it is good to have you safely back. When we heard of Renly’s 
death, we feared for your life. And Lord Tywin is on the march as 
well.”
“So I am told. How fares our father?”
“One day he seems stronger, the next . . .” He shook his head. 
“He’s asked for you. I did not know what to tell him.”
“I will go to him soon,” she vowed. “Has there been word from Storm’s End 
since Renly died? Or from Bitterbridge?” No ravens came to men on the road, 
and Catelyn was anxious to know what had happened behind her.
“Nothing from Bitterbridge. From Storm’s End, three birds from the castellan, 
Ser Cortnay Penrose, all carrying the same

plea. Stannis has him surrounded by land and sea. He offers his allegiance to 
whatsoever king will break the siege. He fears for the boy, he says. What boy 
would that be, do you know?”
“Edric Storm,” Brienne told them. “Robert’s bastard son.”
Edmure looked at her curiously. “Stannis has sworn that the garrison might go 
free, unharmed, provided they yield the castle within the fortnight and deliver 
the boy into his hands, but Ser Cortnay will not consent.”
He risks all for a baseborn boy whose blood is not even his own, 
Catelyn thought. “Did you send him an answer?”
Edmure shook his head. “Why, when we have neither help nor hope to offer? And 
Stannis is no enemy of ours.”
Ser Robin Ryger spoke. “My lady, can you tell us the manner of Lord Renly’s 
death? The tales we’ve heard have been queer.”
“Cat,” her brother said, “some say you killed Renly. Others claim 
it was some southron woman.” His glance lingered on Brienne.
“My king was murdered,” the girl said quietly, “and not by Lady Catelyn. I 
swear it on my sword, by the gods old and new.”
“This is Brienne of Tarth, the daughter of Lord Selwyn the Evenstar, who 
served in Renly’s Rainbow Guard,” Catelyn told them. “Brienne, I am honored 
to acquaint you with my brother Ser Edmure Tully, heir to Riverrun. His steward 
Utherydes Wayn. Ser Robin Ryger and Ser Desmond Grell.”
“Honored,” said Ser Desmond. The others echoed him. The girl flushed, 
embarrassed even at this commonplace courtesy. If

Edmure thought her a curious sort of lady, at least he had the grace not to say 
so.
“Brienne was with Renly when he was killed, as was I,” said Catelyn, “but we 
had no part in his death.” She did not care to speak of the shadow, here in 
the open with men all around, so she waved a hand at the bodies. “Who are 
these men you’ve hanged?”
Edmure glanced up uncomfortably. “They came with Ser Cleos when he brought the 
queen’s answer to our peace offer.”
Catelyn was shocked. “You’ve killed envoys?”
“False envoys,” Edmure declared. “They pledged me their peace and 
surrendered their weapons, so I allowed them freedom of the castle, and for 
three nights they ate my meat and drank my mead whilst I talked with Ser Cleos. 
On the fourth night, they tried to free the Kingslayer.” He pointed up. “That 
big brute killed two guards with naught but those ham hands of his, caught them 
by the throats and smashed their skulls together while that skinny lad beside 
him was opening Lannister’s cell with a bit of wire, gods curse him. The one on 
the end was some sort of damned mummer. He used my own voice to command that 
the River Gate be opened. The guardsmen swear to it, Enger and Delp and Long 
Lew, all three. If you ask me, the man sounded nothing like me, and yet the 
oafs were raising the portcullis all the same.”
This was the Imp’s work, Catelyn suspected; it stank of the same sort of 
cunning he had displayed at the Eyrie. Once, she would have named Tyrion the 
least dangerous of the Lannisters. Now she was not so certain. “How is it you 
caught them?”“Ah, as it happened, I was not in the castle. I’d crossed the 
Tumblestone to, ah . . .”
“You were whoring or wenching. Get on with the tale.”
Edmure’s cheeks flamed as red as his beard. “It was the hour before dawn, and 
I was only then returning. When Long Lew saw my boat and recognized me, he 
finally thought to wonder who was standing below barking commands, and raised a 
cry.”
“Tell me the Kingslayer was retaken.”
“Yes, though not easily. Jaime got hold of a sword, slew Poul Pemford and Ser 
Desmond’s squire Myles, and wounded Delp so badly that Maester Vyman fears 
he’ll soon die as well. It was a bloody mess. At the sound of steel, some of 
the other red cloaks rushed to join him, barehand or no. I hanged those beside 
the four who freed him, and threw the rest in the dungeons. Jaime too. We’ll 
have no more escapes from that one. He’s down in the dark this time, chained 
hand and foot and bolted to the wall.”
“And Cleos Frey?”
“He swears he knew naught of the plot. Who can say? The man is half Lannister, 
half Frey, and all liar. I put him in Jaime’s old tower cell.”
“You say he brought terms?”
“If you can call them that. You’ll like them no more than I did, I 
promise.”
“Can we hope for no help from the south, Lady Stark?” asked Utherydes Wayn, 
her father’s steward. “This charge of incest . . . Lord Tywin 
does not suffer such slights lightly. He will seek to

wash the stain from his daughter’s name with the blood of her accuser, Lord 
Stannis must see that. He has no choice but to make common cause with 
us.”
Stannis has made common cause with a power greater and darker. “Let 
us speak of these matters later.” Catelyn trotted over the drawbridge, putting 
the grisly row of dead Lannisters behind her. Her brother kept pace. As 
they rode out into the bustle of Riverrun’s upper bailey, a naked toddler ran 
in front of the horses. Catelyn jerked her reins hard to avoid him, glancing 
about in dismay. Hundreds of smallfolk had been admitted to the castle, and 
allowed to erect crude shelters against the walls. Their children were 
everywhere underfoot, and the yard teemed with their cows, sheep, and chickens. 
“Who are all these folk?”
“My people,” Edmure answered. “They were afraid.”
Only my sweet brother would crowd all these useless mouths into a castle 
that might soon be under siege. Catelyn knew that Edmure had a soft heart; 
sometimes she thought his head was even softer. She loved him for it, yet 
still . . .
“Can Robb be reached by raven?”
“He’s in the field, my lady,” Ser Desmond replied. “The bird would have no 
way to find him.”
Utherydes Wayn coughed. “Before he left us, the young king instructed us to 
send you on to the Twins upon your return, Lady Stark. He asks that you learn 
more of Lord Walder’s daughters, to help him select his bride when the time 
comes.”
“We’ll provide you with fresh mounts and provisions,” her

brother promised. “You’ll want to refresh yourself 
before—”
“I’ll want to stay,” Catelyn said, dismounting. She had no intention of 
leaving Riverrun and her dying father to pick Robb’s wife for him. Robb 
wants me safe, I cannot fault him for that, but his pretext is growing 
threadbare. “Boy,” she called, and an urchin from the stables ran out to 
take the reins of her horse.
Edmure swung down from his saddle. He was a head taller than she was, but he 
would always be her little brother. “Cat,” he said unhappily, “Lord Tywin is 
coming—”
“He is making for the west, to defend his own lands. If we close our gates and 
shelter behind the walls, we can watch him pass with safety.”
“This is Tully land,” Edmure declared. “If Tywin Lannister thinks to cross 
it unbloodied, I mean to teach him a hard lesson.”
The same lesson you taught his son? Her brother could be stubborn as 
river rock when his pride was touched, but neither of them was likely to forget 
how Ser Jaime had cut Edmure’s host to bloody pieces the last time he had 
offered battle. “We have nothing to gain and everything to lose by meeting 
Lord Tywin in the field,” Catelyn said tactfully.
“The yard is not the place to discuss my battle plans.”
“As you will. Where shall we go?”
Her brother’s face darkened. For a moment she thought he was about to lose his 
temper with her, but finally he snapped, “The godswood. If you will 
insist.”
She followed him along a gallery to the godswood gate.

Edmure’s anger had always been a sulky, sullen thing. Catelyn was sorry she had 
wounded him, but the matter was too important for her to concern herself with 
his pride. When they were alone beneath the trees, Edmure turned to face 
her.
“You do not have the strength to meet the Lannisters in the field,” she said 
bluntly.
“When all my strength is marshaled, I should have eight thousand foot and 
three thousand horse,” Edmure said.
“Which means Lord Tywin will have near twice your numbers.”
“Robb’s won his battles against worse odds,” Edmure replied, “and I have a 
plan. You’ve forgotten Roose Bolton. Lord Tywin defeated him on the Green Fork, 
but failed to pursue. When Lord Tywin went to Harrenhal, Bolton took the ruby 
ford and the crossroads. He has ten thousand men. I’ve sent word to Helman 
Tallhart to join him with the garrison Robb left at the 
Twins—”
“Edmure, Robb left those men to hold the Twins and make certain Lord 
Walder keeps faith with us.”
“He has,” Edmure said stubbornly. “The Freys fought bravely in the 
Whispering Wood, and old Ser Stevron died at Oxcross, we hear. Ser Ryman and 
Black Walder and the rest are with Robb in the west, Martyn has been of great 
service scouting, and Ser Perwyn helped see you safe to Renly. Gods be good, 
how much more can we ask of them? Robb’s betrothed to one of Lord Walder’s 
daughters, and Roose Bolton wed another, I hear. And haven’t you taken two of 
his grandsons to be fostered at Winterfell?”
“A ward can easily become a hostage, if need be.” She had

not known that Ser Stevron was dead, nor of Bolton’s marriage.
“If we’re two hostages to the good, all the more reason Lord Walder dare not 
play us false. Bolton needs Frey’s men, and Ser Helman’s as well. I’ve 
commanded him to retake Harrenhal.”
“That’s like to be a bloody business.”
“Yes, but once the castle falls, Lord Tywin will have no safe retreat. My own 
levies will defend the fords of Red Fork against his crossing. If he attacks 
across the river, he’ll end as Rhaegar did when he tried to cross the Trident. 
If he holds back, he’ll be caught between Riverrun and Harrenhal, and when Robb 
returns from the west we can finish him for good and all.”
Her brother’s voice was full of brusque confidence, but Catelyn found herself 
wishing that Robb had not taken her uncle Brynden west with him. The Blackfish 
was the veteran of half a hundred battles; Edmure was the veteran of one, and 
that one lost.
“The plan’s a good one,” he concluded. “Lord Tytos says so, and Lord Jonos 
as well. When did Blackwood and Bracken agree about anything that was 
not certain, I ask you?”
“Be that as it may.” She was suddenly weary. Perhaps she was wrong to oppose 
him. Perhaps it was a splendid plan, and her misgivings only a woman’s fears. 
She wished Ned were here, or her uncle Brynden, or . . . “Have 
you asked Father about this?”
“Father is in no state to weigh strategies. Two days ago he was making plans 
for your marriage to Brandon Stark! Go see him yourself if you do not believe 
me. This plan will work, Cat, you’ll see.”“I hope so, Edmure. I truly do.” She kissed him on the cheek, to let 
him know she meant it, and went to find her father.
Lord Hoster Tully was much as she had left him—abed, haggard, flesh pale 
and clammy. The room smelled of sickness, a cloying odor made up in equal parts 
of stale sweat and medicine. When she pulled back the drapes, her father gave a 
low moan, and his eyes fluttered open. He stared at her as if he could not 
comprehend who she was or what she wanted.
“Father.” She kissed him. “I am returned.”
He seemed to know her then. “You’ve come,” he whispered faintly, lips barely 
moving.
“Yes,” she said. “Robb sent me south, but I hurried back.”
“South . . . where . . . is the Eyrie south, 
sweetling? I don’t recall . . . oh, dear heart, I was 
afraid . . . have you forgiven me, child?” Tears ran down his 
cheeks.
“You’ve done nothing that needs forgiveness, Father.” She stroked his limp 
white hair and felt his brow. The fever still burned him from within, 
despite all the maester’s potions.
“It was best,” her father whispered. “Jon’s a good man, 
good . . . strong, kind . . . take care of 
you . . . he will . . . and well born, listen 
to me, you must, I’m your father . . . your 
father . . . you’ll wed when Cat does, yes you 
will . . .”
He thinks I’m Lysa, Catelyn realized. Gods be good, he talks as 
if we were not married yet.
Her father’s hands clutched at hers, fluttering like two frightened white 
birds. “That stripling . . . wretched 
boy . . . not

speak that name to me, your duty . . . your mother, she 
would . . .” Lord Hoster cried as a spasm of pain washed over him. 
“Oh, gods forgive me, forgive me, forgive me. My 
medicine . . .”
And then Maester Vyman was there, holding a cup to his lips. Lord Hoster sucked 
at the thick white potion as eager as a babe at the breast, and Catelyn could 
see peace settle over him once more. “He’ll sleep now, my lady,” the maester 
said when the cup was empty. The milk of the poppy had left a thick white film 
around her father’s mouth. Maester Vyman wiped it away with a sleeve.
Catelyn could watch no more. Hoster Tully had been a strong man, and proud. It 
hurt her to see him reduced to this. She went out to the terrace. The yard 
below was crowded with refugees and chaotic with their noises, but beyond the 
walls the rivers flowed clean and pure and endless. Those are his rivers, 
and soon he will return to them for his last voyage.
Maester Vyman had followed her out. “My lady,” he said softly, “I cannot 
keep the end at bay much longer. We ought send a rider after his brother. Ser 
Brynden would wish to be here.”
“Yes,” Catelyn said, her voice thick with her grief.
“And the Lady Lysa as well, perhaps?”
“Lysa will not come.”
“If you wrote her yourself, perhaps . . .”
“I will put some words to paper, if that please you.” She wondered who Lysa’s 
“wretched stripling” had been. Some young squire or hedge knight, like as 
not . . . though by the vehemence with which Lord Hoster had 
opposed him, he might have been a

tradesman’s son or baseborn apprentice, even a singer. Lysa had always been too 
fond of singers. I must not blame her. Jon Arryn was twenty years older 
than our father, however noble.
The tower her brother had set aside for her use was the very same that she and 
Lysa had shared as maids. It would feel good to sleep on a featherbed again, 
with a warm fire in the hearth; when she was rested the world would seem less 
bleak.
But outside her chambers she found Utherydes Wayn waiting with two women clad 
in grey, their faces cowled save for their eyes. Catelyn knew at once why they 
were here. “Ned?”
The sisters lowered their gaze. Utherydes said, “Ser Cleos brought him from 
King’s Landing, my lady.”
“Take me to him,” she commanded.
They had laid him out on a trestle table and covered him with a banner, the 
white banner of House Stark with its grey direwolf sigil. “I would look on 
him,” Catelyn said.
“Only the bones remain, my lady.”
“I would look on him,” she repeated.
One of the silent sisters turned down the banner.
Bones, Catelyn thought. This is not Ned, this is not the man I 
loved, the father of my children. His hands were clasped together over his 
chest, skeletal fingers curled about the hilt of some longsword, but they were 
not Ned’s hands, so strong and full of life. They had dressed the bones in 
Ned’s surcoat, the fine white velvet with the direwolf badge over the heart, 
but nothing remained of the warm flesh that had pillowed her head so many

nights, the arms that had held her. The head had been rejoined to the body with 
fine silver wire, but one skull looks much like another, and in those empty 
hollows she found no trace of her lord’s dark grey eyes, eyes that could be 
soft as a fog or hard as stone. They gave his eyes to crows, she 
remembered.
Catelyn turned away. “That is not his sword.”
“Ice was not returned to us, my lady,” Utherydes said. “Only Lord Eddard’s 
bones.”
“I suppose I must thank the queen for even that much.”
“Thank the Imp, my lady. It was his doing.”
One day I will thank them all. “I am grateful for your service, 
sisters,” Catelyn said, “but I must lay another task upon you. Lord Eddard 
was a Stark, and his bones must be laid to rest beneath Winterfell.” They 
will make a statue of him, a stone likeness that will sit in the dark with a 
direwolf at his feet and a sword across his knees. “Make certain the 
sisters have fresh horses, and aught else they need for the journey,” she told 
Utherydes Wayn. “Hal Mollen will escort them back to Winterfell, it is his 
place as captain of guards.” She gazed down at the bones that were all that 
remained of her lord and love. “Now leave me, all of you. I would be alone 
with Ned tonight.”
The women in grey bowed their heads. The silent sisters do not speak to 
the living, Catelyn remembered dully, but some say they can talk to 
the dead. And how she envied that . . .

Tell Father I have gone to make him proud.” Her brother swung up into 
his saddle, every inch the lord in his bright mail and flowing mud-and-water 
cloak. A silver trout ornamented the crest of his greathelm, twin to the one 
painted on his shield.
“He was always proud of you, Edmure. And he loves you fiercely. Believe 
that.”“I mean to give him better reason than mere birth.” He wheeled his 
warhorse about and raised a hand. Trumpets sounded, a drum began to boom, the 
drawbridge descended in fits and starts, and Ser Edmure Tully led his men out 
from Riverrun with lances raised and banners streaming.
I have a greater host than yours, brother, Catelyn thought as she 
watched them go. A host of doubts and fears.
Beside her, Brienne’s misery was almost palpable. Catelyn had ordered garments 
sewn to her measure, handsome gowns to suit her birth and sex, yet still she 
preferred to dress in oddments of mail and boiled leather, a swordbelt cinched 
around her waist. She would have been happier riding to war with Edmure, no 
doubt, but even walls as strong as Riverrun’s required swords to hold them. Her 
brother had taken every able-bodied man for the fords, leaving Ser Desmond 
Grell to command a garrison made up of the wounded, the old, and the sick, 
along with a few squires and some

untrained peasant boys still shy of manhood. This, to defend a castle crammed 
full of women and children.
When the last of Edmure’s foot had shuffled under the portcullis, Brienne 
asked, “What shall we do now, my lady?”
“Our duty.” Catelyn’s face was drawn as she started across the yard. I 
have always done my duty, she thought. Perhaps that was why her lord 
father had always cherished her best of all his children. Her two older 
brothers had both died in infancy, so she had been son as well as daughter to 
Lord Hoster until Edmure was born. Then her mother had died and her father had 
told her that she must be the lady of Riverrun now, and she had done that too. 
And when Lord Hoster promised her to Brandon Stark, she had thanked him for 
making her such a splendid match.
I gave Brandon my favor to wear, and never comforted Petyr once after he 
was wounded, nor bid him farewell when Father sent him off. And when Brandon 
was murdered and Father told me I must wed his brother, I did so gladly, though 
I never saw Ned’s face until our wedding day. I gave my maidenhood to this 
solemn stranger and sent him off to his war and his king and the woman who bore 
him his bastard, because I always did my duty.
Her steps took her to the sept, a seven-sided sandstone temple set amidst her 
mother’s gardens and filled with rainbow light. It was crowded when they 
entered; Catelyn was not alone in her need for prayer. She knelt before the 
painted marble image of the Warrior and lit a scented candle for Edmure and 
another for Robb off beyond the hills. Keep them safe and help them to

victory, she prayed, and bring peace to the souls of the slain and 
comfort to those they leave behind.
The septon entered with his censer and crystal while she was at her prayers, so 
Catelyn lingered for the celebration. She did not know this septon, an earnest 
young man close to Edmure’s age. He performed his office well enough, and his 
voice was rich and pleasant when he sang the praises to the Seven, but Catelyn 
found herself yearning for the thin quavering tones of Septon Osmynd, long 
dead. Osmynd would have listened patiently to the tale of what she had seen and 
felt in Renly’s pavilion, and he might have known what it meant as well, and 
what she must do to lay to rest the shadows that stalked her dreams. 
Osmynd, my father, Uncle Brynden, old Maester Kym, they always seemed to 
know everything, but now there is only me, and it seems I know nothing, not 
even my duty. How can I do my duty if I do not know where it 
lies?
Catelyn’s knees were stiff by the time she rose, though she felt no wiser. 
Perhaps she would go to the godswood tonight, and pray to Ned’s gods as well. 
They were older than the Seven.
Outside, she found song of a very different sort. Rymund the Rhymer sat by the 
brewhouse amidst a circle of listeners, his deep voice ringing as he sang of 
Lord Deremond at the Bloody Meadow.
And there he stood with sword in hand,

the last of Darry’s ten . . .Brienne paused to listen for a moment, broad shoulders hunched and thick 
arms crossed against her chest. A mob of ragged boys raced by, screeching and 
flailing at each other with sticks. Why do boys so love to play at 
war? Catelyn wondered if Rymund

was the answer. The singer’s voice swelled as he neared the end of his 
song.
And red the grass beneath his feet,

and red his banners bright,

and red the glow of setting sun

that bathed him in its light.

“Come on, come on,” the great lord called,

“my sword is hungry still.”

And with a cry of savage rage,

They swarmed across the rill . . .
“Fighting is better than this waiting,” Brienne said. “You don’t feel 
so helpless when you fight. You have a sword and a horse, sometimes an axe. 
When you’re armored it’s hard for anyone to hurt you.”
“Knights die in battle,” Catelyn reminded her.
Brienne looked at her with those blue and beautiful eyes. “As ladies die in 
childbed. No one sings songs about them.”
“Children are a battle of a different sort.” Catelyn started across the yard. 
“A battle without banners or warhorns, but no less fierce. Carrying a child, 
bringing it into the world . . . your mother will have told you 
of the pain . . .”
“I never knew my mother,” Brienne said. “My father had 
ladies . . . a different lady every year, 
but . . .”
“Those were no ladies,” Catelyn said. “As hard as birth can be, Brienne, 
what comes after is even harder. At times I feel as though I am being torn 
apart. Would that there were five of me, one for each child, so I might keep 
them all safe.”
“And who would keep you safe, my lady?”
Her smile was wan and tired. “Why, the men of my House. Or so my lady mother 
taught me. My lord father, my brother, my

uncle, my husband, they will keep me safe . . . but while they 
are away from me, I suppose you must fill their place, Brienne.”
Brienne bowed her head. “I shall try, my lady.”
Later that day, Maester Vyman brought a letter. She saw him at once, hoping for 
some word from Robb, or from Ser Rodrik in Winterfell, but the message proved 
to be from one Lord Meadows, who named himself castellan of Storm’s End. It was 
addressed to her father, her brother, her son, “or whoever now holds 
Riverrun.” Ser Cortnay Penrose was dead, the man wrote, and Storm’s End had 
opened its gate to Stannis Baratheon, the trueborn and rightful heir. The 
castle garrison had sworn their swords to his cause, one and all, and no man of 
them had suffered harm.
“Save Cortnay Penrose,” Catelyn murmured. She had never met the man, yet she 
grieved to hear of his passing. “Robb should know of this at once,” she said. 
“Do we know where he is?”
“At last word he was marching toward the Crag, the seat of House Westerling,” 
said Maester Vyman. “If I dispatched a raven to Ashemark, it may be that they 
could send a rider after him.”
“Do so.”
Catelyn read the letter again after the maester was gone. “Lord Meadows says 
nothing of Robert’s bastard,” she confided to Brienne. “I suppose he yielded 
the boy with the rest, though I confess, I do not understand why Stannis wanted 
him so badly.”
“Perhaps he fears the boy’s claim.”
“A bastard’s claim? No, it’s something else . . . what does 
this child look like?”“He is seven or eight, comely, with black hair and bright blue eyes. 
Visitors oft thought him Lord Renly’s own son.”
“And Renly favored Robert.” Catelyn had a glimmer of understanding. “Stannis 
means to parade his brother’s bastard before the realm, so men might see Robert 
in his face and wonder why there is no such likeness in Joffrey.”
“Would that mean so much?”
“Those who favor Stannis will call it proof. Those who support Joffrey will 
say it means nothing.” Her own children had more Tully about them than Stark. 
Arya was the only one to show much of Ned in her features. And Jon Snow, 
but he was never mine. She found herself thinking of Jon’s mother, that 
shadowy secret love her husband would never speak of. Does she grieve for 
Ned as I do? Or did she hate him for leaving her bed for mine? Does she pray 
for her son as I have prayed for mine?
They were uncomfortable thoughts, and futile. If Jon had been born of Ashara 
Dayne of Starfall, as some whispered, the lady was long dead; if not, Catelyn 
had no clue who or where his mother might be. And it made no matter. Ned was 
gone now, and his loves and his secrets had all died with him.
Still, she was struck again by how strangely men behaved when it came to their 
bastards. Ned had always been fiercely protective of Jon, and Ser Cortnay 
Penrose had given up his life for this Edric Storm, yet Roose Bolton’s bastard 
had meant less to him than one of his dogs, to judge from the tone of the queer 
cold letter Edmure had gotten from him not three days past. He had

crossed the Trident and was marching on Harrenhal as commanded, he wrote. “A 
strong castle, and well garrisoned, but His Grace shall have it, if I must kill 
every living soul within to make it so.” He hoped His Grace would weigh that 
against the crimes of his bastard son, whom Ser Rodrik Cassel had put to death. 
“A fate he no doubt earned,” Bolton had written. “Tainted blood is ever 
treacherous, and Ramsay’s nature was sly, greedy, and cruel. I count myself 
well rid of him. The trueborn sons my young wife has promised me would never 
have been safe while he lived.”
The sound of hurrying footsteps drove the morbid thoughts from her head. Ser 
Desmond’s squire dashed panting into the room and knelt. “My 
lady . . . Lannisters . . . across the 
river.”
“Take a long breath, lad, and tell it slowly.”
He did as she bid him. “A column of armored men,” he reported. “Across the 
Red Fork. They are flying a purple unicorn below the lion of 
Lannister.”
Some son of Lord Brax. Brax had come to Riverrun once when she was a 
girl, to propose wedding one of his sons to her or Lysa. She wondered whether 
it was this same son out there now, leading the attack.
The Lannisters had ridden out of the southeast beneath a blaze of banners, Ser 
Desmond told her when she ascended to the battlements to join him. “A few 
outriders, no more,” he assured her. “The main strength of Lord Tywin’s host 
is well to the south. We are in no danger here.”
South of the Red Fork the land stretched away open and flat.

From the watchtower Catelyn could see for miles. Even so, only the nearest ford 
was visible. Edmure had entrusted Lord Jason Mallister with its defense, as 
well as that of three others farther upriver. The Lannister riders were milling 
about uncertainly near the water, crimson and silver banners flapping in the 
wind. “No more than fifty, my lady,” Ser Desmond estimated.
Catelyn watched the riders spread out in a long line. Lord Jason’s men waited 
to receive them behind rocks and grass and hillocks. A trumpet blast sent the 
horsemen forward at a ponderous walk, splashing down into the current. For a 
moment they made a brave show, all bright armor and streaming banners, the sun 
flashing off the points of their lances.
“Now,” she heard Brienne mutter.
It was hard to make out what was happening, but the screams of the horses 
seemed loud even at this remove, and beneath them Catelyn heard the fainter 
clash of steel on steel. A banner vanished suddenly as its bearer was swept 
under, and soon after the first dead man drifted past their walls, borne along 
by the current. By then the Lannisters had pulled back in confusion. She 
watched as they re-formed, conferred briefly, and galloped back the way they 
had come. The men on the walls shouted taunts after them, though they were 
already too far off to hear.
Ser Desmond slapped his belly. “Would that Lord Hoster could have seen that. 
It would have made him dance.”
“My father’s dancing days are past, I fear,” Catelyn said, “and this fight 
is just begun. The Lannisters will come again.

Lord Tywin has twice my brother’s numbers.”
“He could have ten times and it would not matter,” Ser Desmond said. “The 
west bank of the Red Fork is higher than the east, my lady, and well wooded. 
Our bowmen have good cover, and a clear field for their 
shafts . . . and should any breach occur, Edmure will have his 
best knights in reserve, ready to ride wherever they are most sorely needed. 
The river will hold them.”
“I pray that you are right,” Catelyn said gravely.
That night they came again. She had commanded them to wake her at once if the 
enemy returned, and well after midnight a serving girl touched her gently by 
the shoulder. Catelyn sat up at once. “What is it?”
“The ford again, my lady.”
Wrapped in a bedrobe, Catelyn climbed to the roof of the keep. From there she 
could see over the walls and the moonlit river to where the battle raged. The 
defenders had built watchfires along the bank, and perhaps the Lannisters 
thought to find them night-blind or unwary. If so, it was folly. Darkness was a 
chancy ally at best. As they waded in to breast their way across, men stepped 
in hidden pools and went down splashing, while others stumbled over stones or 
gashed their feet on the hidden caltrops. The Mallister bowmen sent a storm of 
fire arrows hissing across the river, strangely beautiful from afar. One man, 
pierced through a dozen times, his clothes afire, danced and whirled in the 
knee-deep water until at last he fell and was swept downstream. By the time his 
body came bobbing past Riverrun, the

fires and his life had both been extinguished.
A small victory, Catelyn thought when the fighting had ended and the 
surviving foemen had melted back into the night, yet a victory 
nonetheless. As they descended the winding turret steps, Catelyn asked 
Brienne for her thoughts. “That was the brush of Lord Tywin’s fingertip, my 
lady,” the girl said. “He is probing, feeling for a weak point, an undefended 
crossing. If he does not find one, he will curl all his fingers into a fist and 
try and make one.” Brienne hunched her shoulders. “That’s what I’d do. Were I 
him.” Her hand went to the hilt of her sword and gave it a little pat, as if 
to make certain it was still there.
And may the gods help us then, Catelyn thought. Yet there was
nothing 
she could do for it. That was Edmure’s battle out there on the river; hers was 
here inside the castle.
The next morning as she broke her fast, she sent for her father’s aged steward, 
Utherydes Wayn. “Have Ser Cleos Frey brought a flagon of wine. I mean to 
question him soon, and I want his tongue well loosened.”
“As you command, my lady.”
Not long after, a rider with the Mallister eagle sewn on his breast arrived 
with a message from Lord Jason, telling of another skirmish and another 
victory. Ser Flement Brax had tried to force a crossing at a different ford six 
leagues to the south. This time the Lannisters shortened their lances and 
advanced across the river behind on foot, but the Mallister bowmen had rained 
high arcing shots down over their shields, while the scorpions Edmure

had mounted on the riverbank sent heavy stones crashing through to break up the 
formation. “They left a dozen dead in the water, only two reaching the 
shallows, where we dealt with them briskly,” the rider reported. He also told 
of fighting farther upstream, where Lord Karyl Vance held the fords. “Those 
thrusts too were turned aside, at grievous cost to our foes.”
Perhaps Edmure was wiser than I knew, Catelyn thought. His lords 
all saw the sense in his battle plans, why was I so blind? My brother is not 
the little boy I remember, no more than Robb is.
She waited until evening before going to pay her call upon Ser Cleos Frey, 
reasoning that the longer she delayed, the drunker he was likely to be. As she 
entered the tower cell, Ser Cleos stumbled to his knees. “My lady, I knew 
naught of any escape. The Imp said a Lannister must needs have a Lannister 
escort, on my oath as a knight—”
“Arise, ser.” Catelyn seated herself. “I know no grandson of Walder Frey 
would be an oathbreaker.” Unless it served his purpose. “You 
brought peace terms, my brother said.”
“I did.” Ser Cleos lurched to his feet. She was pleased to see how unsteady 
he was.
“Tell me,” she commanded, and he did.
When he was done, Catelyn sat frowning. Edmure had been right, these were no 
terms at all, except . . . “Lannister will exchange Arya and 
Sansa for his brother?”
“Yes. He sat on the Iron Throne and swore it.”
“Before witnesses?”“Before all the court, my lady. And the gods as well. I said as much to 
Ser Edmure, but he told me it was not possible, that His Grace Robb would never 
consent.”
“He told you true.” She could not even say that Robb was wrong. Arya and 
Sansa were children. The Kingslayer, alive and free, was as dangerous as any 
man in the realm. That road led nowhere. “Did you see my girls? Are they 
treated well?”
Ser Cleos hesitated. “I . . . yes, they 
seemed . . .”
He is fumbling for a lie, Catelyn realized, but the wine has 
fuddled his wits. “Ser Cleos,” she said coolly, “you forfeited the 
protection of your peace banner when your men played us false. Lie to me, and 
you’ll hang from the walls beside them. Believe that. I shall ask you once 
more—did you see my daughters?”
His brow was damp with sweat. “I saw Sansa at the court, the day Tyrion told 
me his terms. She looked most beautiful, my lady. Perhaps a, a bit wan. Drawn, 
as it were.”
Sansa, but not Arya. That might mean anything. Arya had always been 
harder to tame. Perhaps Cersei was reluctant to parade her in open court for 
fear of what she might say or do. They might have her locked safely out of 
sight. Or they might have killed her. Catelyn shoved the thought 
away. “His terms, you said . . . yet Cersei is Queen 
Regent.”
“Tyrion spoke for both of them. The queen was not there. She was indisposed 
that day, I was told.”
“Curious.” Catelyn thought back to that terrible trek through the Mountains 
of the Moon, and the way Tyrion Lannister

had somehow seduced that sellsword from her service to his own. The dwarf 
is too clever by half. She could not imagine how he had survived the high 
road after Lysa had sent him from the Vale, yet it did not surprise her. 
He had no part in Ned’s murder, at the least. And he came to my defense 
when the clansmen attacked us. If I could trust his 
word . . .
She opened her hands to look down at the scars across her fingers. His 
dagger’s marks, she reminded herself. His dagger, in the hand of the 
killer he paid to open Bran’s throat. Though the dwarf denied it, to be 
sure. Even after Lysa locked him in one of her sky cells and threatened him 
with her moon door, he had still denied it. “He lied,” she said, rising 
abruptly. “The Lannisters are liars every one, and the dwarf is the worst of 
them. The killer was armed with his own knife.”
Ser Cleos stared. “I know nothing of any—”
“You know nothing,” she agreed, sweeping from the cell. Brienne fell in 
beside her, silent. It is simpler for her, Catelyn thought with a 
pang of envy. She was like a man in that. For men the answer was always the 
same, and never farther away than the nearest sword. For a woman, a mother, the 
way was stonier and harder to know.
She took a late supper in the Great Hall with her garrison, to give them what 
encouragement she could. Rymund the Rhymer sang through all the courses, 
sparing her the need to talk. He closed with the song he had written about 
Robb’s victory at Oxcross. “And the stars in the night were the eyes of 
his wolves, and the

wind itself was their song.” Between the verses, Rymund threw back his 
head and howled, and by the end, half of the hall was howling along with him, 
even Desmond Grell, who was well in his cups. Their voices rang off the 
rafters.
Let them have their songs, if it makes them brave, Catelyn thought, 
toying with her silver goblet.
“There was always a singer at Evenfall Hall when I was a girl,” Brienne said 
quietly. “I learned all the songs by heart.”
“Sansa did the same, though few singers ever cared to make the long journey 
north to Winterfell.” I told her there would be singers at the king’s 
court, though. I told her she would hear music of all sorts, that her father 
could find some master to help her learn the high harp. Oh, gods forgive 
me . . .
Brienne said, “I remember a woman . . . she came from some 
place across the narrow sea. I could not even say what language she sang in, 
but her voice was as lovely as she was. She had eyes the color of plums and her 
waist was so tiny my father could put his hands around it. His hands were 
almost as big as mine.” She closed her long, thick fingers, as if to hide 
them.
“Did you sing for your father?” Catelyn asked.
Brienne shook her head, staring down at her trencher as if to find some answer 
in the gravy.
“For Lord Renly?”
The girl reddened. “Never, I . . . his fool, he made cruel 
japes sometimes, and I . . .”
“Someday you must sing for me.”“I . . . please, I have no gift.” Brienne pushed back 
from the table. “Forgive me, my lady. Do I have your leave to go?”
Catelyn nodded. The tall, ungainly girl left the hall with long strides, almost 
unnoticed amidst the revelry. May the gods go with her, she thought 
as she returned listlessly to her supper.
It was three days later when the hammer blow that Brienne had foretold fell, 
and five days before they heard of it. Catelyn was sitting with her father when 
Edmure’s messenger arrived. The man’s armor was dinted, his boots dusty, and he 
had a ragged hole in his surcoat, but the look on his face as he knelt was 
enough to tell her that the news was good. “Victory, my lady.” He handed her 
Edmure’s letter. Her hand trembled as she broke the seal.
Lord Tywin had tried to force a crossing at a dozen different fords, her 
brother wrote, but every thrust had been thrown back. Lord Lefford had been 
drowned, the Crakehall knight called Strongboar taken captive, Ser Addam 
Marbrand thrice forced to retreat . . . but the fiercest battle 
had been fought at Stone Mill, where Ser Gregor Clegane had led the assault. So 
many of his men had fallen that their dead horses threatened to dam the flow. 
In the end the Mountain and a handful of his best had gained the west bank, but 
Edmure had thrown his reserve at them, and they had shattered and reeled away 
bloody and beaten. Ser Gregor himself had lost his horse and staggered back 
across the Red Fork bleeding from a dozen wounds while a rain of arrows and 
stones fell all around him. “They shall not cross, Cat,” Edmure scrawled, 
“Lord Tywin is marching to the southeast. A feint

perhaps, or full retreat, it matters not. They shall not 
cross.”
Ser Desmond Grell had been elated. “Oh, if only I might have been with him,” 
the old knight said when she read him the letter. “Where is that fool Rymund? 
There’s a song in this, by the gods, and one that even Edmure will want to 
hear. The mill that ground the Mountain down, I could almost make the words 
myself, had I the singer’s gift.”
“I’ll hear no songs until the fighting’s done,” Catelyn said, perhaps too 
sharply. Yet she allowed Ser Desmond to spread the word, and agreed when he 
suggested breaking open some casks in honor of Stone Mill. The mood within 
Riverrun had been strained and somber; they would all be better for a little 
drink and hope.
That night the castle rang to the sounds of celebration. 
“Riverrun!” the smallfolk shouted, and “Tully! Tully!” They’d 
come frightened and helpless, and her brother had taken them in when most lords 
would have closed their gates. Their voices floated in through the high 
windows, and seeped under the heavy redwood doors. Rymund played his harp, 
accompanied by a pair of drummers and a youth with a set of reed pipes. Catelyn 
listened to girlish laughter, and the excited chatter of the green boys her 
brother had left her for a garrison. Good sounds . . . and yet 
they did not touch her. She could not share their happiness.
In her father’s solar she found a heavy leatherbound book of maps and opened it 
to the riverlands. Her eyes found the path of the Red Fork and traced it by 
flickering candlelight. Marching to the southeast, she thought. By 
now they had likely reached the

headwaters of the Blackwater Rush, she decided.
She closed the book even more uneasy than before. The gods had granted them 
victory after victory. At Stone Mill, at Oxcross, in the Battle of the 
Camps, at the Whispering Wood . . .
But if we are winning, why am I so afraid?

The Great Hall of Riverrun was a lonely place for two to sit to supper. 
Deep shadows draped the walls. One of the torches had guttered out, leaving 
only three. Catelyn sat staring into her wine goblet. The vintage tasted thin 
and sour on her tongue. Brienne was across from her. Between them, her father’s 
high seat was as empty as the rest of the hall. Even the servants were gone. 
She had given them leave to join the celebration.The walls of the keep were thick, yet even so, they could hear the 
muffled sounds of revelry from the yard outside. Ser Desmond had brought twenty 
casks up from the cellars, and the smallfolk were celebrating Edmure’s imminent 
return and Robb’s conquest of the Crag by hoisting horns of nut-brown 
ale.
I cannot blame them, Catelyn thought. They do not know. And if 
they did, why should they care? They never knew my sons. Never watched Bran 
climb with their hearts in their throats, pride and terror so mingled they 
seemed as one, never heard him laugh, never smiled to see Rickon trying so 
fiercely to be like his older brothers. She stared at the supper set 
before her: trout wrapped in bacon, salad of turnip greens and red fennel and 
sweetgrass, pease and onions and hot bread. Brienne was eating methodically, as 
if supper were another chore to be accomplished. I am become a sour 
woman, Catelyn thought. I take no joy in mead nor meat, and

song and laughter have become suspicious strangers to me. I am a creature of 
grief and dust and bitter longings. There is an empty place within me where my 
heart was once.
The sound of the other woman’s eating had become intolerable to her. “Brienne, 
I am no fit company. Go join the revels, if you would. Drink a horn of ale and 
dance to Rymund’s harping.”
“I am not made for revels, my lady.” Her big hands tore apart a heel of black 
bread. Brienne stared at the chunks as if she had forgotten what they were. 
“If you command it, I . . .”
Catelyn could sense her discomfort. “I only thought you might enjoy happier 
company than mine.”
“I’m well content.” The girl used the bread to sop up some of the bacon 
grease the trout had been fried in.
“There was another bird this morning.” Catelyn did not know why she said it. 
“The maester woke me at once. That was dutiful, but not kind. Not kind at 
all.” She had not meant to tell Brienne. No one knew but her and Maester 
Vyman, and she had meant to keep it that way 
until . . . until . . .
Until what? Foolish woman, will holding it secret in your heart make it 
any less true? If you never tell, never speak of it, will it become only a 
dream, less than a dream, a nightmare half-remembered? Oh, if only the gods 
would be so good.
“Is it news of King’s Landing?” asked Brienne.
“Would that it was. The bird came from Castle Cerwyn, from Ser Rodrik, my 
castellan.” Dark wings, dark words. “He has gathered what power he 
could and is marching on Winterfell, to

take the castle back.” How unimportant all that sounded now. “But he 
said . . . he wrote . . . he told me, 
he . . .”
“My lady, what is it? Is it some news of your sons?”
Such a simple question that was; would that the answer could be as simple. When 
Catelyn tried to speak, the words caught in her throat. “I have no sons but 
Robb.” She managed those terrible words without a sob, and for that much she 
was glad.
Brienne looked at her with horror. “My lady?”
“Bran and Rickon tried to escape, but were taken at a mill on the Acorn Water. 
Theon Greyjoy has mounted their heads on the walls of Winterfell. Theon 
Greyjoy, who ate at my table since he was a boy of ten.” I have said it, 
gods forgive me. I have said it and made it true.
Brienne’s face was a watery blur. She reached across the table, but her fingers 
stopped short of Catelyn’s, as if the touch might be unwelcome. 
“I . . . there are no words, my lady. My good lady. Your sons, 
they . . . they’re with the gods now.”
“Are they?” Catelyn said sharply. “What god would let this happen? Rickon 
was only a baby. How could he deserve such a death? And 
Bran . . . when I left the north, he had not opened his eyes 
since his fall. I had to go before he woke. Now I can never return to him, or 
hear him laugh again.” She showed Brienne her palms, her fingers. “These 
scars . . . they sent a man to cut Bran’s throat as he lay 
sleeping. He would have died then, and me with him, but Bran’s wolf tore out 
the man’s throat.” That gave her a moment’s pause. “I suppose Theon killed 
the wolves too. He must

have, elsewise . . . I was certain the boys would be safe so 
long as the direwolves were with them. Like Robb with his Grey Wind. But my 
daughters have no wolves now.”
The abrupt shift of topic left Brienne bewildered. “Your 
daughters . . .”
“Sansa was a lady at three, always so courteous and eager to please. She loved 
nothing so well as tales of knightly valor. Men would say she had my look, but 
she will grow into a woman far more beautiful than I ever was, you can see 
that. I often sent away her maid so I could brush her hair myself. She had 
auburn hair, lighter than mine, and so thick and soft . . . the 
red in it would catch the light of the torches and shine like copper.
“And Arya, well . . . Ned’s visitors would oft mistake her for 
a stableboy if they rode into the yard unannounced. Arya was a trial, it must 
be said. Half a boy and half a wolf pup. Forbid her anything and it became her 
heart’s desire. She had Ned’s long face, and brown hair that always looked as 
though a bird had been nesting in it. I despaired of ever making a lady of her. 
She collected scabs as other girls collect dolls, and would say anything that 
came into her head. I think she must be dead too.” When she said that, it felt 
as though a giant hand were squeezing her chest. “I want them all dead, 
Brienne. Theon Greyjoy first, then Jaime Lannister and Cersei and the Imp, 
every one, every one. But my girls . . . my girls 
will . . .”
“The queen . . . she has a little girl of her own,” Brienne 
said awkwardly. “And sons too, of an age with yours. When she

hears, perhaps she . . . she may take pity, 
and . . .”
“Send my daughters back unharmed?” Catelyn smiled sadly. “There is a sweet 
innocence about you, child. I could wish . . . but no. Robb 
will avenge his brothers. Ice can kill as dead as fire. Ice was Ned’s 
greatsword. Valyrian steel, marked with the ripples of a thousand foldings, so 
sharp I feared to touch it. Robb’s blade is dull as a cudgel compared to Ice. 
It will not be easy for him to get Theon’s head off, I fear. The Starks do not 
use headsmen. Ned always said that the man who passes the sentence should swing 
the blade, though he never took any joy in the duty. But I would, oh, 
yes.” She stared at her scarred hands, opened and closed them, then slowly 
raised her eyes. “I’ve sent him wine.”
“Wine?” Brienne was lost. “Robb? Or . . . Theon 
Greyjoy?”
“The Kingslayer.” The ploy had served her well with Cleos Frey. I hope 
you’re thirsty, Jaime. I hope your throat is dry and tight. “I would like 
you to come with me.”
“I am yours to command, my lady.”
“Good.” Catelyn rose abruptly. “Stay, finish your meal in peace. I will send 
for you later. At midnight.”
“So late, my lady?”
“The dungeons are windowless. One hour is much like another down there, and 
for me, all hours are midnight.” Her footsteps rang hollowly when Catelyn left 
the hall. As she climbed to Lord Hoster’s solar, she could hear them outside, 
shouting, “Tully!” and “A cup! A cup to the brave young lord!” My 
father is not dead, she wanted to shout down at them. My sons are 
dead, but my

father lives, damn you all, and he is your lord still.
Lord Hoster was deep in sleep. “He had a cup of dreamwine not so long ago, my 
lady,” Maester Vyman said. “For the pain. He will not know you are 
here.”
“It makes no matter,” Catelyn said. He is more dead than alive, yet more 
alive than my poor sweet sons.
“My lady, is there aught I might do for you? A sleeping draught, 
perhaps?”
“Thank you, Maester, but no. I will not sleep away my grief. Bran and Rickon 
deserve better from me. Go and join the celebration, I will sit with my father 
for a time.”
“As you will, my lady.” Vyman bowed and left her.
Lord Hoster lay on his back, mouth open, his breath a faint whistling sigh. One 
hand hung over the edge of the mattress, a pale frail fleshless thing, but warm 
when she touched it. She slid her fingers through his and closed them. No 
matter how tightly I hold him, I cannot keep him here, she thought sadly. 
Let him go. Yet her fingers would not seem to unbend.
“I have no one to talk with, Father,” she told him. “I pray, but the gods do 
not answer.” Lightly she kissed his hand. The skin was warm, blue veins 
branching like rivers beneath his pale translucent skin. Outside
the greater 
rivers flowed, the Red Fork and the Tumblestone, and they would flow forever, 
but not so the rivers in her father’s hand. Too soon that current would grow 
still. “Last night I dreamed of that time Lysa and I got lost while riding 
back from Seagard. Do you remember? That strange

fog came up and we fell behind the rest of the party. Everything was grey, and 
I could not see a foot past the nose of my horse. We lost the road. The 
branches of the trees were like long skinny arms reaching out to grab us as we 
passed. Lysa started to cry, and when I shouted the fog seemed to swallow the 
sound. But Petyr knew where we were, and he rode back and found 
us . . .”
“But there’s no one to find me now, is there? This time I have to find our own 
way, and it is hard, so hard.”
“I keep remembering the Stark words. Winter has come, Father. For me. For me. 
Robb must fight the Greyjoys now as well as the Lannisters, and for what? For a 
gold hat and an iron chair? Surely the land has bled enough. I want my girls 
back, I want Robb to lay down his sword and pick some homely daughter of Walder 
Frey to make him happy and give him sons. I want Bran and Rickon back, I 
want . . .” Catelyn hung her head. “I want,” she said 
once more, and then her words were gone.
After a time the candle guttered and went out. Moonlight slanted between the 
slats of the shutters, laying pale silvery bars across her father’s face. She 
could hear the soft whisper of his labored breathing, the endless rush of 
waters, the faint chords of some love song drifting up from the yard, so sad 
and sweet. “I loved a maid as red as autumn,” Rymund sang, 
“with sunset in her hair.”
Catelyn never noticed when the singing ended. Hours had passed, yet it seemed 
only a heartbeat before Brienne was at the door. “My lady,” she announced 
softly. “Midnight has come.”Midnight has come, Father, she thought, and I must do my 
duty. She let go of his hand.
The gaoler was a furtive little man with broken veins in his nose. They found 
him bent over a tankard of ale and the remains of a pigeon pie, more than a 
little drunk. He squinted at them suspiciously. “Begging your forgiveness, 
m’lady, but Lord Edmure says no one is to see the Kingslayer without a writing 
from him, with his seal upon it.”
“Lord Edmure? Has my father died, and no one told me?”
The gaoler licked his lips. “No, m’lady, not as I knows.”
“You will open the cell, or you will come with me to Lord Hoster’s solar and 
tell him why you saw fit to defy me.”
His eyes fell. “As m’lady says.” The keys were chained to the studded leather 
belt that girdled his waist. He muttered under his breath as he sorted through 
them, until he found the one that fit the door to the Kingslayer’s 
cell.
“Go back to your ale and leave us,” she commanded. An oil lamp hung from a 
hook on the low ceiling. Catelyn took it down and turned up the flame. 
“Brienne, see that I am not disturbed.”
Nodding, Brienne took up a position just outside the cell, her hand resting on 
the pommel of her sword. “My lady will call if she has need of me.”
Catelyn shouldered aside the heavy wood-and-iron door and stepped into foul 
darkness. This was the bowels of Riverrun, and smelled the part. Old straw 
crackled underfoot. The walls were discolored with patches of nitre. Through 
the stone, she could

hear the faint rush of the Tumblestone. The lamplight revealed a pail 
overflowing with feces in one corner and a huddled shape in another. The flagon 
of wine stood beside the door, untouched. So much for that ploy. I ought 
to be thankful that the gaoler did not drink it himself, I 
suppose.
Jaime raised his hands to cover his face, the chains around his wrists 
clanking. “Lady Stark,” he said, in a voice hoarse with disuse. “I fear I am 
in no condition to receive you.”
“Look at me, ser.”
“The light hurts my eyes. A moment, if you would.” Jaime Lannister had been 
allowed no razor since the night he was taken in the Whispering Wood, and a 
shaggy beard covered his face, once so like the queen’s. Glinting gold in the 
lamplight, the whiskers made him look like some great yellow beast, magnificent 
even in chains. His unwashed hair fell to his shoulders in ropes and tangles, 
the clothes were rotting on his body, his face was pale and 
wasted . . . and even so, the power and the beauty of the man 
were still apparent.
“I see you had no taste for the wine I sent you.”
“Such sudden generosity seemed somewhat suspect.”
“I can have your head off anytime I want. Why would I need to poison 
you?”
“Death by poison can seem natural. Harder to claim that my head simply fell 
off.” He squinted up from the floor, his cat-green eyes slowly becoming 
accustomed to the light. “I’d invite you to sit, but your brother has 
neglected to provide me a chair.”“I can stand well enough.”
“Can you? You look terrible, I must say. Though perhaps it’s just the light in 
here.” He was fettered at wrist and ankle, each cuff chained to the others, so 
he could neither stand nor lie comfortably. The ankle chains were bolted to the 
wall. “Are my bracelets heavy enough for you, or did you come to add a few 
more? I’ll rattle them prettily if you like.”
“You brought this on yourself,” she reminded him. “We granted you the 
comfort of a tower cell befitting your birth and station. You repaid us by 
trying to escape.”
“A cell is a cell. Some under Casterly Rock make this one seem a sunlit 
garden. One day perhaps I’ll show them to you.”
If he is cowed, he hides it well, Catelyn thought. “A man chained 
hand and foot should keep a more courteous tongue in his mouth, ser. I did not 
come here to be threatened.”
“No? Then surely it was to have your pleasure of me? It’s said that widows 
grow weary of their empty beds. We of the Kingsguard vow never to wed, but I 
suppose I could still service you if that’s what you need. Pour us some of that 
wine and slip out of that gown and we’ll see if I’m up to it.”
Catelyn stared down at him in revulsion. Was there ever a man as beautiful 
or as vile as this one? “If you said that in my son’s hearing, he would 
kill you for it.”
“Only so long as I was wearing these.” Jaime Lannister rattled his chains at 
her. “We both know the boy is afraid to face me in single combat.”“My son may be young, but if you take him for a fool, you are sadly 
mistaken . . . and it seems to me that you were not so quick to 
make challenges when you had an army at your back.”
“Did the old Kings of Winter hide behind their mothers’ skirts as 
well?”
“I grow weary of this, ser. There are things I must know.”
“Why should I tell you anything?”
“To save your life.”
“You think I fear death?” That seemed to amuse him.
“You should. Your crimes will have earned you a place of torment in the 
deepest of the seven hells, if the gods are just.”
“What gods are those, Lady Catelyn? The trees your husband prayed to? How well 
did they serve him when my sister took his head off?” Jaime gave a chuckle. 
“If there are gods, why is the world so full of pain and 
injustice?”
“Because of men like you.”
“There are no men like me. There’s only me.”
There is nothing here but arrogance and pride, and the empty courage of a 
madman. I am wasting my breath with this one. If there was ever a spark of 
honor in him, it is long dead. “If you will not speak with me, so be it. 
Drink the wine or piss in it, ser, it makes no matter to me.”
Her hand was at the door pull when he said, “Lady Stark.” She turned, waited. 
“Things go to rust in this damp,” Jaime went on. “Even a man’s courtesies. 
Stay, and you shall have your answers . . . for a price.”He has no shame. “Captives do not set prices.”
“Oh, you’ll find mine modest enough. Your turnkey tells me nothing but vile 
lies, and he cannot even keep them straight. One day he says Cersei has been 
flayed, and the next it’s my father. Answer my questions and I’ll answer 
yours.”
“Truthfully?”
“Oh, it’s truth you want? Be careful, my lady. Tyrion says that 
people often claim to hunger for truth, but seldom like the taste when it’s 
served up.”
“I am strong enough to hear anything you care to say.”
“As you will, then. But first, if you’d be so kind . . . the 
wine. My throat is raw.”
Catelyn hung the lamp from the door and moved the cup and flagon closer. Jaime 
sloshed the wine around his mouth before he swallowed. “Sour and vile,” he 
said, “but it will do.” He put his back to the wall, drew his knees up to his 
chest, and stared at her. “Your first question, Lady Catelyn?”
Not knowing how long this game might continue, Catelyn wasted no time. “Are 
you Joffrey’s father?”
“You would never ask unless you knew the answer.”
“I want it from your own lips.”
He shrugged. “Joffrey is mine. As are the rest of Cersei’s brood, I 
suppose.”
“You admit to being your sister’s lover?”
“I’ve always loved my sister, and you owe me two answers. Do all my kin still 
live?”“Ser Stafford Lannister was slain at Oxcross, I am told.”
Jaime was unmoved. “Uncle Dolt, my sister called him. It’s Cersei and Tyrion 
who concern me. As well as my lord father.”
“They live, all three.” But not long, if the gods are 
good.
Jaime drank some more wine. “Ask your next.”
Catelyn wondered if he would dare answer her next question with anything but a 
lie. “How did my son Bran come to fall?”
“I flung him from a window.”
The easy way he said it took her voice away for an instant. If I had a 
knife, I would kill him now, she thought, until she remembered the girls. 
Her throat constricted as she said, “You were a knight, sworn to defend the 
weak and innocent.”
“He was weak enough, but perhaps not so innocent. He was spying on 
us.”
“Bran would not spy.”
“Then blame those precious gods of yours, who brought the boy to our window 
and gave him a glimpse of something he was never meant to see.”
“Blame the gods?” she said, incredulous. “Yours was the hand that 
threw him. You meant for him to die.”
His chains chinked softly. “I seldom fling children from towers to improve 
their health. Yes, I meant for him to die.”
“And when he did not, you knew your danger was worse than ever, so you gave 
your catspaw a bag of silver to make certain Bran would never wake.”
“Did I now?” Jaime lifted his cup and took a long swallow.

“I won’t deny we talked of it, but you were with the boy day and night, your 
maester and Lord Eddard attended him frequently, and there were guards, even 
those damned direwolves . . . it would have required cutting my 
way through half of Winterfell. And why bother, when the boy seemed like to die 
of his own accord?”
“If you lie to me, this session is at an end.” Catelyn held out her hands, to 
show him her fingers and palms. “The man who came to slit Bran’s throat gave 
me these scars. You swear you had no part in sending him?”
“On my honor as a Lannister.”
“Your honor as a Lannister is worth less than this.” She kicked 
over the waste pail. Foul-smelling brown ooze crept across the floor of the 
cell, soaking into the straw.
Jaime Lannister backed away from the spill as far as his chains would allow. 
“I may indeed have shit for honor, I won’t deny it, but I have never yet hired 
anyone to do my killing. Believe what you will, Lady Stark, but if I had wanted 
your Bran dead I would have slain him myself.”
Gods be merciful, he’s telling the truth. “If you did not send the 
killer, your sister did.”
“If so, I’d know. Cersei keeps no secrets from me.”
“Then it was the Imp.”
“Tyrion is as innocent as your Bran. He wasn’t climbing around 
outside of anyone’s window, spying.”
“Then why did the assassin have his dagger?”
“What dagger was this?”“It was so long,” she said, holding her hands apart, “plain, but 
finely made, with a blade of Valyrian steel and a dragonbone hilt. Your brother 
won it from Lord Baelish at the tourney on Prince Joffrey’s name 
day.”
Lannister poured, drank, poured, and stared into his wine cup. “This wine 
seems to be improving as I drink it. Imagine that. I seem to remember that 
dagger, now that you describe it. Won it, you say? How?”
“Wagering on you when you tilted against the Knight of Flowers.” Yet when she 
heard her own words Catelyn knew she had gotten it wrong. 
“No . . . was it the other way?”
“Tyrion always backed me in the lists,” Jaime said, “but that day Ser Loras 
unhorsed me. A mischance, I took the boy too lightly, but no matter. Whatever 
my brother wagered, he lost . . . but that dagger did 
change hands, I recall it now. Robert showed it to me that night at the feast. 
His Grace loved to salt my wounds, especially when drunk. And when was he not 
drunk?”
Tyrion Lannister had said much the same thing as they rode through the 
Mountains of the Moon, Catelyn remembered. She had refused to believe him. 
Petyr had sworn otherwise, Petyr who had been almost a brother, Petyr who loved 
her so much he fought a duel for her hand . . . and yet if 
Jaime and Tyrion told the same tale, what did that mean? The brothers had not 
seen each other since departing Winterfell more than a year ago. “Are you 
trying to deceive me?” Somewhere there was a trap here.
“I’ve admitted to shoving your precious urchin out a window,

what would it gain me to lie about this knife?” He tossed down another cup of 
wine. “Believe what you will, I’m past caring what people say of me. And it’s 
my turn. Have Robert’s brothers taken the field?”
“They have.”
“Now there’s a niggardly response. Give me more than that, or your next answer 
will be as poor.”
“Stannis marches against King’s Landing,” she said grudgingly. “Renly is 
dead, murdered at Bitterbridge by his brother, through some black art I do not 
understand.”
“A pity,” Jaime said. “I rather liked Renly, though Stannis is quite another 
tale. What side have the Tyrells taken?”
“Renly, at first. Now, I could not say.”
“Your boy must be feeling lonely.”
“Robb was sixteen a few days past . . . a man grown, and a 
king. He’s won every battle he’s fought. The last word we had from him, he had 
taken the Crag from the Westerlings.”
“He hasn’t faced my father yet, has he?”
“When he does, he’ll defeat him. As he did you.”
“He took me unawares. A craven’s trick.”
“You dare talk of tricks? Your brother Tyrion sent us cutthroats in envoy’s 
garb, under a peace banner.”
“If it were one of your sons in this cell, wouldn’t his brothers do as much 
for him?”
My son has no brothers, she thought, but she would not share her pain 
with a creature such as this.Jaime drank some more wine. “What’s a brother’s life when honor is at 
stake, eh?” Another sip. “Tyrion is clever enough to realize that your son 
will never consent to ransom me.”
Catelyn could not deny it. “Robb’s bannermen would sooner see you dead. 
Rickard Karstark in particular. You slew two of his sons in the Whispering 
Wood.”
“The two with the white sunburst, were they?” Jaime gave a shrug. “If truth 
be told, it was your son that I was trying to slay. The others got in 
my way. I killed them in fair fight, in the heat of battle. Any other knight 
would have done the same.”
“How can you still count yourself a knight, when you have forsaken every vow 
you ever swore?”
Jaime reached for the flagon to refill his cup. “So many 
vows . . . they make you swear and swear. Defend the king. Obey 
the king. Keep his secrets. Do his bidding. Your life for his. But obey your 
father. Love your sister. Protect the innocent. Defend the weak. Respect the 
gods. Obey the laws. It’s too much. No matter what you do, you’re forsaking one 
vow or the other.” He took a healthy swallow of wine and closed his eyes for 
an instant, leaning his head back against the patch of nitre on the wall. “I 
was the youngest man ever to wear the white cloak.”
“And the youngest to betray all it stood for, Kingslayer.”
“Kingslayer,” he pronounced carefully. “And such a king he was!” 
He lifted his cup. “To Aerys Targaryen, the Second of His Name, Lord of the 
Seven Kingdoms and Protector of the Realm. And to the sword that 
opened his throat. A golden sword, don’t you

know. Until his blood ran red down the blade. Those are the Lannister colors, 
red and gold.”
As he laughed, she realized the wine had done its work; Jaime had drained most 
of the flagon, and he was drunk. “Only a man like you would be proud of such 
an act.”
“I told you, there are no men like me. Answer me this, Lady Stark—did 
your Ned ever tell you the manner of his father’s death? Or his 
brother’s?”
“They strangled Brandon while his father watched, and then killed Lord Rickard 
as well.” An ugly tale, and sixteen years old. Why was he asking about it 
now?
“Killed, yes, but how?”
“The cord or the axe, I suppose.”
Jaime took a swallow, wiped his mouth. “No doubt Ned wished to spare you. His 
sweet young bride, if not quite a maiden. Well, you wanted truth. Ask me. We 
made a bargain, I can deny you nothing. Ask.”
“Dead is dead.” I do not want to know this.
“Brandon was different from his brother, wasn’t he? He had blood in his veins 
instead of cold water. More like me.”
“Brandon was nothing like you.”
“If you say so. You and he were to wed.”
“He was on his way to Riverrun when . . .” Strange, how telling 
it still made her throat grow tight, after all these years. 
“. . . when he heard about Lyanna, and went to King’s Landing 
instead. It was a rash thing to do.” She remembered how

her own father had raged when the news had been brought to Riverrun. The 
gallant fool, was what he called Brandon.
Jaime poured the last half cup of wine. “He rode into the Red Keep with a few 
companions, shouting for Prince Rhaegar to come out and die. But Rhaegar wasn’t 
there. Aerys sent his guards to arrest them all for plotting his son’s murder. 
The others were lords’ sons too, it seems to me.”
“Ethan Glover was Brandon’s squire,” Catelyn said. “He was the only one to 
survive. The others were Jeffory Mallister, Kyle Royce, and Elbert Arryn, Jon 
Arryn’s nephew and heir.” It was queer how she still remembered the names, 
after so many years. “Aerys accused them of treason and summoned their fathers 
to court to answer the charge, with the sons as hostages. When they came, he 
had them murdered without trial. Fathers and sons both.”
“There were trials. Of a sort. Lord Rickard demanded trial by combat, and the 
king granted the request. Stark armored himself as for battle, thinking to duel 
one of the Kingsguard. Me, perhaps. Instead they took him to the throne room 
and suspended him from the rafters while two of Aerys’s pyromancers kindled a 
blaze beneath him. The king told him that fire was the champion of 
House Targaryen. So all Lord Rickard needed to do to prove himself innocent of 
treason was . . . well, not burn.
“When the fire was blazing, Brandon was brought in. His hands were chained 
behind his back, and around his neck was a wet leathern cord attached to a 
device the king had brought from Tyrosh. His legs were left free, though, and 
his longsword was

set down just beyond his reach.
“The pyromancers roasted Lord Rickard slowly, banking and fanning that fire 
carefully to get a nice even heat. His cloak caught first, and then his 
surcoat, and soon he wore nothing but metal and ashes. Next he would start to 
cook, Aerys promised . . . unless his son could free him. 
Brandon tried, but the more he struggled, the tighter the cord constricted 
around his throat. In the end he strangled himself.
“As for Lord Rickard, the steel of his breastplate turned cherry-red before 
the end, and his gold melted off his spurs and dripped down into the fire. I 
stood at the foot of the Iron Throne in my white armor and white cloak, filling 
my head with thoughts of Cersei. After, Gerold Hightower himself took me aside 
and said to me, ‘You swore a vow to guard the king, not to judge him.’ That was 
the White Bull, loyal to the end and a better man than me, all 
agree.”
“Aerys . . .” Catelyn could taste bile at the back of her throat. 
The story was so hideous she suspected it had to be true. “Aerys was mad, the 
whole realm knew it, but if you would have me believe you slew him to avenge 
Brandon Stark . . .”
“I made no such claim. The Starks were nothing to me. I will say, I think it 
passing odd that I am loved by one for a kindness I never did, and reviled by 
so many for my finest act. At Robert’s coronation, I was made to kneel at the 
royal feet beside Grand Maester Pycelle and Varys the eunuch, so that he might 
forgive us our crimes before he took us into his service.

As for your Ned, he should have kissed the hand that slew Aerys, but he 
preferred to scorn the arse he found sitting on Robert’s throne. I think Ned 
Stark loved Robert better than he ever loved his brother or his 
father . . . or even you, my lady. He was never unfaithful to 
Robert, was he?” Jaime gave a drunken laugh. “Come, Lady Stark, don’t you 
find this all terribly amusing?”
“I find nothing about you amusing, Kingslayer.”
“That name again. I don’t think I’ll fuck you after all, Littlefinger had you 
first, didn’t he? I never eat off another man’s trencher. Besides, you’re not 
half so lovely as my sister.” His smile cut. “I’ve never lain with any woman 
but Cersei. In my own way, I have been truer than your Ned ever was. Poor old 
dead Ned. So who has shit for honor now, I ask you? What was the name of that 
bastard he fathered?”
Catelyn took a step backward. “Brienne.”
“No, that wasn’t it.” Jaime Lannister upended the flagon. A trickle ran down 
onto his face, bright as blood. “Snow, that was the one. Such a 
white name . . . like the pretty cloaks they give us 
in the Kingsguard when we swear our pretty oaths.”
Brienne pushed open the door and stepped inside the cell. “You called, my 
lady?”
“Give me your sword.” Catelyn held out her hand.

Ser Desmond Grell had served House Tully all his life. He had been a squire when Catelyn was born, a knight when she learned to walk and ride and swim, master-at-arms by the day that she was wed. He had seen Lord Hoster’s little Cat become a young woman, a great lord’s lady, mother to a king. And now he has seen me become a traitor as well.
Her brother Edmure had named Ser Desmond castellan of Riverrun when he rode off to battle, so it fell to him to deal with her crime. To ease his discomfort he brought her father’s steward with him, dour Utherydes Wayn. The two men stood and looked at her; Ser Desmond stout, red-faced, embarrassed, Utherydes grave, gaunt, melancholy. Each waited for the other to speak. They have given their lives to my father’s service, and I have repaid them with disgrace, Catelyn thought wearily.
“Your sons,” Ser Desmond said at last. “Maester Vyman told us. The poor lads. Terrible. Terrible. But . . .”
“We share your grief, my lady,” said Utherydes Wayn. “All Riverrun mourns with you, but . . .”
“The news must have driven you mad,” Ser Desmond broke in, “a madness of grief, a mother’s madness, men will understand. You did not know . . .”
“I did,” Catelyn said firmly. “I understood what I was doing and knew it was treasonous. If you fail to punish me, men will believe that we connived together to free Jaime Lannister. It was mine own act and mine alone, and I alone must answer for it. Put me in the Kingslayer’s empty irons, and I will wear them proudly, if that is how it must be.”
“Fetters?” The very word seemed to shock poor Ser Desmond. “For the king’s mother, my lord’s own daughter? Impossible.”
“Mayhaps,” said the steward Utherydes Wayn, “my lady would consent to be confined to her chambers until Ser Edmure returns. A time alone, to pray for her murdered sons?”
“Confined, aye,” Ser Desmond said. “Confined to a tower cell, that would serve.”
“If I am to be confined, let it be in my father’s chambers, so I might comfort him in his last days.”
Ser Desmond considered a moment. “Very well. You shall lack no comfort nor courtesy, but freedom of the castle is denied you. Visit the sept as you need, but elsewise remain in Lord Hoster’s chambers until Lord Edmure returns.”
“As you wish.” Her brother was no lord while their father lived, but Catelyn did not correct him. “Set a guard on me if you must, but I give you my pledge that I shall attempt no escape.”
Ser Desmond nodded, plainly glad to be done with his distasteful task, but sad-eyed Utherydes Wayn lingered a moment after the castellan took his leave. “It was a grave thing you did, my lady, but for naught. Ser Desmond has sent Ser Robin Ryger after them, to bring back the Kingslayer . . . or failing that, his head.”
Catelyn had expected no less. May the Warrior give strength to your sword arm, Brienne, she prayed. She had done all she could; nothing remained but to hope.
Her things were moved into her father’s bedchamber, dominated by the great canopied bed she had been born in, its pillars carved in the shapes of leaping trout. Her father himself had been moved half a turn down the stair, his sickbed placed to face the triangular balcony that opened off his solar, from whence he could see the rivers that he had always loved so well.
Lord Hoster was sleeping when Catelyn entered. She went out to the balcony and stood with one hand on the rough stone balustrade. Beyond the point of the castle the swift Tumblestone joined the placid Red Fork, and she could see a long way downriver. If a striped sail comes from the east, it will be Ser Robin returning. For the moment the surface of the waters was empty. She thanked the gods for that, and went back inside to sit with her father.
Catelyn could not say if Lord Hoster knew that she was there, or if her presence brought him any comfort, but it gave her solace to be with him. What would you say if you knew my crime, Father? she wondered. Would you have done as I did, if it were Lysa and me in the hands of our enemies? Or would you condemn me too, and call it mother’s madness?
There was a smell of death about that room; a heavy smell, sweet and foul, clinging. It reminded her of the sons that she had lost, her sweet Bran and her little Rickon, slain at the hand of Theon Greyjoy, who had been Ned’s ward. She still grieved for Ned, she would always grieve for Ned, but to have her babies taken as well . . . “It is a monstrous cruel thing to lose a child,” she whispered softly, more to herself than to her father.
Lord Hoster’s eyes opened. “Tansy,” he husked in a voice thick with pain.
He does not know me. Catelyn had grown accustomed to him taking her for her mother or her sister Lysa, but Tansy was a name strange to her. “It’s Catelyn,” she said. “It’s Cat, Father.”
“Forgive me . . . the blood . . . oh, please . . . Tansy . . .”
Could there have been another woman in her father’s life? Some village maiden he had wronged when he was young, perhaps? Could he have found comfort in some serving wench’s arms after Mother died? It was a queer thought, unsettling. Suddenly she felt as though she had not known her father at all. “Who is Tansy, my lord? Do you want me to send for her, Father? Where would I find the woman? Does she still live?”
Lord Hoster groaned. “Dead.” His hand groped for hers. “You’ll have others . . . sweet babes, and trueborn.”
Others? Catelyn thought. Has he forgotten that Ned is gone? Is he still talking to Tansy, or is it me now, or Lysa, or Mother?
When he coughed, the sputum came up bloody. He clutched her fingers. “. . . be a good wife and the gods will bless you . . . sons . . . trueborn sons . . . aaahhh.” The sudden spasm of pain made Lord Hoster’s hand tighten. His nails dug into her hand, and he gave a muffled scream.
Maester Vyman came quickly, to mix another dose of milk of the poppy and help his lord swallow it down. Soon enough, Lord Hoster Tully had fallen back into a heavy sleep.
“He was asking after a woman,” said Cat. “Tansy.”
“Tansy?” The maester looked at her blankly.
“You know no one by that name? A serving girl, a woman from some nearby village? Perhaps someone from years past?” Catelyn had been gone from Riverrun for a very long time.
“No, my lady. I can make inquiries, if you like. Utherydes Wayn would surely know if any such person ever served at Riverrun. Tansy, did you say? The smallfolk often name their daughters after flowers and herbs.” The maester looked thoughtful. “There was a widow, I recall, she used to come to the castle looking for old shoes in need of new soles. Her name was Tansy, now that I think on it. Or was it Pansy? Some such. But she has not come for many years . . .”
“Her name was Violet,” said Catelyn, who remembered the old woman very well.
“Was it?” The maester looked apologetic. “My pardons, Lady Catelyn, but I may not stay. Ser Desmond has decreed that we are to speak to you only so far as our duties require.”
“Then you must do as he commands.” Catelyn could not blame Ser Desmond; she had given him small reason to trust her, and no doubt he feared that she might use the loyalty that many of the folk of Riverrun would still feel toward their lord’s daughter to work some further mischief. I am free of the war, at least, she told herself, if only for a little while.
After the maester had gone, she donned a woolen cloak and stepped out onto the balcony once more. Sunlight shimmered on the rivers, gilding the surface of the waters as they rolled past the castle. Catelyn shaded her eyes against the glare, searching for a distant sail, dreading the sight of one. But there was nothing, and nothing meant that her hopes were still alive.
All that day she watched, and well into the night, until her legs ached from the standing. A raven came to the castle in late afternoon, flapping down on great black wings to the rookery. Dark wings, dark words, she thought, remembering the last bird that had come and the horror it had brought.
Maester Vyman returned at evenfall to minister to Lord Tully and bring Catelyn a modest supper of bread, cheese, and boiled beef with horseradish. “I spoke to Utherydes Wayn, my lady. He is quite certain that no woman by the name of Tansy has ever been at Riverrun during his service.”
“There was a raven today, I saw. Has Jaime been taken again?” Or slain, gods forbid?
“No, my lady, we’ve had no word of the Kingslayer.”
“Is it another battle, then? Is Edmure in difficulty? Or Robb? Please, be kind, put my fears at rest.”
“My lady, I should not . . .” Vyman glanced about, as if to make certain no one else was in the room. “Lord Tywin has left the riverlands. All’s quiet on the fords.”
“Whence came the raven, then?”
“From the west,” he answered, busying himself with Lord Hoster’s bedclothes and avoiding her eyes.
“Was it news of Robb?”
He hesitated. “Yes, my lady.”
“Something is wrong.” She knew it from his manner. He was hiding something from her. “Tell me. Is it Robb? Is he hurt?” Not dead, gods be good, please do not tell me that he is dead.
“His Grace took a wound storming the Crag,” Maester Vyman said, still evasive, “but writes that it is no cause for concern, and that he hopes to return soon.”
“A wound? What sort of wound? How serious?”
“No cause for concern, he writes.”
“All wounds concern me. Is he being cared for?”
“I am certain of it. The maester at the Crag will tend to him, I have no doubt.”
“Where was he wounded?”
“My lady, I am commanded not to speak with you. I am sorry.” Gathering up his potions, Vyman made a hurried exit, and once again Catelyn was left alone with her father. The milk of the poppy had done its work, and Lord Hoster was sunk in heavy sleep. A thin line of spittle ran down from one corner of his open mouth to dampen his pillow. Catelyn took a square of linen and wiped it away gently. When she touched him, Lord Hoster moaned. “Forgive me,” he said, so softly she could scarcely hear the words. “Tansy . . . blood . . . the blood . . . gods be kind . . .”
His words disturbed her more than she could say, though she could make no sense of them. Blood, she thought. Must it all come back to blood? Father, who was this woman, and what did you do to her that needs so much forgiveness?
That night Catelyn slept fitfully, haunted by formless dreams of her children, the lost and the dead. Well before the break of day, she woke with her father’s words echoing in her ears. Sweet babes, and trueborn . . . why would he say that, unless . . . could he have fathered a bastard on this woman Tansy? She could not believe it. Her brother Edmure, yes; it would not have surprised her to learn that Edmure had a dozen natural children. But not her father, not Lord Hoster Tully, never.
Could Tansy be some pet name he called Lysa, the way he called me Cat? Lord Hoster had mistaken her for her sister before. You’ll have others, he said. Sweet babes, and trueborn. Lysa had miscarried five times, twice in the Eyrie, thrice at King’s Landing . . . but never at Riverrun, where Lord Hoster would have been at hand to comfort her. Never, unless . . . unless she was with child, that first time . . . 
She and her sister had been married on the same day, and left in their father’s care when their new husbands had ridden off to rejoin Robert’s rebellion. Afterward, when their moon blood did not come at the accustomed time, Lysa had gushed happily of the sons she was certain they carried. “Your son will be heir to Winterfell and mine to the Eyrie. Oh, they’ll be the best of friends, like your Ned and Lord Robert. They’ll be more brothers than cousins, truly, I just know it.” She was so happy.
But Lysa’s blood had come not long after, and all the joy had gone out of her. Catelyn had always thought that Lysa had simply been a little late, but if she had been with child . . . 
She remembered the first time she gave her sister Robb to hold; small, red-faced, and squalling, but strong even then, full of life. No sooner had Catelyn placed the babe in her sister’s arms than Lysa’s face dissolved into tears. Hurriedly she had thrust the baby back at Catelyn and fled.
If she had lost a child before, that might explain Father’s words, and much else besides . . . Lysa’s match with Lord Arryn had been hastily arranged, and Jon was an old man even then, older than their father. An old man without an heir. His first two wives had left him childless, his brother’s son had been murdered with Brandon Stark in King’s Landing, his gallant cousin had died in the Battle of the Bells. He needed a young wife if House Arryn was to continue . . . a young wife known to be fertile.
Catelyn rose, threw on a robe, and descended the steps to the darkened solar to stand over her father. A sense of helpless dread filled her. “Father,” she said, “Father, I know what you did.” She was no longer an innocent bride with a head full of dreams. She was a widow, a traitor, a grieving mother, and wise, wise in the ways of the world. “You made him take her,” she whispered. “Lysa was the price Jon Arryn had to pay for the swords and spears of House Tully.”
Small wonder her sister’s marriage had been so loveless. The Arryns were proud, and prickly of their honor. Lord Jon might wed Lysa to bind the Tullys to the cause of the rebellion, and in hopes of a son, but it would have been hard for him to love a woman who came to his bed soiled and unwilling. He would have been kind, no doubt; dutiful, yes; but Lysa needed warmth.
The next day, as she broke her fast, Catelyn asked for quill and paper and began a letter to her sister in the Vale of Arryn. She told Lysa of Bran and Rickon, struggling with the words, but mostly she wrote of their father. His thoughts are all of the wrong he did you, now that his time grows short. Maester Vyman says he dare not make the milk of the poppy any stronger. It is time for Father to lay down his sword and shield. It is time for him to rest. Yet he fights on grimly, will not yield. It is for your sake, I think. He needs your forgiveness. The war has made the road from the Eyrie to Riverrun dangerous to travel, I know, but surely a strong force of knights could see you safely through the Mountains of the Moon? A hundred men, or a thousand? And if you cannot come, will you not write him at least? A few words of love, so he might die in peace? Write what you will, and I shall read it to him, and ease his way.
Even as she set the quill aside and asked for sealing wax, Catelyn sensed that the letter was like to be too little and too late. Maester Vyman did not believe Lord Hoster would linger long enough for a raven to reach the Eyrie and return. Though he has said much the same before . . . Tully men did not surrender easily, no matter the odds. After she entrusted the parchment to the maester’s care, Catelyn went to the sept and lit a candle to the Father Above for her own father’s sake, a second to the Crone, who had let the first raven into the world when she peered through the door of death, and a third to the Mother, for Lysa and all the children they had both lost.
Later that day, as she sat at Lord Hoster’s bedside with a book, reading the same passage over and over, she heard the sound of loud voices and a trumpet’s blare. Ser Robin, she thought at once, flinching. She went to the balcony, but there was nothing to be seen out on the rivers, but she could hear the voices more clearly from outside, the sound of many horses, the clink of armor, and here and there a cheer. Catelyn made her way up the winding stairs to the roof of the keep. Ser Desmond did not forbid me the roof, she told herself as she climbed.
The sounds were coming from the far side of the castle, by the main gate. A knot of men stood before the portcullis as it rose in jerks and starts, and in the fields beyond, outside the castle, were several hundred riders. When the wind blew, it lifted their banners, and she trembled in relief at the sight of the leaping trout of Riverrun. Edmure.
It was two hours before he saw fit to come to her. By then the castle rang to the sound of noisy reunions as men embraced the women and children they had left behind. Three ravens had risen from the rookery, black wings beating at the air as they took flight. Catelyn watched them from her father’s balcony. She had washed her hair, changed her clothing, and prepared herself for her brother’s reproaches . . . but even so, the waiting was hard.
When at last she heard sounds outside her door, she sat and folded her hands in her lap. Dried red mud spattered Edmure’s boots, greaves, and surcoat. To look at him, you would never know he had won his battle. He was thin and drawn, with pale cheeks, unkempt beard, and too-bright eyes.
“Edmure,” Catelyn said, worried, “you look unwell. Has something happened? Have the Lannisters crossed the river?”
“I threw them back. Lord Tywin, Gregor Clegane, Addam Marbrand, I turned them away. Stannis, though . . .” He grimaced.
“Stannis? What of Stannis?”
“He lost the battle at King’s Landing,” Edmure said unhappily. “His fleet was burned, his army routed.”
A Lannister victory was ill tidings, but Catelyn could not share her brother’s obvious dismay. She still had nightmares about the shadow she had seen slide across Renly’s tent and the way the blood had come flowing out through the steel of his gorget. “Stannis was no more a friend than Lord Tywin.”
“You do not understand. Highgarden has declared for Joffrey. Dorne as well. All the south.” His mouth tightened. “And you see fit to loose the Kingslayer. You had no right.”
“I had a mother’s right.” Her voice was calm, though the news about Highgarden was a savage blow to Robb’s hopes. She could not think about that now, though.
“No right,” Edmure repeated. “He was Robb’s captive, your king’s captive, and Robb charged me to keep him safe.”
“Brienne will keep him safe. She swore it on her sword.”
“That woman?”
“She will deliver Jaime to King’s Landing, and bring Arya and Sansa back to us safely.”
“Cersei will never give them up.”
“Not Cersei. Tyrion. He swore it, in open court. And the Kingslayer swore it as well.”
“Jaime’s word is worthless. As for the Imp, it’s said he took an axe in the head during the battle. He’ll be dead before your Brienne reaches King’s Landing, if she ever does.”
“Dead?” Could the gods truly be so merciless? She had made Jaime swear a hundred oaths, but it was his brother’s promise she had pinned her hopes on.
Edmure was blind to her distress. “Jaime was my charge, and I mean to have him back. I’ve sent ravens—”
“Ravens to whom? How many?”
“Three,” he said, “so the message will be certain to reach Lord Bolton. By river or road, the way from Riverrun to King’s Landing must needs take them close by Harrenhal.”
“Harrenhal.” The very word seemed to darken the room. Horror thickened her voice as she said, “Edmure, do you know what you have done?”
“Have no fear, I left your part out. I wrote that Jaime had escaped, and offered a thousand dragons for his recapture.”
Worse and worse, Catelyn thought in despair. My brother is a fool. Unbidden, unwanted, tears filled her eyes. “If this was an escape,” she said softly, “and not an exchange of hostages, why should the Lannisters give my daughters to Brienne?”
“It will never come to that. The Kingslayer will be returned to us, I have made certain of it.”
“All you have made certain is that I shall never see my daughters again. Brienne might have gotten him to King’s Landing safely . . . so long as no one was hunting for them. But now . . .” Catelyn could not go on. “Leave me, Edmure.” She had no right to command him, here in the castle that would soon be his, yet her tone would brook no argument. “Leave me to Father and my grief, I have no more to say to you. Go. Go.” All she wanted was to lie down, to close her eyes and sleep, and pray no dreams would come.

Robb, she knew, the moment she heard the kennels erupt.
Her son had returned to Riverrun, and Grey Wind with him. Only the scent of the great grey direwolf could send the hounds into such a frenzy of baying and barking. He will come to me, she knew. Edmure had not returned after his first visit, preferring to spend his days with Marq Piper and Patrek Mallister, listening to Rymund the Rhymer’s verses about the battle at the Stone Mill. Robb is not Edmure, though. Robb will see me.
It had been raining for days now, a cold grey downpour that well suited Catelyn’s mood. Her father was growing weaker and more delirious with every passing day, waking only to mutter, “Tansy,” and beg forgiveness. Edmure shunned her, and Ser Desmond Grell still denied her freedom of the castle, however unhappy it seemed to make him. Only the return of Ser Robin Ryger and his men, footweary and drenched to the bone, served to lighten her spirits. They had walked back, it seemed. Somehow the Kingslayer had contrived to sink their galley and escape, Maester Vyman confided. Catelyn asked if she might speak with Ser Robin to learn more of what had happened, but that was refused her.
Something else was wrong as well. On the day her brother returned, a few hours after their argument, she had heard angry voices from the yard below. When she climbed to the roof to see, there were knots of men gathered across the castle beside the main gate. Horses were being led from the stables, saddled and bridled, and there was shouting, though Catelyn was too far away to make out the words. One of Robb’s white banners lay on the ground, and one of the knights turned his horse and trampled over the direwolf as he spurred toward the gate. Several others did the same. Those are men who fought with Edmure on the fords, she thought. What could have made them so angry? Has my brother slighted them somehow, given them some insult? She thought she recognized Ser Perwyn Frey, who had traveled with her to Bitterbridge and Storm’s End and back, and his bastard half brother Martyn Rivers as well, but from this vantage it was hard to be certain. Close to forty men poured out through the castle gates, to what end she did not know.
They did not come back. Nor would Maester Vyman tell her who they had been, where they had gone, or what had made them so angry. “I am here to see to your father, and only that, my lady,” he said. “Your brother will soon be Lord of Riverrun. What he wishes you to know, he must tell you.”
But now Robb was returned from the west, returned in triumph. He will forgive me, Catelyn told herself. He must forgive me, he is my own son, and Arya and Sansa are as much his blood as mine. He will free me from these rooms and then I will know what has happened.
By the time Ser Desmond came for her, she had bathed and dressed and combed out her auburn hair. “King Robb has returned from the west, my lady,” the knight said, “and commands that you attend him in the Great Hall.”
It was the moment she had dreamt of and dreaded. Have I lost two sons, or three? She would know soon enough.
The hall was crowded when they entered. Every eye was on the dais, but Catelyn knew their backs: Lady Mormont’s patched ringmail, the Greatjon and his son looming above every other head in the hall, Lord Jason Mallister white-haired with his winged helm in the crook of his arm, Tytos Blackwood in his magnificent raven-feather cloak . . . Half of them will want to hang me now. The other half may only turn their eyes away. She had the uneasy feeling that someone was missing, too.
Robb stood on the dais. He is a boy no longer, she realized with a pang. He is sixteen now, a man grown. Just look at him. War had melted all the softness from his face and left him hard and lean. He had shaved his beard away, but his auburn hair fell uncut to his shoulders. The recent rains had rusted his mail and left brown stains on the white of his cloak and surcoat. Or perhaps the stains were blood. On his head was the sword crown they had fashioned him of bronze and iron. He bears it more comfortably now. He bears it like a king.
Edmure stood below the crowded dais, head bowed modestly as Robb praised his victory. “. . . fell at the Stone Mill shall never be forgotten. Small wonder Lord Tywin ran off to fight Stannis. He’d had his fill of northmen and rivermen both.” That brought laughter and approving shouts, but Robb raised a hand for quiet. “Make no mistake, though. The Lannisters will march again, and there will be other battles to win before the kingdom is secure.”
The Greatjon roared out, “King in the North!” and thrust a mailed fist into the air. The river lords answered with a shout of “King of the Trident!” The hall grew thunderous with pounding fists and stamping feet.
Only a few noted Catelyn and Ser Desmond amidst the tumult, but they elbowed their fellows, and slowly a hush grew around her. She held her head high and ignored the eyes. Let them think what they will. It is Robb’s judgment that matters.
The sight of Ser Brynden Tully’s craggy face on the dais gave her comfort. A boy she did not know seemed to be acting as Robb’s squire. Behind him stood a young knight in a sand-colored surcoat blazoned with seashells, and an older one who wore three black pepperpots on a saffron bend, across a field of green and silver stripes. Between them were a handsome older lady and a pretty maid who looked to be her daughter. There was another girl as well, near Sansa’s age. The seashells were the sigil of some lesser house, Catelyn knew; the older man’s she did not recognize. Prisoners? Why would Robb bring captives onto the dais?
Utherydes Wayn banged his staff on the floor as Ser Desmond escorted her forward. If Robb looks at me as Edmure did, I do not know what I will do. But it seemed to her that it was not anger she saw in her son’s eyes, but something else . . . apprehension, perhaps? No, that made no sense. What should he fear? He was the Young Wolf, King of the Trident and the North.
Her uncle was the first to greet her. As black a fish as ever, Ser Brynden had no care for what others might think. He leapt off the dais and pulled Catelyn into his arms. When he said, “It is good to see you home, Cat,” she had to struggle to keep her composure. “And you,” she whispered.
“Mother.”
Catelyn looked up at her tall kingly son. “Your Grace, I have prayed for your safe return. I had heard you were wounded.”
“I took an arrow through the arm while storming the Crag,” he said. “It’s healed well, though. I had the best of care.”
“The gods are good, then.” Catelyn took a deep breath. Say it. It cannot be avoided. “They will have told you what I did. Did they tell you my reasons?”
“For the girls.”
“I had five children. Now I have three.”
“Aye, my lady.” Lord Rickard Karstark pushed past the Greatjon, like some grim specter with his black mail and long ragged grey beard, his narrow face pinched and cold. “And I have one son, who once had three. You have robbed me of my vengeance.”
Catelyn faced him calmly. “Lord Rickard, the Kingslayer’s dying would not have bought life for your children. His living may buy life for mine.”
The lord was unappeased. “Jaime Lannister has played you for a fool. You’ve bought a bag of empty words, no more. My Torrhen and my Eddard deserved better of you.”
“Leave off, Karstark,” rumbled the Greatjon, crossing his huge arms against his chest. “It was a mother’s folly. Women are made that way.”
“A mother’s folly?” Lord Karstark rounded on Lord Umber. “I name it treason.”
“Enough.” For just an instant Robb sounded more like Brandon than his father. “No man calls my lady of Winterfell a traitor in my hearing, Lord Rickard.” When he turned to Catelyn, his voice softened. “If I could wish the Kingslayer back in chains I would. You freed him without my knowledge or consent . . . but what you did, I know you did for love. For Arya and Sansa, and out of grief for Bran and Rickon. Love’s not always wise, I’ve learned. It can lead us to great folly, but we follow our hearts . . . wherever they take us. Don’t we, Mother?”
Is that what I did? “If my heart led me into folly, I would gladly make whatever amends I can to Lord Karstark and yourself.”
Lord Rickard’s face was implacable. “Will your amends warm Torrhen and Eddard in the cold graves where the Kingslayer laid them?” He shouldered between the Greatjon and Maege Mormont and left the hall.
Robb made no move to detain him. “Forgive him, Mother.”
“If you will forgive me.”
“I have. I know what it is to love so greatly you can think of nothing else.”
Catelyn bowed her head. “Thank you.” I have not lost this child, at least.
“We must talk,” Robb went on. “You and my uncles. Of this and . . . other things. Steward, call an end.”
Utherydes Wayn slammed his staff on the floor and shouted the dismissal, and river lords and northerners alike moved toward the doors. It was only then that Catelyn realized what was amiss. The wolf. The wolf is not here. Where is Grey Wind? She knew the direwolf had returned with Robb, she had heard the dogs, but he was not in the hall, not at her son’s side where he belonged.
Before she could think to question Robb, however, she found herself surrounded by a circle of well-wishers. Lady Mormont took her hand and said, “My lady, if Cersei Lannister held two of my daughters, I would have done the same.” The Greatjon, no respecter of proprieties, lifted her off her feet and squeezed her arms with his huge hairy hands. “Your wolf pup mauled the Kingslayer once, he’ll do it again if need be.” Galbart Glover and Lord Jason Mallister were cooler, and Jonos Bracken almost icy, but their words were courteous enough. Her brother was the last to approach her. “I pray for your girls as well, Cat. I hope you do not doubt that.”
“Of course not.” She kissed him. “I love you for it.”
When all the words were done, the Great Hall of Riverrun was empty save for Robb, the three Tullys, and the six strangers Catelyn could not place. She eyed them curiously. “My lady, sers, are you new to my son’s cause?”
“New,” said the younger knight, him of the seashells, “but fierce in our courage and firm in our loyalties, as I hope to prove to you, my lady.”
Robb looked uncomfortable. “Mother,” he said, “may I present the Lady Sybell, the wife of Lord Gawen Westerling of the Crag.” The older woman came forward with solemn mien. “Her husband was one of those we took captive in the Whispering Wood.”
Westerling, yes, Catelyn thought. Their banner is six seashells, white on sand. A minor house sworn to the Lannisters.
Robb beckoned the other strangers forward, each in turn. “Ser Rolph Spicer, Lady Sybell’s brother. He was castellan at the Crag when we took it.” The pepperpot knight inclined his head. A square-built man with a broken nose and a close-cropped grey beard, he looked doughty enough. “The children of Lord Gawen and Lady Sybell. Ser Raynald Westerling.” The seashell knight smiled beneath a bushy mustache. Young, lean, rough-hewn, he had good teeth and a thick mop of chestnut hair. “Elenya.” The little girl did a quick curtsy. “Rollam Westerling, my squire.” The boy started to kneel, saw no one else was kneeling, and bowed instead.
“The honor is mine,” Catelyn said. Can Robb have won the Crag’s allegiance? If so, it was no wonder the Westerlings were with him. Casterly Rock did not suffer such betrayals gently. Not since Tywin Lannister had been old enough to go to war . . . 
The maid came forward last, and very shy. Robb took her hand. “Mother,” he said, “I have the great honor to present you the Lady Jeyne Westerling. Lord Gawen’s elder daughter, and my . . . ah . . . my lady wife.”
The first thought that flew across Catelyn’s mind was, No, that cannot be, you are only a child.
The second was, And besides, you have pledged another.
The third was, Mother have mercy, Robb, what have you done?
Only then came her belated remembrance. Follies done for love? He has bagged me neat as a hare in a snare. I seem to have already forgiven him. Mixed with her annoyance was a rueful admiration; the scene had been staged with the cunning worthy of a master mummer . . . or a king. Catelyn saw no choice but to take Jeyne Westerling’s hands. “I have a new daughter,” she said, more stiffly than she’d intended. She kissed the terrified girl on both cheeks. “Be welcome to our hall and hearth.”
“Thank you, my lady. I shall be a good and true wife to Robb, I swear. And as wise a queen as I can.”
Queen. Yes, this pretty little girl is a queen, I must remember that. She was pretty, undeniably, with her chestnut curls and heart-shaped face, and that shy smile. Slender, but with good hips, Catelyn noted. She should have no trouble bearing children, at least.
Lady Sybell took a hand before any more was said. “We are honored to be joined to House Stark, my lady, but we are also very weary. We have come a long way in a short time. Perhaps we might retire to our chambers, so you may visit with your son?”
“That would be best.” Robb kissed his Jeyne. “The steward will find you suitable accommodations.”
“I’ll take you to him,” Ser Edmure Tully volunteered.
“You are most kind,” said Lady Sybell.
“Must I go too?” asked the boy, Rollam. “I’m your squire.”
Robb laughed. “But I’m not in need of squiring just now.”
“Oh.”
“His Grace has gotten along for sixteen years without you, Rollam,” said Ser Raynald of the seashells. “He will survive a few hours more, I think.” Taking his little brother firmly by the hand, he walked him from the hall.
“Your wife is lovely,” Catelyn said when they were out of earshot, “and the Westerlings seem worthy . . . though Lord Gawen is Tywin Lannister’s sworn man, is he not?”
“Yes. Jason Mallister captured him in the Whispering Wood and has been holding him at Seagard for ransom. Of course I’ll free him now, though he may not wish to join me. We wed without his consent, I fear, and this marriage puts him in dire peril. The Crag is not strong. For love of me, Jeyne may lose all.”
“And you,” she said softly, “have lost the Freys.”
His wince told all. She understood the angry voices now, why Perwyn Frey and Martyn Rivers had left in such haste, trampling Robb’s banner into the ground as they went.
“Dare I ask how many swords come with your bride, Robb?”
“Fifty. A dozen knights.” His voice was glum, as well it might be. When the marriage contract had been made at the Twins, old Lord Walder Frey had sent Robb off with a thousand mounted knights and near three thousand foot. “Jeyne is bright as well as beautiful. And kind as well. She has a gentle heart.”
It is swords you need, not gentle hearts. How could you do this, Robb? How could you be so heedless, so stupid? How could you be so . . . so very . . . young. Reproaches would not serve here, however. All she said was, “Tell me how this came to be.”
“I took her castle and she took my heart.” Robb smiled. “The Crag was weakly garrisoned, so we took it by storm one night. Black Walder and the Smalljon led scaling parties over the walls, while I broke the main gate with a ram. I took an arrow in the arm just before Ser Rolph yielded us the castle. It seemed nothing at first, but it festered. Jeyne had me taken to her own bed, and she nursed me until the fever passed. And she was with me when the Greatjon brought me the news of . . . of Winterfell. Bran and Rickon.” He seemed to have trouble saying his brothers’ names. “That night, she . . . she comforted me, Mother.”
Catelyn did not need to be told what sort of comfort Jeyne Westerling had offered her son. “And you wed her the next day.”
He looked her in the eyes, proud and miserable all at once. “It was the only honorable thing to do. She’s gentle and sweet, Mother, she will make me a good wife.”
“Perhaps. That will not appease Lord Frey.”
“I know,” her son said, stricken. “I’ve made a botch of everything but the battles, haven’t I? I thought the battles would be the hard part, but . . . if I had listened to you and kept Theon as my hostage, I’d still rule the north, and Bran and Rickon would be alive and safe in Winterfell.”
“Perhaps. Or not. Lord Balon might still have chanced war. The last time he reached for a crown, it cost him two sons. He might have thought it a bargain to lose only one this time.” She touched his arm. “What happened with the Freys, after you wed?”
Robb shook his head. “With Ser Stevron, I might have been able to make amends, but Ser Ryman is dull-witted as a stone, and Black Walder . . . that one was not named for the color of his beard, I promise you. He went so far as to say that his sisters would not be loath to wed a widower. I would have killed him for that if Jeyne had not begged me to be merciful.”
“You have done House Frey a grievous insult, Robb.”
“I never meant to. Ser Stevron died for me, and Olyvar was as loyal a squire as any king could want. He asked to stay with me, but Ser Ryman took him with the rest. All their strength. The Greatjon urged me to attack them . . .”
“Fighting your own in the midst of your enemies?” she said. “It would have been the end of you.”
“Yes. I thought perhaps we could arrange other matches for Lord Walder’s daughters. Ser Wendel Manderly has offered to take one, and the Greatjon tells me his uncles wish to wed again. If Lord Walder will be reasonable—”
“He is not reasonable,” said Catelyn. “He is proud, and prickly to a fault. You know that. He wanted to be grandfather to a king. You will not appease him with the offer of two hoary old brigands and the second son of the fattest man in the Seven Kingdoms. Not only have you broken your oath, but you’ve slighted the honor of the Twins by choosing a bride from a lesser house.”
Robb bristled at that. “The Westerlings are better blood than the Freys. They’re an ancient line, descended from the First Men. The Kings of the Rock sometimes wed Westerlings before the Conquest, and there was another Jeyne Westerling who was queen to King Maegor three hundred years ago.”
“All of which will only salt Lord Walder’s wounds. It has always rankled him that older houses look down on the Freys as upstarts. This insult is not the first he’s borne, to hear him tell it. Jon Arryn was disinclined to foster his grandsons, and my father refused the offer of one of his daughters for Edmure.” She inclined her head toward her brother as he rejoined them.
“Your Grace,” Brynden Blackfish said, “perhaps we had best continue this in private.”
“Yes.” Robb sounded tired. “I would kill for a cup of wine. The audience chamber, I think.”
As they started up the steps, Catelyn asked the question that had been troubling her since she entered the hall. “Robb, where is Grey Wind?”
“In the yard, with a haunch of mutton. I told the kennelmaster to see that he was fed.”
“You always kept him with you before.”
“A hall is no place for a wolf. He gets restless, you’ve seen. Growling and snapping. I should never have taken him into battle with me. He’s killed too many men to fear them now. Jeyne’s anxious around him, and he terrifies her mother.”
And there’s the heart of it, Catelyn thought. “He is part of you, Robb. To fear him is to fear you.”
“I am not a wolf, no matter what they call me.” Robb sounded cross. “Grey Wind killed a man at the Crag, another at Ashemark, and six or seven at Oxcross. If you had seen—”
“I saw Bran’s wolf tear out a man’s throat at Winterfell,” she said sharply, “and loved him for it.”
“That’s different. The man at the Crag was a knight Jeyne had known all her life. You can’t blame her for being afraid. Grey Wind doesn’t like her uncle either. He bares his teeth every time Ser Rolph comes near him.”
A chill went through her. “Send Ser Rolph away. At once.”
“Where? Back to the Crag, so the Lannisters can mount his head on a spike? Jeyne loves him. He’s her uncle, and a fair knight besides. I need more men like Rolph Spicer, not fewer. I am not going to banish him just because my wolf doesn’t seem to like the way he smells.”
“Robb.” She stopped and held his arm. “I told you once to keep Theon Greyjoy close, and you did not listen. Listen now. Send this man away. I am not saying you must banish him. Find some task that requires a man of courage, some honorable duty, what it is matters not . . . but do not keep him near you.”
He frowned. “Should I have Grey Wind sniff all my knights? There might be others whose smell he mislikes.”
“Any man Grey Wind mislikes is a man I do not want close to you. These wolves are more than wolves, Robb. You must know that. I think perhaps the gods sent them to us. Your father’s gods, the old gods of the north. Five wolf pups, Robb, five for five Stark children.”
“Six,” said Robb. “There was a wolf for Jon as well. I found them, remember? I know how many there were and where they came from. I used to think the same as you, that the wolves were our guardians, our protectors, until . . .”
“Until?” she prompted.
Robb’s mouth tightened. “. . . .until they told me that Theon had murdered Bran and Rickon. Small good their wolves did them. I am no longer a boy, Mother. I’m a king, and I can protect myself.” He sighed. “I will find some duty for Ser Rolph, some pretext to send him away. Not because of his smell, but to ease your mind. You have suffered enough.”
Relieved, Catelyn kissed him lightly on the cheek before the others could come around the turn of the stair, and for a moment he was her boy again, and not her king.
Lord Hoster’s private audience chamber was a small room above the Great Hall, better suited to intimate discussions. Robb took the high seat, removed his crown, and set it on the floor beside him as Catelyn rang for wine. Edmure was filling his uncle’s ear with the whole story of the fight at the Stone Mill. It was only after the servants had come and gone that the Blackfish cleared his throat and said, “I think we’ve all heard sufficient of your boasting, Nephew.”
Edmure was taken aback. “Boasting? What do you mean?”
“I mean,” said the Blackfish, “that you owe His Grace your thanks for his forbearance. He played out that mummer’s farce in the Great Hall so as not to shame you before your own people. Had it been me I would have flayed you for your stupidity rather than praising this folly of the fords.”
“Good men died to defend those fords, Uncle.” Edmure sounded outraged. “What, is no one to win victories but the Young Wolf? Did I steal some glory meant for you, Robb?”
“Your Grace,” Robb corrected, icy. “You took me for your king, Uncle. Or have you forgotten that as well?”
The Blackfish said, “You were commanded to hold Riverrun, Edmure, no more.”
“I held Riverrun, and I bloodied Lord Tywin’s nose—”
“So you did,” said Robb. “But a bloody nose won’t win the war, will it? Did you ever think to ask yourself why we remained in the west so long after Oxcross? You knew I did not have enough men to threaten Lannisport or Casterly Rock.”
“Why . . . there were other castles . . . gold, cattle . . .”
“You think we stayed for plunder?” Robb was incredulous. “Uncle, I wanted Lord Tywin to come west.”
“We were all horsed,” Ser Brynden said. “The Lannister host was mainly foot. We planned to run Lord Tywin a merry chase up and down the coast, then slip behind him to take up a strong defensive position athwart the gold road, at a place my scouts had found where the ground would have been greatly in our favor. If he had come at us there, he would have paid a grievous price. But if he did not attack, he would have been trapped in the west, a thousand leagues from where he needed to be. All the while we would have lived off his land, instead of him living off ours.”
“Lord Stannis was about to fall upon King’s Landing,” Robb said. “He might have rid us of Joffrey, the queen, and the Imp in one red stroke. Then we might have been able to make a peace.”
Edmure looked from uncle to nephew. “You never told me.”
“I told you to hold Riverrun,” said Robb. “What part of that command did you fail to comprehend?”
“When you stopped Lord Tywin on the Red Fork,” said the Blackfish, “you delayed him just long enough for riders out of Bitterbridge to reach him with word of what was happening to the east. Lord Tywin turned his host at once, joined up with Matthis Rowan and Randyll Tarly near the headwaters of the Blackwater, and made a forced march to Tumbler’s Falls, where he found Mace Tyrell and two of his sons waiting with a huge host and a fleet of barges. They floated down the river, disembarked half a day’s ride from the city, and took Stannis in the rear.”
Catelyn remembered King Renly’s court, as she had seen it at Bitterbridge. A thousand golden roses streaming in the wind, Queen Margaery’s shy smile and soft words, her brother the Knight of Flowers with the bloody linen around his temples. If you had to fall into a woman’s arms, my son, why couldn’t they have been Margaery Tyrell’s? The wealth and power of Highgarden could have made all the difference in the fighting yet to come. And perhaps Grey Wind would have liked the smell of her as well.
Edmure looked ill. “I never meant . . . never, Robb, you must let me make amends. I will lead the van in the next battle!”
For amends, Brother? Or for glory? Catelyn wondered.
“The next battle,” Robb said. “Well, that will be soon enough. Once Joffrey is wed, the Lannisters will take the field against me once more, I don’t doubt, and this time the Tyrells will march beside them. And I may need to fight the Freys as well, if Black Walder has his way . . .”
“So long as Theon Greyjoy sits in your father’s seat with your brothers’ blood on his hands, these other foes must wait,” Catelyn told her son. “Your first duty is to defend your own people, win back Winterfell, and hang Theon in a crow’s cage to die slowly. Or else put off that crown for good, Robb, for men will know that you are no true king at all.”
From the way Robb looked at her, she could tell that it had been a long while since anyone had dared speak to him so bluntly. “When they told me Winterfell had fallen, I wanted to go north at once,” he said, with a hint of defensiveness. “I wanted to free Bran and Rickon, but I thought . . . I never dreamed that Theon could harm them, truly. If I had . . .”
“It is too late for ifs, and too late for rescues,” Catelyn said. “All that remains is vengeance.”
“The last word we had from the north, Ser Rodrik had defeated a force of ironmen near Torrhen’s Square, and was assembling a host at Castle Cerwyn to retake Winterfell,” said Robb. “By now he may have done it. There has been no news for a long while. And what of the Trident, if I turn north? I can’t ask the river lords to abandon their own people.”
“No,” said Catelyn. “Leave them to guard their own, and win back the north with northmen.”
“How will you get the northmen to the north?” her brother Edmure asked. “The ironmen control the sunset sea. The Greyjoys hold Moat Cailin as well. No army has ever taken Moat Cailin from the south. Even to march against it is madness. We could be trapped on the causeway, with the ironborn before us and angry Freys at our backs.”
“We must win back the Freys,” said Robb. “With them, we still have some chance of success, however small. Without them, I see no hope. I am willing to give Lord Walder whatever he requires . . . apologies, honors, lands, gold . . . there must be something that would soothe his pride . . .”
“Not something,” said Catelyn. “Someone.”

They carried the corpses in upon their shoulders and laid them beneath the dais. A silence fell across the torchlit hall, and in the quiet Catelyn could hear Grey Wind howling half a castle away. He smells the blood, she thought, through stone walls and wooden doors, through night and rain, he still knows the scent of death and ruin.
She stood at Robb’s left hand beside the high seat, and for a moment felt almost as if she were looking down at her own dead, at Bran and Rickon. These boys had been much older, but death had shrunken them. Naked and wet, they seemed such little things, so still it was hard to remember them living.
The blond boy had been trying to grow a beard. Pale yellow peach fuzz covered his cheeks and jaw above the red ruin the knife had made of his throat. His long golden hair was still wet, as if he had been pulled from a bath. By the look of him, he had died peacefully, perhaps in sleep, but his brown-haired cousin had fought for life. His arms bore slashes where he’d tried to block the blades, and red still trickled slowly from the stab wounds that covered his chest and belly and back like so many tongueless mouths, though the rain had washed him almost clean.
Robb had donned his crown before coming to the hall, and the bronze shone darkly in the torchlight. Shadows hid his eyes as he looked upon the dead. Does he see Bran and Rickon as well? She might have wept, but there were no tears left in her. The dead boys were pale from long imprisonment, and both had been fair; against their smooth white skin, the blood was shockingly red, unbearable to look upon. Will they lay Sansa down naked beneath the Iron Throne after they have killed her? Will her skin seem as white, her blood as red? From outside came the steady wash of rain and the restless howling of a wolf.
Her brother Edmure stood to Robb’s right, one hand upon the back of his father’s seat, his face still puffy from sleep. They had woken him as they had her, pounding on his door in the black of night to yank him rudely from his dreams. Were they good dreams, brother? Do you dream of sunlight and laughter and a maiden’s kisses? I pray you do. Her own dreams were dark and laced with terrors.
Robb’s captains and lords bannermen stood about the hall, some mailed and armed, others in various states of dishevelment and undress. Ser Raynald and his uncle Ser Rolph were among them, but Robb had seen fit to spare his queen this ugliness. The Crag is not far from Casterly Rock, Catelyn recalled. Jeyne may well have played with these boys when all of them were children.
She looked down again upon the corpses of the squires Tion Frey and Willem Lannister, and waited for her son to speak.
It seemed a very long time before Robb lifted his eyes from the bloody dead. “Smalljon,” he said, “tell your father to bring them in.” Wordless, Smalljon Umber turned to obey, his steps echoing in the great stone hall.
As the Greatjon marched his prisoners through the doors, Catelyn made note of how some other men stepped back to give them room, as if treason could somehow be passed by a touch, a glance, a cough. The captors and the captives looked much alike; big men, every one, with thick beards and long hair. Two of the Greatjon’s men were wounded, and three of their prisoners. Only the fact that some had spears and others empty scabbards served to set them apart. All were clad in mail hauberks or shirts of sewn rings, with heavy boots and thick cloaks, some of wool and some of fur. The north is hard and cold, and has no mercy, Ned had told her when she first came to Winterfell a thousand years ago.
“Five,” said Robb when the prisoners stood before him, wet and silent. “Is that all of them?”
“There were eight,” rumbled the Greatjon. “We killed two taking them, and a third is dying now.”
Robb studied the faces of the captives. “It required eight of you to kill two unarmed squires.”
Edmure Tully spoke up. “They murdered two of my men as well, to get into the tower. Delp and Elwood.”
“It was no murder, ser,” said Lord Rickard Karstark, no more discomfited by the ropes about his wrists than by the blood that trickled down his face. “Any man who steps between a father and his vengeance asks for death.”
His words rang against Catelyn’s ears, harsh and cruel as the pounding of a war drum. Her throat was dry as bone. I did this. These two boys died so my daughters might live.
“I saw your sons die, that night in the Whispering Wood,” Robb told Lord Karstark. “Tion Frey did not kill Torrhen. Willem Lannister did not slay Eddard. How then can you call this vengeance? This was folly, and bloody murder. Your sons died honorably on a battlefield, with swords in their hands.”
“They died,” said Rickard Karstark, yielding no inch of ground. “The Kingslayer cut them down. These two were of his ilk. Only blood can pay for blood.”
“The blood of children?” Robb pointed at the corpses. “How old were they? Twelve, thirteen? Squires.”
“Squires die in every battle.”
“Die fighting, yes. Tion Frey and Willem Lannister gave up their swords in the Whispering Wood. They were captives, locked in a cell, asleep, unarmed . . . boys. Look at them!”
Lord Karstark looked instead at Catelyn. “Tell your mother to look at them,” he said. “She slew them, as much as I.”
Catelyn put a hand on the back of Robb’s seat. The hall seemed to spin about her. She felt as though she might retch.
“My mother had naught to do with this,” Robb said angrily. “This was your work. Your murder. Your treason.”
“How can it be treason to kill Lannisters, when it is not treason to free them?” asked Karstark harshly. “Has Your Grace forgotten that we are at war with Casterly Rock? In war you kill your enemies. Didn’t your father teach you that, boy?”
“Boy?” The Greatjon dealt Rickard Karstark a buffet with a mailed fist that sent the other lord to his knees.
“Leave him!” Robb’s voice rang with command. Umber stepped back away from the captive.
Lord Karstark spit out a broken tooth. “Yes, Lord Umber, leave me to the king. He means to give me a scolding before he forgives me. That’s how he deals with treason, our King in the North.” He smiled a wet red smile. “Or should I call you the King Who Lost the North, Your Grace?”
The Greatjon snatched a spear from the man beside him and jerked it to his shoulder. “Let me spit him, sire. Let me open his belly so we can see the color of his guts.”
The doors of the hall crashed open, and the Blackfish entered with water running from his cloak and helm. Tully men-at-arms followed him in, while outside lightning cracked across the sky and a hard black rain pounded against the stones of Riverrun. Ser Brynden removed his helm and went to one knee. “Your Grace,” was all he said, but the grimness of his tone spoke volumes.
“I will hear Ser Brynden privily, in the audience chamber.” Robb rose to his feet. “Greatjon, keep Lord Karstark here till I return, and hang the other seven.”
The Greatjon lowered the spear. “Even the dead ones?”
“Yes. I will not have such fouling my lord uncle’s rivers. Let them feed the crows.”
One of the captives dropped to his knees. “Mercy, sire. I killed no one, I only stood at the door to watch for guards.”
Robb considered that a moment. “Did you know what Lord Rickard intended? Did you see the knives drawn? Did you hear the shouts, the screams, the cries for mercy?”
“Aye, I did, but I took no part. I was only the watcher, I swear it . . .”
“Lord Umber,” said Robb, “this one was only the watcher. Hang him last, so he may watch the others die. Mother, Uncle, with me, if you please.” He turned away as the Greatjon’s men closed upon the prisoners and drove them from the hall at spearpoint. Outside the thunder crashed and boomed, so loud it sounded as if the castle were coming down about their ears. Is this the sound of a kingdom falling? Catelyn wondered.
It was dark within the audience chamber, but at least the sound of the thunder was muffled by another thickness of wall. A servant entered with an oil lamp to light the fire, but Robb sent him away and kept the lamp. There were tables and chairs, but only Edmure sat, and he rose again when he realized that the others had remained standing. Robb took off his crown and placed it on the table before him.
The Blackfish shut the door. “The Karstarks are gone.”
“All?” Was it anger or despair that thickened Robb’s voice like that? Even Catelyn was not certain.
“All the fighting men,” Ser Brynden replied. “A few camp followers and serving men were left with their wounded. We questioned as many as we needed, to be certain of the truth. They started leaving at nightfall, stealing off in ones and twos at first, and then in larger groups. The wounded men and servants were told to keep the campfires lit so no one would know they’d gone, but once the rains began it didn’t matter.”
“Will they re-form, away from Riverrun?” asked Robb.
“No. They’ve scattered, hunting. Lord Karstark has sworn to give the hand of his maiden daughter to any man highborn or low who brings him the head of the Kingslayer.”
Gods be good. Catelyn felt ill again.
“Near three hundred riders and twice as many mounts, melted away in the night.” Robb rubbed his temples, where the crown had left its mark in the soft skin above his ears. “All the mounted strength of Karhold, lost.”
Lost by me. By me, may the gods forgive me. Catelyn did not need to be a soldier to grasp the trap Robb was in. For the moment he held the riverlands, but his kingdom was surrounded by enemies to every side but east, where Lysa sat aloof on her mountaintop. Even the Trident was scarce secure so long as the Lord of the Crossing withheld his allegiance. And now to lose the Karstarks as well . . . 
“No word of this must leave Riverrun,” her brother Edmure said. “Lord Tywin would . . . the Lannisters pay their debts, they are always saying that. Mother have mercy, when he hears.”
Sansa. Catelyn’s nails dug into the soft flesh of her palms, so hard did she close her hand.
Robb gave Edmure a look that chilled. “Would you make me a liar as well as a murderer, Uncle?”
“We need speak no falsehood. Only say nothing. Bury the boys and hold our tongues till the war’s done. Willem was son to Ser Kevan Lannister, and Lord Tywin’s nephew. Tion was Lady Genna’s, and a Frey. We must keep the news from the Twins as well, until . . .”
“Until we can bring the murdered dead back to life?” said Brynden Blackfish sharply. “The truth escaped with the Karstarks, Edmure. It is too late for such games.”
“I owe their fathers truth,” said Robb. “And justice. I owe them that as well.” He gazed at his crown, the dark gleam of bronze, the circle of iron swords. “Lord Rickard defied me. Betrayed me. I have no choice but to condemn him. Gods know what the Karstark foot with Roose Bolton will do when they hear I’ve executed their liege for a traitor. Bolton must be warned.”
“Lord Karstark’s heir was at Harrenhal as well,” Ser Brynden reminded him. “The eldest son, the one the Lannisters took captive on the Green Fork.”
“Harrion. His name is Harrion.” Robb laughed bitterly. “A king had best know the names of his enemies, don’t you think?”
The Blackfish looked at him shrewdly. “You know that for a certainty? That this will make young Karstark your enemy?”
“What else would he be? I am about to kill his father, he’s not like to thank me.”
“He might. There are sons who hate their fathers, and in a stroke you will make him Lord of Karhold.”
Robb shook his head. “Even if Harrion were that sort, he could never openly forgive his father’s killer. His own men would turn on him. These are northmen, Uncle. The north remembers.”
“Pardon him, then,” urged Edmure Tully.
Robb stared at him in frank disbelief.
Under that gaze, Edmure’s face reddened. “Spare his life, I mean. I don’t like the taste of it any more than you, sire. He slew my men as well. Poor Delp had only just recovered from the wound Ser Jaime gave him. Karstark must be punished, certainly. Keep him in chains, I say.”
“A hostage?” said Catelyn. It might be best . . . 
“Yes, a hostage!” Her brother seized on her musing as agreement. “Tell the son that so long as he remains loyal, his father will not be harmed. Otherwise . . . we have no hope of the Freys now, not if I offered to marry all Lord Walder’s daughters and carry his litter besides. If we should lose the Karstarks as well, what hope is there?”
“What hope . . .” Robb let out a breath, pushed his hair back from his eyes, and said, “We’ve had naught from Ser Rodrik in the north, no response from Walder Frey to our new offer, only silence from the Eyrie.” He appealed to his mother. “Will your sister never answer us? How many times must I write her? I will not believe that none of the birds have reached her.”
Her son wanted comfort, Catelyn realized; he wanted to hear that it would be all right. But her king needed truth. “The birds have reached her. Though she may tell you they did not, if it ever comes to that. Expect no help from that quarter, Robb.
“Lysa was never brave. When we were girls together, she would run and hide whenever she’d done something wrong. Perhaps she thought our lord father would forget to be wroth with her if he could not find her. It is no different now. She ran from King’s Landing for fear, to the safest place she knows, and she sits on her mountain hoping everyone will forget her.”
“The knights of the Vale could make all the difference in this war,” said Robb, “but if she will not fight, so be it. I’ve asked only that she open the Bloody Gate for us, and provide ships at Gulltown to take us north. The high road would be hard, but not so hard as fighting our way up the Neck. If I could land at White Harbor I could flank Moat Cailin and drive the ironmen from the north in half a year.”
“It will not happen, sire,” said the Blackfish. “Cat is right. Lady Lysa is too fearful to admit an army to the Vale. Any army. The Bloody Gate will remain closed.”
“The Others can take her, then,” Robb cursed, in a fury of despair. “Bloody Rickard Karstark as well. And Theon Greyjoy, Walder Frey, Tywin Lannister, and all the rest of them. Gods be good, why would any man ever want to be king? When everyone was shouting King in the North, King in the North, I told myself . . . swore to myself . . . that I would be a good king, as honorable as Father, strong, just, loyal to my friends and brave when I faced my enemies . . . now I can’t even tell one from the other. How did it all get so confused? Lord Rickard’s fought at my side in half a dozen battles. His sons died for me in the Whispering Wood. Tion Frey and Willem Lannister were my enemies. Yet now I have to kill my dead friends’ father for their sakes.” He looked at them all. “Will the Lannisters thank me for Lord Rickard’s head? Will the Freys?”
“No,” said Brynden Blackfish, blunt as ever.
“All the more reason to spare Lord Rickard’s life and keep him hostage,” Edmure urged.
Robb reached down with both hands, lifted the heavy bronze-and-iron crown, and set it back atop his head, and suddenly he was a king again. “Lord Rickard dies.”
“But why?” said Edmure. “You said yourself—”
“I know what I said, Uncle. It does not change what I must do.” The swords in his crown stood stark and black against his brow. “In battle I might have slain Tion and Willem myself, but this was no battle. They were asleep in their beds, naked and unarmed, in a cell where I put them. Rickard Karstark killed more than a Frey and a Lannister. He killed my honor. I shall deal with him at dawn.”
When day broke, grey and chilly, the storm had diminished to a steady, soaking rain, yet even so the godswood was crowded. River lords and northmen, highborn and low, knights and sellswords and stableboys, they stood amongst the trees to see the end of the night’s dark dance. Edmure had given commands, and a headsman’s block had been set up before the heart tree. Rain and leaves fell all around them as the Greatjon’s men led Lord Rickard Karstark through the press, hands still bound. His men already hung from Riverrun’s high walls, slumping at the end of long ropes as the rain washed down their darkening faces.
Long Lew waited beside the block, but Robb took the poleaxe from his hand and ordered him to step aside. “This is my work,” he said. “He dies at my word. He must die by my hand.”
Lord Rickard Karstark dipped his head stiffly. “For that much, I thank you. But for naught else.” He had dressed for death in a long black wool surcoat emblazoned with the white sunburst of his House. “The blood of the First Men flows in my veins as much as yours, boy. You would do well to remember that. I was named for your grandfather. I raised my banners against King Aerys for your father, and against King Joffrey for you. At Oxcross and the Whispering Wood and in the Battle of the Camps, I rode beside you, and I stood with Lord Eddard on the Trident. We are kin, Stark and Karstark.”
“This kinship did not stop you from betraying me,” Robb said. “And it will not save you now. Kneel, my lord.”
Lord Rickard had spoken truly, Catelyn knew. The Karstarks traced their descent to Karlon Stark, a younger son of Winterfell who had put down a rebel lord a thousand years ago, and been granted lands for his valor. The castle he built had been named Karl’s Hold, but that soon became Karhold, and over the centuries the Karhold Starks had become Karstarks.
“Old gods or new, it makes no matter,” Lord Rickard told her son, “no man is so accursed as the kinslayer.”
“Kneel, traitor,” Robb said again. “Or must I have them force your head onto the block?”
Lord Karstark knelt. “The gods shall judge you, as you have judged me.” He laid his head upon the block.
“Rickard Karstark, Lord of Karhold.” Robb lifted the heavy axe with both hands. “Here in sight of gods and men, I judge you guilty of murder and high treason. In mine own name I condemn you. With mine own hand I take your life. Would you speak a final word?”
“Kill me, and be cursed. You are no king of mine.”
The axe crashed down. Heavy and well-honed, it killed at a single blow, but it took three to sever the man’s head from his body, and by the time it was done both living and dead were drenched in blood. Robb flung the poleaxe down in disgust, and turned wordless to the heart tree. He stood shaking with his hands half-clenched and the rain running down his cheeks. Gods forgive him, Catelyn prayed in silence. He is only a boy, and he had no other choice.
That was the last she saw of her son that day. The rain continued all through the morning, lashing the surface of the rivers and turning the godswood grass into mud and puddles. The Blackfish assembled a hundred men and rode out after Karstarks, but no one expected he would bring back many. “I only pray I do not need to hang them,” he said as he departed. When he was gone, Catelyn retreated to her father’s solar, to sit once more beside Lord Hoster’s bed.
“It will not be much longer,” Maester Vyman warned her, when he came that afternoon. “His last strength is going, though still he tries to fight.”
“He was ever a fighter,” she said. “A sweet stubborn man.”
“Yes,” the maester said, “but this battle he cannot win. It is time he lay down his sword and shield. Time to yield.”
To yield, she thought, to make a peace. Was it her father the maester was speaking of, or her son?
At evenfall, Jeyne Westerling came to see her. The young queen entered the solar timidly. “Lady Catelyn, I do not mean to disturb you . . .”
“You are most welcome here, Your Grace.” Catelyn had been sewing, but she put the needle aside now.
“Please. Call me Jeyne. I don’t feel like a Grace.”
“You are one, nonetheless. Please, come sit, Your Grace.”
“Jeyne.” She sat by the hearth and smoothed her skirt out anxiously.
“As you wish. How might I serve you, Jeyne?”
“It’s Robb,” the girl said. “He’s so miserable, so . . . so angry and disconsolate. I don’t know what to do.”
“It is a hard thing to take a man’s life.”
“I know. I told him, he should use a headsman. When Lord Tywin sends a man to die, all he does is give the command. It’s easier that way, don’t you think?”
“Yes,” said Catelyn, “but my lord husband taught his sons that killing should never be easy.”
“Oh.” Queen Jeyne wet her lips. “Robb has not eaten all day. I had Rollam bring him a nice supper, boar’s ribs and stewed onions and ale, but he never touched a bite of it. He spent all morning writing a letter and told me not to disturb him, but when the letter was done he burned it. Now he is sitting and looking at maps. I asked him what he was looking for, but he never answered. I don’t think he ever heard me. He wouldn’t even change out of his clothes. They were damp all day, and bloody. I want to be a good wife to him, I do, but I don’t know how to help. To cheer him, or comfort him. I don’t know what he needs. Please, my lady, you’re his mother, tell me what I should do.”
Tell me what I should do. Catelyn might have asked the same, if her father had been well enough to ask. But Lord Hoster was gone, or near enough. Her Ned as well. Bran and Rickon too, and Mother, and Brandon so long ago. Only Robb remained to her, Robb and the fading hope of her daughters.
“Sometimes,” Catelyn said slowly, “the best thing you can do is nothing. When I first came to Winterfell, I was hurt whenever Ned went to the godswood to sit beneath his heart tree. Part of his soul was in that tree, I knew, a part I would never share. Yet without that part, I soon realized, he would not have been Ned. Jeyne, child, you have wed the north, as I did . . . and in the north, the winters will come.” She tried to smile. “Be patient. Be understanding. He loves you and he needs you, and he will come back to you soon enough. This very night, perhaps. Be there when he does. That is all I can tell you.”
The young queen listened raptly. “I will,” she said when Catelyn was done. “I’ll be there.” She got to her feet. “I should go back. He might have missed me. I’ll see. But if he’s still at his maps, I’ll be patient.”
“Do,” said Catelyn, but when the girl was at the door, she thought of something else. “Jeyne,” she called after, “there’s one more thing Robb needs from you, though he may not know it yet himself. A king must have an heir.”
The girl smiled at that. “My mother says the same. She makes a posset for me, herbs and milk and ale, to help make me fertile. I drink it every morning. I told Robb I’m sure to give him twins. An Eddard and a Brandon. He liked that, I think. We . . . we try most every day, my lady. Sometimes twice or more.” The girl blushed very prettily. “I’ll be with child soon, I promise. I pray to our Mother Above, every night.”
“Very good. I will add my prayers as well. To the old gods and the new.”
When the girl had gone, Catelyn turned back to her father and smoothed the thin white hair across his brow. “An Eddard and a Brandon,” she sighed softly. “And perhaps in time a Hoster. Would you like that?” He did not answer, but she had never expected that he would. As the sound of the rain on the roof mingled with her father’s breathing, she thought about Jeyne. The girl did seem to have a good heart, just as Robb had said. And good hips, which might be more important.

Let the kings of winter have their cold crypt under the earth, Catelyn thought. The Tullys drew their strength from the river, and it was to the river they returned when their lives had run their course.
They laid Lord Hoster in a slender wooden boat, clad in shining silver armor, plate-and-mail. His cloak was spread beneath him, rippling blue and red. His surcoat was divided blue-and-red as well. A trout, scaled in silver and bronze, crowned the crest of the greathelm they placed beside his head. On his chest they placed a painted wooden sword, his fingers curled about its hilt. Mail gauntlets hid his wasted hands, and made him look almost strong again. His massive oak-and-iron shield was set by his left side, his hunting horn to his right. The rest of the boat was filled with driftwood and kindling and scraps of parchment, and stones to make it heavy in the water. His banner flew from the prow, the leaping trout of Riverrun.
Seven were chosen to push the funereal boat to the water, in honor of the seven faces of god. Robb was one, Lord Hoster’s liege lord. With him were the Lords Bracken, Blackwood, Vance, and Mallister, Ser Marq Piper . . . and Lame Lothar Frey, who had come down from the Twins with the answer they had awaited. Forty soldiers rode in his escort, commanded by Walder Rivers, the eldest of Lord Walder’s bastard brood, a stern, grey-haired man with a formidable reputation as a warrior. Their arrival, coming within hours of Lord Hoster’s passing, had sent Edmure into a rage. “Walder Frey should be flayed and quartered!” he’d shouted. “He sends a cripple and a bastard to treat with us, tell me there is no insult meant by that.”
“I have no doubt that Lord Walder chose his envoys with care,” she replied. “It was a peevish thing to do, a petty sort of revenge, but remember who we are dealing with. The Late Lord Frey, Father used to call him. The man is ill-tempered, envious, and above all prideful.”
Blessedly, her son had shown better sense than her brother. Robb had greeted the Freys with every courtesy, found barracks space for the escort, and quietly asked Ser Desmond Grell to stand aside so Lothar might have the honor of helping to send Lord Hoster on his last voyage. He has learned a rough wisdom beyond his years, my son. House Frey might have abandoned the King in the North, but the Lord of the Crossing remained the most powerful of Riverrun’s bannermen, and Lothar was here in his stead.
The seven launched Lord Hoster from the water stair, wading down the steps as the portcullis was winched upward. Lothar Frey, a soft-bodied portly man, was breathing heavily as they shoved the boat out into the current. Jason Mallister and Tytos Blackwood, at the prow, stood chest deep in the river to guide it on its way.
Catelyn watched from the battlements, waiting and watching as she had waited and watched so many times before. Beneath her, the swift wild Tumblestone plunged like a spear into the side of the broad Red Fork, its blue-white current churning the muddy red-brown flow of the greater river. A morning mist hung over the water, as thin as gossamer and the wisps of memory.
Bran and Rickon will be waiting for him, Catelyn thought sadly, as once I used to wait.
The slim boat drifted out from under the red stone arch of the Water Gate, picking up speed as it was caught in the headlong rush of the Tumblestone and pushed out into the tumult where the waters met. As the boat emerged from beneath the high sheltering walls of the castle, its square sail filled with wind, and Catelyn saw sunlight flashing on her father’s helm. Lord Hoster Tully’s rudder held true, and he sailed serenely down the center of the channel, into the rising sun.
“Now,” her uncle urged. Beside him, her brother Edmure—Lord Edmure now in truth, and how long would that take to grow used to?—nocked an arrow to his bowstring. His squire held a brand to its point. Edmure waited until the flame caught, then lifted the great bow, drew the string to his ear, and let fly. With a deep thrum, the arrow sped upward. Catelyn followed its flight with her eyes and heart, until it plunged into the water with a soft hiss, well astern of Lord Hoster’s boat.
Edmure cursed softly. “The wind,” he said, pulling a second arrow. “Again.” The brand kissed the oil-soaked rag behind the arrowhead, the flames went licking up, Edmure lifted, pulled, and released. High and far the arrow flew. Too far. It vanished in the river a dozen yards beyond the boat, its fire winking out in an instant. A flush was creeping up Edmure’s neck, red as his beard. “Once more,” he commanded, taking a third arrow from the quiver. He is as tight as his bowstring, Catelyn thought.
Ser Brynden must have seen the same thing. “Let me, my lord,” he offered.
“I can do it,” Edmure insisted. He let them light the arrow, jerked the bow up, took a deep breath, drew back the arrow. For a long moment he seemed to hesitate while the fire crept up the shaft, crackling. Finally he released. The arrow flashed up and up, and finally curved down again, falling, falling . . . and hissing past the billowing sail.
A narrow miss, no more than a handspan, and yet a miss. “The Others take it!” her brother swore. The boat was almost out of range, drifting in and out among the river mists. Wordless, Edmure thrust the bow at his uncle.
“Swiftly,” Ser Brynden said. He nocked an arrow, held it steady for the brand, drew and released before Catelyn was quite sure that the fire had caught . . . but as the shot rose, she saw the flames trailing through the air, a pale orange pennon. The boat had vanished in the mists. Falling, the flaming arrow was swallowed up as well . . . but only for a heartbeat. Then, sudden as hope, they saw the red bloom flower. The sails took fire, and the fog glowed pink and orange. For a moment Catelyn saw the outline of the boat clearly, wreathed in leaping flames.
Watch for me, little cat, she could hear him whisper.
Catelyn reached out blindly, groping for her brother’s hand, but Edmure had moved away, to stand alone on the highest point of the battlements. Her uncle Brynden took her hand instead, twining his strong fingers through hers. Together they watched the little fire grow smaller as the burning boat receded in the distance.
And then it was gone . . . drifting downriver still, perhaps, or broken up and sinking. The weight of his armor would carry Lord Hoster down to rest in the soft mud of the riverbed, in the watery halls where the Tullys held eternal court, with schools of fish their last attendants.
No sooner had the burning boat vanished from their sight than Edmure walked off. Catelyn would have liked to embrace him, if only for a moment; to sit for an hour or a night or the turn of a moon to speak of the dead and mourn. Yet she knew as well as he that this was not the time; he was Lord of Riverrun now, and his knights were falling in around him, murmuring condolences and promises of fealty, walling him off from something as small as a sister’s grief. Edmure listened, hearing none of the words.
“It is no disgrace to miss your shot,” her uncle told her quietly. “Edmure should hear that. The day my own lord father went downriver, Hoster missed as well.”
“With his first shaft.” Catelyn had been too young to remember, but Lord Hoster had often told the tale. “His second found the sail.” She sighed. Edmure was not as strong as he seemed. Their father’s death had been a mercy when it came at last, but even so her brother had taken it hard.
Last night in his cups he had broken down and wept, full of regrets for things undone and words unsaid. He ought never to have ridden off to fight his battle on the fords, he told her tearfully; he should have stayed at their father’s bedside. “I should have been with him, as you were,” he said. “Did he speak of me at the end? Tell me true, Cat. Did he ask for me?”
Lord Hoster’s last word had been “Tansy,” but Catelyn could not bring herself to tell him that. “He whispered your name,” she lied, and her brother had nodded gratefully and kissed her hand. If he had not tried to drown his grief and guilt, he might have been able to bend a bow, she thought to herself, sighing, but that was something else she dare not say.
The Blackfish escorted her down from the battlements to where Robb stood among his bannermen, his young queen at his side. When he saw her, her son took her silently in his arms.
“Lord Hoster looked as noble as a king, my lady,” murmured Jeyne. “Would that I had been given the chance to know him.”
“And I to know him better,” added Robb.
“He would have wished that too,” said Catelyn. “There were too many leagues between Riverrun and Winterfell.” And too many mountains and rivers and armies between Riverrun and the Eyrie, it would seem. Lysa had made no reply to her letter.
And from King’s Landing came only silence as well. By now she had hoped that Brienne and Ser Cleos would have reached the city with their captive. It might even be that Brienne was on her way back, and the girls with her. Ser Cleos swore he would make the Imp send a raven once the trade was made. He swore it! Ravens did not always win through. Some bowman could have brought the bird down and roasted him for supper. The letter that would have set her heart at ease might even now be lying by the ashes of some campfire beside a pile of raven bones.
Others were waiting to offer Robb their consolations, so Catelyn stood aside patiently while Lord Jason Mallister, the Greatjon, and Ser Rolph Spicer spoke to him each in turn. But when Lothar Frey approached, she gave his sleeve a tug. Robb turned, and waited to hear what Lothar would say.
“Your Grace.” A plump man in his middle thirties, Lothar Frey had close-set eyes, a pointed beard, and dark hair that fell to his shoulders in ringlets. A leg twisted at birth had earned him the name Lame Lothar. He had served as his father’s steward for the past dozen years. “We are loath to intrude upon your grief, but perhaps you might grant us audience tonight?”
“It would be my pleasure,” said Robb. “It was never my wish to sow enmity between us.”
“Nor mine to be the cause of it,” said Queen Jeyne.
Lothar Frey smiled. “I understand, as does my lord father. He instructed me to say that he was young once, and well remembers what it is like to lose one’s heart to beauty.”
Catelyn doubted very much that Lord Walder had said any such thing, or that he had ever lost his heart to beauty. The Lord of the Crossing had outlived seven wives and was now wed to his eighth, but he spoke of them only as bedwarmers and brood mares. Still, the words were fairly spoken, and she could scarce object to the compliment. Nor did Robb. “Your father is most gracious,” he said. “I shall look forward to our talk.”
Lothar bowed, kissed the queen’s hand, and withdrew. By then a dozen others had gathered for a word. Robb spoke with them each, giving a thanks here, a smile there, as needed. Only when the last of them was done did he turn back to Catelyn. “There is something we must speak of. Will you walk with me?”
“As you command, Your Grace.”
“That wasn’t a command, Mother.”
“It will be my pleasure, then.” Her son had treated her kindly enough since returning to Riverrun, yet he seldom sought her out. If he was more comfortable with his young queen, she could scarcely blame him. Jeyne makes him smile, and I have nothing to share with him but grief. He seemed to enjoy the company of his bride’s brothers, as well; young Rollam his squire and Ser Raynald his standard-bearer. They are standing in the boots of those he’s lost, Catelyn realized when she watched them together. Rollam has taken Bran’s place, and Raynald is part Theon and part Jon Snow. Only with the Westerlings did she see Robb smile, or hear him laugh like the boy he was. To the others he was always the King in the North, head bowed beneath the weight of the crown even when his brows were bare.
Robb kissed his wife gently, promised to see her in their chambers, and went off with his lady mother. His steps led them toward the godswood. “Lothar seemed amiable, that’s a hopeful sign. We need the Freys.”
“That does not mean we shall have them.”
He nodded, and there was glumness to his face and a slope to his shoulders that made her heart go out to him. The crown is crushing him, she thought. He wants so much to be a good king, to be brave and honorable and clever, but the weight is too much for a boy to bear. Robb was doing all he could, yet still the blows kept falling, one after the other, relentless. When they brought him word of the battle at Duskendale, where Lord Randyll Tarly had shattered Robett Glover and Ser Helman Tallhart, he might have been expected to rage. Instead he’d stared in dumb disbelief and said, “Duskendale, on the narrow sea? Why would they go to Duskendale?” He’d shook his head, bewildered. “A third of my foot, lost for Duskendale?”
“The ironmen have my castle and now the Lannisters hold my brother,” Galbart Glover said, in a voice thick with despair. Robett Glover had survived the battle, but had been captured near the kingsroad not long after.
“Not for long,” her son promised. “I will offer them Martyn Lannister in exchange. Lord Tywin will have to accept, for his brother’s sake.” Martyn was Ser Kevan’s son, a twin to the Willem that Lord Karstark had butchered. Those murders still haunted her son, Catelyn knew. He had tripled the guard around Martyn, but still feared for his safety.
“I should have traded the Kingslayer for Sansa when you first urged it,” Robb said as they walked the gallery. “If I’d offered to wed her to the Knight of Flowers, the Tyrells might be ours instead of Joffrey’s. I should have thought of that.”
“Your mind was on your battles, and rightly so. Even a king cannot think of everything.”
“Battles,” muttered Robb as he led her out beneath the trees. “I have won every battle, yet somehow I’m losing the war.” He looked up, as if the answer might be written on the sky. “The ironmen hold Winterfell, and Moat Cailin too. Father’s dead, and Bran and Rickon, maybe Arya. And now your father too.”
She could not let him despair. She knew the taste of that draught too well herself. “My father has been dying for a long time. You could not have changed that. You have made mistakes, Robb, but what king has not? Ned would have been proud of you.”
“Mother, there is something you must know.”
Catelyn’s heart skipped a beat. This is something he hates. Something he dreads to tell me. All she could think of was Brienne and her mission. “Is it the Kingslayer?”
“No. It’s Sansa.”
She’s dead, Catelyn thought at once. Brienne failed, Jaime is dead, and Cersei has killed my sweet girl in retribution. For a moment she could barely speak. “Is . . . is she gone, Robb?”
“Gone?” He looked startled. “Dead? Oh, Mother, no, not that, they haven’t harmed her, not that way, only . . . a bird came last night, but I couldn’t bring myself to tell you, not until your father was sent to his rest.” Robb took her hand. “They married her to Tyrion Lannister.”
Catelyn’s fingers clutched at his. “The Imp.”
“Yes.”
“He swore to trade her for his brother,” she said numbly. “Sansa and Arya both. We would have them back if we returned his precious Jaime, he swore it before the whole court. How could he marry her, after saying that in sight of gods and men?”
“He’s the Kingslayer’s brother. Oathbreaking runs in their blood.” Robb’s fingers brushed the pommel of his sword. “If I could I’d take his ugly head off. Sansa would be a widow then, and free. There’s no other way that I can see. They made her speak the vows before a septon and don a crimson cloak.”
Catelyn remembered the twisted little man she had seized at the crossroads inn and carried all the way to the Eyrie. “I should have let Lysa push him out her Moon Door. My poor sweet Sansa . . . why would anyone do this to her?”
“For Winterfell,” Robb said at once. “With Bran and Rickon dead, Sansa is my heir. If anything should happen to me . . .”
She clutched tight at his hand. “Nothing will happen to you. Nothing. I could not stand it. They took Ned, and your sweet brothers. Sansa is married, Arya is lost, my father’s dead . . . if anything befell you, I would go mad, Robb. You are all I have left. You are all the north has left.”
“I am not dead yet, Mother.”
Suddenly Catelyn was full of dread. “Wars need not be fought until the last drop of blood.” Even she could hear the desperation in her voice. “You would not be the first king to bend the knee, nor even the first Stark.”
His mouth tightened. “No. Never.”
“There is no shame in it. Balon Greyjoy bent the knee to Robert when his rebellion failed. Torrhen Stark bent the knee to Aegon the Conqueror rather than see his army face the fires.”
“Did Aegon kill King Torrhen’s father?” He pulled his hand from hers. “Never, I said.”
He is playing the boy now, not the king. “The Lannisters do not need the north. They will require homage and hostages, no more . . . and the Imp will keep Sansa no matter what we do, so they have their hostage. The ironmen will prove a more implacable enemy, I promise you. To have any hope of holding the north, the Greyjoys must leave no single sprig of House Stark alive to dispute their right. Theon’s murdered Bran and Rickon, so now all they need do is kill you . . . and Jeyne, yes. Do you think Lord Balon can afford to let her live to bear you heirs?”
Robb’s face was cold. “Is that why you freed the Kingslayer? To make a peace with the Lannisters?”
“I freed Jaime for Sansa’s sake . . . and Arya’s, if she still lives. You know that. But if I nurtured some hope of buying peace as well, was that so ill?”
“Yes,” he said. “The Lannisters killed my father.”
“Do you think I have forgotten that?”
“I don’t know. Have you?”
Catelyn had never struck her children in anger, but she almost struck Robb then. It was an effort to remind herself how frightened and alone he must feel. “You are King in the North, the choice is yours. I only ask that you think on what I’ve said. The singers make much of kings who die valiantly in battle, but your life is worth more than a song. To me at least, who gave it to you.” She lowered her head. “Do I have your leave to go?”
“Yes.” He turned away and drew his sword. What he meant to do with it, she could not say. There was no enemy there, no one to fight. Only her and him, amongst tall trees and fallen leaves. There are fights no sword can win, Catelyn wanted to tell him, but she feared the king was deaf to such words.
Hours later, she was sewing in her bedchamber when young Rollam Westerling came running with the summons to supper. Good, Catelyn thought, relieved. She had not been certain that her son would want her there, after their quarrel. “A dutiful squire,” she said to Rollam gravely. Bran would have been the same.
If Robb seemed cool at table and Edmure surly, Lame Lothar made up for them both. He was the model of courtesy, reminiscing warmly about Lord Hoster, offering Catelyn gentle condolences on the loss of Bran and Rickon, praising Edmure for the victory at Stone Mill, and thanking Robb for the “swift sure justice” he had meted out to Rickard Karstark. Lothar’s bastard brother Walder Rivers was another matter; a harsh sour man with old Lord Walder’s suspicious face, he spoke but seldom and devoted most of his attention to the meat and mead that was set before him.
When all the empty words were said, the queen and the other Westerlings excused themselves, the remains of the meal were cleared away, and Lothar Frey cleared his throat. “Before we turn to the business that brings us here, there is another matter,” he said solemnly. “A grave matter, I fear. I had hoped it would not fall to me to bring you these tidings, but it seems I must. My lord father has had a letter from his grandsons.”
Catelyn had been so lost in grief for her own that she had almost forgotten the two Freys she had agreed to foster. No more, she thought. Mother have mercy, how many more blows can we bear? Somehow she knew the next words she heard would plunge yet another blade into her heart. “The grandsons at Winterfell?” she made herself ask. “My wards?”
“Walder and Walder, yes. But they are presently at the Dreadfort, my lady. I grieve to tell you this, but there has been a battle. Winterfell is burned.”
“Burned?” Robb’s voice was incredulous.
“Your northern lords tried to retake it from the ironmen. When Theon Greyjoy saw that his prize was lost, he put the castle to the torch.”
“We have heard naught of any battle,” said Ser Brynden.
“My nephews are young, I grant you, but they were there. Big Walder wrote the letter, though his cousin signed as well. It was a bloody bit of business, by their account. Your castellan was slain. Ser Rodrik, was that his name?”
“Ser Rodrik Cassel,” said Catelyn numbly. That dear brave loyal old soul. She could almost see him, tugging on his fierce white whiskers. “What of our other people?”
“The ironmen put many of them to the sword, I fear.”
Wordless with rage, Robb slammed a fist down on the table and turned his face away, so the Freys would not see his tears.
But his mother saw them. The world grows a little darker every day. Catelyn’s thoughts went to Ser Rodrik’s little daughter Beth, to tireless Maester Luwin and cheerful Septon Chayle, Mikken at the forge, Farlen and Palla in the kennels, Old Nan and simple Hodor. Her heart was sick. “Please, not all.”
“No,” said Lame Lothar. “The women and children hid, my nephews Walder and Walder among them. With Winterfell in ruins, the survivors were carried back to the Dreadfort by this son of Lord Bolton’s.”
“Bolton’s son?” Robb’s voice was strained.
Walder Rivers spoke up. “A bastard son, I believe.”
“Not Ramsay Snow? Does Lord Roose have another bastard?” Robb scowled. “This Ramsay was a monster and a murderer, and he died a coward. Or so I was told.”
“I cannot speak to that. There is much confusion in any war. Many false reports. All I can tell you is that my nephews claim it was this bastard son of Bolton’s who saved the women of Winterfell, and the little ones. They are safe at the Dreadfort now, all those who remain.”
“Theon,” Robb said suddenly. “What happened to Theon Greyjoy? Was he slain?”
Lame Lothar spread his hands. “That I cannot say, Your Grace. Walder and Walder made no mention of his fate. Perhaps Lord Bolton might know, if he has had word from this son of his.”
Ser Brynden said, “We will be certain to ask him.”
“You are all distraught, I see. I am sorry to have brought you such fresh grief. Perhaps we should adjourn until the morrow. Our business can wait until you have composed yourselves . . .”
“No,” said Robb, “I want the matter settled.”
Her brother Edmure nodded. “Me as well. Do you have an answer to our offer, my lord?”
“I do.” Lothar smiled. “My lord father bids me tell Your Grace that he will agree to this new marriage alliance between our houses and renew his fealty to the King in the North, upon the condition that the King’s Grace apologize for the insult done to House Frey, in his royal person, face to face.”
An apology was a small enough price to pay, but Catelyn misliked this petty condition of Lord Walder’s at once.
“I am pleased,” Robb said cautiously. “It was never my wish to cause this rift between us, Lothar. The Freys have fought valiantly for my cause. I would have them at my side once more.”
“You are too kind, Your Grace. As you accept these terms, I am then instructed to offer Lord Tully the hand of my sister, the Lady Roslin, a maid of sixteen years. Roslin is my lord father’s youngest daughter by Lady Bethany of House Rosby, his sixth wife. She has a gentle nature and a gift for music.”
Edmure shifted in his seat. “Might not it be better if I first met—”
“You’ll meet when you’re wed,” said Walder Rivers curtly. “Unless Lord Tully feels a need to count her teeth first?”
Edmure kept his temper. “I will take your word so far as her teeth are concerned, but it would be pleasant if I might gaze upon her face before I espoused her.”
“You must accept her now, my lord,” said Walder Rivers. “Else my father’s offer is withdrawn.”
Lame Lothar spread his hands. “My brother has a soldier’s bluntness, but what he says is true. It is my lord father’s wish that this marriage take place at once.”
“At once?” Edmure sounded so unhappy that Catelyn had the unworthy thought that perhaps he had been entertaining notions of breaking the betrothal after the fighting was done.
“Has Lord Walder forgotten that we are fighting a war?” Brynden Blackfish asked sharply.
“Scarcely,” said Lothar. “That is why he insists that the marriage take place now, ser. Men die in war, even men who are young and strong. What would become of our alliance should Lord Edmure fall before he took Roslin to bride? And there is my father’s age to consider as well. He is past ninety and not like to see the end of this struggle. It would put his noble heart at peace if he could see his dear Roslin safely wed before the gods take him, so he might die with the knowledge that the girl had a strong husband to cherish and protect her.”
We all want Lord Walder to die happy. Catelyn was growing less and less comfortable with this arrangement. “My brother has just lost his own father. He needs time to mourn.”
“Roslin is a cheerful girl,” said Lothar. “She may be the very thing Lord Edmure needs to help him through his grief.”
“And my grandfather has come to mislike lengthy betrothals,” the bastard Walder Rivers added. “I cannot imagine why.”
Robb gave him a chilly look. “I take your meaning, Rivers. Pray excuse us.”
“As Your Grace commands.” Lame Lothar rose, and his bastard brother helped him hobble from the room.
Edmure was seething. “They’re as much as saying that my promise is worthless. Why should I let that old weasel choose my bride? Lord Walder has other daughters besides this Roslin. Granddaughters as well. I should be offered the same choice you were. I’m his liege lord, he should be overjoyed that I’m willing to wed any of them.”
“He is a proud man, and we’ve wounded him,” said Catelyn.
“The Others take his pride! I will not be shamed in my own hall. My answer is no.”
Robb gave him a weary look. “I will not command you. Not in this. But if you refuse, Lord Frey will take it for another slight, and any hope of putting this arights will be gone.”
“You cannot know that,” Edmure insisted. “Frey has wanted me for one of his daughters since the day I was born. He will not let a chance like this slip between those grasping fingers of his. When Lothar brings him our answer, he’ll come wheedling back and accept a betrothal . . . and to a daughter of my choosing.”
“Perhaps, in time,” said Brynden Blackfish. “But can we wait, while Lothar rides back and forth with offers and counters?”
Robb’s hands curled into fists. “I must get back to the north. My brothers dead, Winterfell burned, my smallfolk put to the sword . . . the gods only know what this bastard of Bolton’s is about, or whether Theon is still alive and on the loose. I can’t sit here waiting for a wedding that might or might not happen.”
“It must happen,” said Catelyn, though not gladly. “I have no more wish to suffer Walder Frey’s insults and complaints than you do, Brother, but I see little choice here. Without this wedding, Robb’s cause is lost. Edmure, we must accept.”
“We must accept?” he echoed peevishly. “I don’t see you offering to become the ninth Lady Frey, Cat.”
“The eighth Lady Frey is still alive and well, so far as I know,” she replied. Thankfully. Otherwise it might well have come to that, knowing Lord Walder.
The Blackfish said, “I am the last man in the Seven Kingdoms to tell anyone who they must wed, Nephew. Nonetheless, you did say something of making amends for your Battle of the Fords.”
“I had in mind a different sort of amends. Single combat with the Kingslayer. Seven years of penace as a begging brother. Swimming the sunset sea with my legs tied.” When he saw that no one was smiling, Edmure threw up his hands. “The Others take you all! Very well, I’ll wed the wench. As amends.”

Robb bid farewell to his young queen thrice. Once in the godswood before the heart tree, in sight of gods and men. The second time beneath the portcullis, where Jeyne sent him forth with a long embrace and a longer kiss. And finally an hour beyond the Tumblestone, when the girl came galloping up on a well-lathered horse to plead with her young king to take her along.
Robb was touched by that, Catelyn saw, but abashed as well. The day was damp and grey, a drizzle had begun to fall, and the last thing he wanted was to call a halt to his march so he could stand in the wet and console a tearful young wife in front of half his army. He speaks her gently, she thought as she watched them together, but there is anger underneath.
All the time the king and queen were talking, Grey Wind prowled around them, stopping only to shake the water from his coat and bare his teeth at the rain. When at last Robb gave Jeyne one final kiss, dispatched a dozen men to take her back to Riverrun, and mounted his horse once more, the direwolf raced off ahead as swift as an arrow loosed from a longbow.
“Queen Jeyne has a loving heart, I see,” said Lame Lothar Frey to Catelyn. “Not unlike my own sisters. Why, I would wager a guess that even now Roslin is dancing round the Twins chanting ‘Lady Tully, Lady Tully, Lady Roslin Tully.’ By the morrow she’ll be holding swatches of Riverrun red-and-blue to her cheek to picture how she’ll look in her bride’s cloak.” He turned in the saddle to smile at Edmure. “But you are strangely quiet, Lord Tully. How do you feel, I wonder?”
“Much as I did at the Stone Mill just before the warhorns sounded,” Edmure said, only half in jest.
Lothar gave a good-natured laugh. “Let us pray your marriage ends as happily, my lord.”
And may the gods protect us if it does not. Catelyn pressed her heels into her horse, leaving her brother and Lame Lothar to each other’s company.
It had been her who had insisted that Jeyne remain at Riverrun, when Robb would sooner have kept her by his side. Lord Walder might well construe the queen’s absence from the wedding as another slight, yet her presence would have been a different sort of insult, salt in the old man’s wound. “Walder Frey has a sharp tongue and a long memory,” she had warned her son. “I do not doubt that you are strong enough to suffer an old man’s rebukes as the price of his allegiance, but you have too much of your father in you to sit there while he insults Jeyne to her face.”
Robb could not deny the sense of that. Yet all the same, he resents me for it, Catelyn thought wearily. He misses Jeyne already, and some part of him blames me for her absence, though he knows it was good counsel.
Of the six Westerlings who had come with her son from the Crag, only one remained by his side; Ser Raynald, Jeyne’s brother, the royal banner-bearer. Robb had dispatched Jeyne’s uncle Rolph Spicer to deliver young Martyn Lannister to the Golden Tooth the very day he received Lord Tywin’s assent to the exchange of captives. It was deftly done. Her son was relieved of his fear for Martyn’s safety, Galbart Glover was relieved to hear that his brother Robett had been put on a ship at Duskendale, Ser Rolph had important and honorable employment . . . and Grey Wind was at the king’s side once more. Where he belongs.
Lady Westerling had remained at Riverrun with her children; Jeyne, her little sister Eleyna, and young Rollam, Robb’s squire, who complained bitterly about being left. Yet that was wise as well. Olyvar Frey had squired for Robb previously, and would doubtless be present for his sister’s wedding; to parade his replacement before him would be as unwise as it was unkind. As for Ser Raynald, he was a cheerful young knight who swore that no insult of Walder Frey’s could possibly provoke him. And let us pray that insults are all we need to contend with.
Catelyn had her fears on that score, though. Her lord father had never trusted Walder Frey after the Trident, and she was ever mindful of that. Queen Jeyne would be safest behind the high, strong walls of Riverrun, with the Blackfish to protect her. Robb had even created him a new title, Warden of the Southern Marches. Ser Brynden would hold the Trident if any man could.
All the same, Catelyn would miss her uncle’s craggy face, and Robb would miss his counsel. Ser Brynden had played a part in every victory her son had won. Galbart Glover had taken command of the scouts and outriders in his place; a good man, loyal and steady, but without the Blackfish’s brilliance.
Behind Glover’s screen of scouts, Robb’s line of march stretched several miles. The Greatjon led the van. Catelyn traveled in the main column, surrounded by plodding warhorses with steelclad men on their backs. Next came the baggage train, a procession of wayns laden with food, fodder, camp supplies, wedding gifts, and the wounded too weak to walk, under the watchful eye of Ser Wendel Manderly and his White Harbor knights. Herds of sheep and goats and scrawny cattle trailed behind, and then a little trail of footsore camp followers. Even farther back was Robin Flint and the rearguard. There was no enemy in back of them for hundreds of leagues, but Robb would take no chances.
Thirty-five hundred they were, thirty-five hundred who had been blooded in the Whispering Wood, who had reddened their swords at the Battle of the Camps, at Oxcross, Ashemark, and the Crag, and all through the gold-rich hills of the Lannister west. Aside from her brother Edmure’s modest retinue of friends, the lords of the Trident had remained to hold the riverlands while the king retook the north. Ahead awaited Edmure’s bride and Robb’s next battle . . . and for me, two dead sons, an empty bed, and a castle full of ghosts. It was a cheerless prospect. Brienne, where are you? Bring my girls back to me, Brienne. Bring them back safe.
The drizzle that had sent them off turned into a soft steady rain by midday, and continued well past nightfall. The next day the northmen never saw the sun at all, but rode beneath leaden skies with their hoods pulled up to keep the water from their eyes. It was a heavy rain, turning roads to mud and fields to quagmires, swelling the rivers and stripping the trees of their leaves. The constant patter made idle chatter more bother than it was worth, so men spoke only when they had something to say, and that was seldom enough.
“We are stronger than we seem, my lady,” Lady Maege Mormont said as they rode. Catelyn had grown fond of Lady Maege and her eldest daughter, Dacey; they were more understanding than most in the matter of Jaime Lannister, she had found. The daughter was tall and lean, the mother short and stout, but they dressed alike in mail and leather, with the black bear of House Mormont on shield and surcoat. By Catelyn’s lights, that was queer garb for a lady, yet Dacey and Lady Maege seemed more comfortable, both as warriors and as women, than ever the girl from Tarth had been.
“I have fought beside the Young Wolf in every battle,” Dacey Mormont said cheerfully. “He has not lost one yet.”
No, but he has lost everything else, Catelyn thought, but it would not do to say it aloud. The northmen did not lack for courage, but they were far from home, with little enough to sustain them but for their faith in their young king. That faith must be protected, at all costs. I must be stronger, she told herself. I must be strong for Robb. If I despair, my grief will consume me. Everything would turn on this marriage. If Edmure and Roslin were happy in one another, if the Late Lord Frey could be appeased and his power once more wedded to Robb’s . . . Even then, what chance will we have, caught between Lannister and Greyjoy? It was a question Catelyn dared not dwell on, though Robb dwelt on little else. She saw how he studied his maps whenever they made camp, searching for some plan that might win back the north.
Her brother Edmure had other cares. “You don’t suppose all Lord Walder’s daughters look like him, do you?” he wondered, as he sat in his tall striped pavilion with Catelyn and his friends.
“With so many different mothers, a few of the maids are bound to turn up comely,” said Ser Marq Piper, “but why should the old wretch give you a pretty one?”
“No reason at all,” said Edmure in a glum tone.
It was more than Catelyn could stand. “Cersei Lannister is comely,” she said sharply. “You’d be wiser to pray that Roslin is strong and healthy, with a good head and a loyal heart.” And with that she left them.
Edmure did not take that well. The next day he avoided her entirely on the march, preferring the company of Marq Piper, Lymond Goodbrook, Patrek Mallister, and the young Vances. They do not scold him, except in jest, Catelyn told herself when they raced by her that afternoon with nary a word. I have always been too hard with Edmure, and now grief sharpens my every word. She regretted her rebuke. There was rain enough falling from the sky without her making more. And was it really such a terrible thing, to want a pretty wife? She remembered her own childish disappointment, the first time she had laid eyes on Eddard Stark. She had pictured him as a younger version of his brother Brandon, but that was wrong. Ned was shorter and plainer of face, and so somber. He spoke courteously enough, but beneath the words she sensed a coolness that was all at odds with Brandon, whose mirths had been as wild as his rages. Even when he took her maidenhood, their love had more of duty to it than of passion. We made Robb that night, though; we made a king together. And after the war, at Winterfell, I had love enough for any woman, once I found the good sweet heart beneath Ned’s solemn face. There is no reason Edmure should not find the same, with his Roslin.
As the gods would have it, their route took them through the Whispering Wood where Robb had won his first great victory. They followed the course of the twisting stream on the floor of that pinched narrow valley, much as Jaime Lannister’s men had done that fateful night. It was warmer then, Catelyn remembered, the trees were still green, and the stream did not overflow its banks. Fallen leaves choked the flow now and lay in sodden snarls among the rocks and roots, and the trees that had once hidden Robb’s army had exchanged their green raiment for leaves of dull gold spotted with brown, and a red that reminded her of rust and dry blood. Only the spruce and the soldier pines still showed green, thrusting up at the belly of the clouds like tall dark spears.
More than the trees have died since then, she reflected. On the night of the Whispering Wood, Ned was still alive in his cell beneath Aegon’s High Hill, Bran and Rickon were safe behind the walls of Winterfell. And Theon Greyjoy fought at Robb’s side, and boasted of how he had almost crossed swords with the Kingslayer. Would that he had. If Theon had died in place of Lord Karstark’s sons, how much ill would have been undone?
As they passed through the battleground, Catelyn glimpsed signs of the carnage that had been; an overturned helm filling with rain, a splintered lance, the bones of a horse. Stone cairns had been raised over some of the men who had fallen here, but scavengers had already been at them. Amidst the tumbles of rock, she spied brightly colored cloth and bits of shiny metal. Once she saw a face peering out at her, the shape of the skull beginning to emerge from beneath the melting brown flesh.
It made her wonder where Ned had come to rest. The silent sisters had taken his bones north, escorted by Hallis Mollen and a small honor guard. Had Ned ever reached Winterfell, to be interred beside his brother Brandon in the dark crypts beneath the castle? Or did the door slam shut at Moat Cailin before Hal and the sisters could pass?
Thirty-five hundred riders wound their way along the valley floor through the heart of the Whispering Wood, but Catelyn Stark had seldom felt lonelier. Every league she crossed took her farther from Riverrun, and she found herself wondering whether she would ever see the castle again. Or was it lost to her forever, like so much else?
Five days later, their scouts rode back to warn them that the rising waters had washed out the wooden bridge at Fairmarket. Galbart Glover and two of his bolder men had tried swimming their mounts across the turbulent Blue Fork at Ramsford. Two of the horses had been swept under and drowned, and one of the riders; Glover himself managed to cling to a rock until they could pull him in. “The river hasn’t run this high since spring,” Edmure said. “And if this rain keeps falling, it will go higher yet.”
“There’s a bridge further upstream, near Oldstones,” remembered Catelyn, who had often crossed these lands with her father. “It’s older and smaller, but if it still stands—”
“It’s gone, my lady,” Galbart Glover said. “Washed away even before the one at Fairmarket.”
Robb looked to Catelyn. “Is there another bridge?”
“No. And the fords will be impassable.” She tried to remember. “If we cannot cross the Blue Fork, we’ll have to go around it, through Sevenstreams and Hag’s Mire.”
“Bogs and bad roads, or none at all,” warned Edmure. “The going will be slow, but we’ll get there, I suppose.”
“Lord Walder will wait, I’m sure,” said Robb. “Lothar sent him a bird from Riverrun, he knows we are coming.”
“Yes, but the man is prickly, and suspicious by nature,” said Catelyn. “He may take this delay as a deliberate insult.”
“Very well, I’ll beg his pardon for our tardiness as well. A sorry king I’ll be, apologizing with every second breath.” Robb made a wry face. “I hope Bolton got across the Trident before the rains began. The kingsroad runs straight north, he’ll have an easy march. Even afoot, he should reach the Twins before us.”
“And when you’ve joined his men to yours and seen my brother married, what then?” Catelyn asked him.
“North.” Robb scratched Grey Wind behind an ear.
“By the causeway? Against Moat Cailin?”
He gave her an enigmatic smile. “That’s one way to go,” he said, and she knew from his tone that he would say no more. A wise king keeps his own counsel, she reminded herself.
They reached Oldstones after eight more days of steady rain, and made their camp upon the hill overlooking the Blue Fork, within a ruined stronghold of the ancient river kings. Its foundations remained amongst the weeds to show where the walls and keeps had stood, but the local smallfolk had long ago made off with most of the stones to raise their barns and septs and holdfasts. Yet in the center of what once would have been the castle’s yard, a great carved sepulcher still rested, half hidden in waist-high brown grass amongst a stand of ash.
The lid of the sepulcher had been carved into a likeness of the man whose bones lay beneath, but the rain and the wind had done their work. The king had worn a beard, they could see, but otherwise his face was smooth and featureless, with only vague suggestions of a mouth, a nose, eyes, and the crown about the temples. His hands folded over the shaft of a stone warhammer that lay upon his chest. Once the warhammer would have been carved with runes that told its name and history, but all that the centuries had worn away. The stone itself was cracked and crumbling at the corners, discolored here and there by spreading white splotches of lichen, while wild roses crept up over the king’s feet almost to his chest.
It was there that Catelyn found Robb, standing somber in the gathering dusk with only Grey Wind beside him. The rain had stopped for once, and he was bareheaded. “Does this castle have a name?” he asked quietly, when she came up to him.
“Oldstones, all the smallfolk called it when I was a girl, but no doubt it had some other name when it was still a hall of kings.” She had camped here once with her father, on their way to Seagard. Petyr was with us too . . . 
“There’s a song,” he remembered. “‘Jenny of Oldstones, with the flowers in her hair.’”
“We’re all just songs in the end. If we are lucky.” She had played at being Jenny that day, had even wound flowers in her hair. And Petyr had pretended to be her Prince of Dragonflies. Catelyn could not have been more than twelve, Petyr just a boy.
Robb studied the sepulcher. “Whose grave is this?”
“Here lies Tristifer, the Fourth of His Name, King of the Rivers and the Hills.” Her father had told her his story once. “He ruled from the Trident to the Neck, thousands of years before Jenny and her prince, in the days when the kingdoms of the First Men were falling one after the other before the onslaught of the Andals. The Hammer of Justice, they called him. He fought a hundred battles and won nine-and-ninety, or so the singers say, and when he raised this castle it was the strongest in Westeros.” She put a hand on her son’s shoulder. “He died in his hundredth battle, when seven Andal kings joined forces against him. The fifth Tristifer was not his equal, and soon the kingdom was lost, and then the castle, and last of all the line. With Tristifer the Fifth died House Mudd, that had ruled the riverlands for a thousand years before the Andals came.”
“His heir failed him.” Robb ran a hand over the rough weathered stone. “I had hoped to leave Jeyne with child . . . we tried often enough, but I’m not certain . . .”
“It does not always happen the first time.” Though it did with you. “Nor even the hundredth. You are very young.”
“Young, and a king,” he said. “A king must have an heir. If I should die in my next battle, the kingdom must not die with me. By law Sansa is next in line of succession, so Winterfell and the north would pass to her.” His mouth tightened. “To her, and her lord husband. Tyrion Lannister. I cannot allow that. I will not allow that. That dwarf must never have the north.”
“No,” Catelyn agreed. “You must name another heir, until such time as Jeyne gives you a son.” She considered a moment. “Your father’s father had no siblings, but his father had a sister who married a younger son of Lord Raymar Royce, of the junior branch. They had three daughters, all of whom wed Vale lordlings. A Waynwood and a Corbray, for certain. The youngest . . . it might have been a Templeton, but . . .”
“Mother.” There was a sharpness in Robb’s tone. “You forget. My father had four sons.”
She had not forgotten; she had not wanted to look at it, yet there it was. “A Snow is not a Stark.”
“Jon’s more a Stark than some lordlings from the Vale who have never so much as set eyes on Winterfell.”
“Jon is a brother of the Night’s Watch, sworn to take no wife and hold no lands. Those who take the black serve for life.”
“So do the knights of the Kingsguard. That did not stop the Lannisters from stripping the white cloaks from Ser Barristan Selmy and Ser Boros Blount when they had no more use for them. If I send the Watch a hundred men in Jon’s place, I’ll wager they find some way to release him from his vows.”
He is set on this. Catelyn knew how stubborn her son could be. “A bastard cannot inherit.”
“Not unless he’s legitimized by a royal decree,” said Robb. “There is more precedent for that than for releasing a Sworn Brother from his oath.”
“Precedent,” she said bitterly. “Yes, Aegon the Fourth legitimized all his bastards on his deathbed. And how much pain, grief, war, and murder grew from that? I know you trust Jon. But can you trust his sons? Or their sons? The Blackfyre pretenders troubled the Targaryens for five generations, until Barristan the Bold slew the last of them on the Stepstones. If you make Jon legitimate, there is no way to turn him bastard again. Should he wed and breed, any sons you may have by Jeyne will never be safe.”
“Jon would never harm a son of mine.”
“No more than Theon Greyjoy would harm Bran or Rickon?”
Grey Wind leapt up atop King Tristifer’s crypt, his teeth bared. Robb’s own face was cold. “That is as cruel as it is unfair. Jon is no Theon.”
“So you pray. Have you considered your sisters? What of their rights? I agree that the north must not be permitted to pass to the Imp, but what of Arya? By law, she comes after Sansa . . . your own sister, trueborn . . .”
“. . . and dead. No one has seen or heard of Arya since they cut Father’s head off. Why do you lie to yourself? Arya’s gone, the same as Bran and Rickon, and they’ll kill Sansa too once the dwarf gets a child from her. Jon is the only brother that remains to me. Should I die without issue, I want him to succeed me as King in the North. I had hoped you would support my choice.”
“I cannot,” she said. “In all else, Robb. In everything. But not in this . . . this folly. Do not ask it.”
“I don’t have to. I’m the king.” Robb turned and walked off, Grey Wind bounding down from the tomb and loping after him.
What have I done? Catelyn thought wearily, as she stood alone by Tristifer’s stone sepulcher. First I anger Edmure, and now Robb, but all I have done is speak the truth. Are men so fragile they cannot bear to hear it? She might have wept then, had not the sky begun to do it for her. It was all she could do to walk back to her tent, and sit there in the silence.
In the days that followed, Robb was everywhere and anywhere; riding at the head of the van with the Greatjon, scouting with Grey Wind, racing back to Robin Flint and the rearguard. Men said proudly that the Young Wolf was the first to rise each dawn and the last to sleep at night, but Catelyn wondered whether he was sleeping at all. He grows as lean and hungry as his direwolf.
“My lady,” Maege Mormont said to her one morning as they rode through a steady rain, “you seem so somber. Is aught amiss?”
My lord husband is dead, as is my father. Two of my sons have been murdered, my daughter has been given to a faithless dwarf to bear his vile children, my other daughter is vanished and likely dead, and my last son and my only brother are both angry with me. What could possibly be amiss? That was more truth than Lady Maege would wish to hear, however. “This is an evil rain,” she said instead. “We have suffered much, and there is more peril and more grief ahead. We need to face it boldly, with horns blowing and banners flying bravely. But this rain beats us down. The banners hang limp and sodden, and the men huddle under their cloaks and scarcely speak to one another. Only an evil rain would chill our hearts when most we need them to burn hot.”
Dacey Mormont looked up at the sky. “I would sooner have water raining down on me than arrows.”
Catelyn smiled despite herself. “You are braver than I am, I fear. Are all your Bear Island women such warriors?”
“She-bears, aye,” said Lady Maege. “We have needed to be. In olden days the ironmen would come raiding in their longboats, or wildlings from the Frozen Shore. The men would be off fishing, like as not. The wives they left behind had to defend themselves and their children, or else be carried off.”
“There’s a carving on our gate,” said Dacey. “A woman in a bearskin, with a child in one arm suckling at her breast. In the other hand she holds a battleaxe. She’s no proper lady, that one, but I always loved her.”
“My nephew Jorah brought home a proper lady once,” said Lady Maege. “He won her in a tourney. How she hated that carving.”
“Aye, and all the rest,” said Dacey. “She had hair like spun gold, that Lynesse. Skin like cream. But her soft hands were never made for axes.”
“Nor her teats for giving suck,” her mother said bluntly.
Catelyn knew of whom they spoke; Jorah Mormont had brought his second wife to Winterfell for feasts, and once they had guested for a fortnight. She remembered how young the Lady Lynesse had been, how fair, and how unhappy. One night, after several cups of wine, she had confessed to Catelyn that the north was no place for a Hightower of Oldtown. “There was a Tully of Riverrun who felt the same once,” she had answered gently, trying to console, “but in time she found much here she could love.”
All lost now, she reflected. Winterfell and Ned, Bran and Rickon, Sansa, Arya, all gone. Only Robb remains. Had there been too much of Lynesse Hightower in her after all, and too little of the Starks? Would that I had known how to wield an axe, perhaps I might have been able to protect them better.
Day followed day, and still the rain kept falling. All the way up the Blue Fork they rode, past Sevenstreams where the river unraveled into a confusion of rills and brooks, then through Hag’s Mire, where glistening green pools waited to swallow the unwary and the soft ground sucked at the hooves of their horses like a hungry babe at its mother’s breast. The going was worse than slow. Half the wayns had to be abandoned to the muck, their loads distributed amongst mules and draft horses.
Lord Jason Mallister caught up with them amidst the bogs of Hag’s Mire. There was more than an hour of daylight remaining when he rode up with his column, but Robb called a halt at once, and Ser Raynald Westerling came to escort Catelyn to the king’s tent. She found her son seated beside a brazier, a map across his lap. Grey Wind slept at his feet. The Greatjon was with him, along with Galbart Glover, Maege Mormont, Edmure, and a man that Catelyn did not know, a fleshy balding man with a cringing look to him. No lordling, this one, she knew the moment she laid eyes on the stranger. Not even a warrior.
Jason Mallister rose to offer Catelyn his seat. His hair had almost as much white in it as brown, but the Lord of Seagard was still a handsome man; tall and lean, with a chiseled clean-shaven face, high cheekbones, and fierce blue-grey eyes. “Lady Stark, it is ever a pleasure. I bring good tidings, I hope.”
“We are in sore need of some, my lord.” She sat, listening to the rain patter down noisily against the canvas overhead.
Robb waited for Ser Raynald to close the tent flap. “The gods have heard our prayers, my lords. Lord Jason has brought us the captain of the Myraham, a merchanter out of Oldtown. Captain, tell them what you told me.”
“Aye, Your Grace.” He licked his thick lips nervously. “My last port of call afore Seagard, that was Lordsport on Pyke. The ironmen kept me there more’n half a year, they did. King Balon’s command. Only, well, the long and the short of it is, he’s dead.”
“Balon Greyjoy?” Catelyn’s heart skipped a beat. “You are telling us that Balon Greyjoy is dead?”
The shabby little captain nodded. “You know how Pyke’s built on a headland, and part on rocks and islands off the shore, with bridges between? The way I heard it in Lordsport, there was a blow coming in from the west, rain and thunder, and old King Balon was crossing one of them bridges when the wind got hold of it and just tore the thing to pieces. He washed up two days later, all bloated and broken. Crabs ate his eyes, I hear.”
The Greatjon laughed. “King crabs, I hope, to sup upon such royal jelly, eh?”
The captain bobbed his head. “Aye, but that’s not all of it, no!” He leaned forward. “The brother’s back.”
“Victarion?” asked Galbart Glover, surprised.
“Euron. Crow’s Eye, they call him, as black a pirate as ever raised a sail. He’s been gone for years, but Lord Balon was no sooner cold than there he was, sailing into Lordsport in his Silence. Black sails and a red hull, and crewed by mutes. He’d been to Asshai and back, I heard. Wherever he was, though, he’s home now, and he marched right into Pyke and sat his arse in the Seastone Chair, and drowned Lord Botley in a cask of seawater when he objected. That was when I ran back to Myraham and slipped anchor, hoping I could get away whilst things were confused. And so I did, and here I am.”
“Captain,” said Robb when the man was done, “you have my thanks, and you will not go unrewarded. Lord Jason will take you back to your ship when we are done. Pray wait outside.”
“That I will, Your Grace. That I will.”
No sooner had he left the king’s pavilion than the Greatjon began to laugh, but Robb silenced him with a look. “Euron Greyjoy is no man’s notion of a king, if half of what Theon said of him was true. Theon is the rightful heir, unless he’s dead . . . but Victarion commands the Iron Fleet. I can’t believe he would remain at Moat Cailin while Euron Crow’s Eye holds the Seastone Chair. He has to go back.”
“There’s a daughter as well,” Galbart Glover reminded him. “The one who holds Deepwood Motte, and Robett’s wife and child.”
“If she stays at Deepwood Motte that’s all she can hope to hold,” said Robb. “What’s true for the brothers is even more true for her. She will need to sail home to oust Euron and press her own claim.” Her son turned to Lord Jason Mallister. “You have a fleet at Seagard?”
“A fleet, Your Grace? Half a dozen longships and two war galleys. Enough to defend my own shores against raiders, but I could not hope to meet the Iron Fleet in battle.”
“Nor would I ask it of you. The ironborn will be setting sail toward Pyke, I expect. Theon told me how his people think. Every captain a king on his own deck. They will all want a voice in the succession. My lord, I need two of your longships to sail around the Cape of Eagles and up the Neck to Greywater Watch.”
Lord Jason hesitated. “A dozen streams drain the wetwood, all shallow, silty, and uncharted. I would not even call them rivers. The channels are ever drifting and changing. There are endless sandbars, deadfalls, and tangles of rotting trees. And Greywater Watch moves. How are my ships to find it?”
“Go upriver flying my banner. The crannogmen will find you. I want two ships to double the chances of my message reaching Howland Reed. Lady Maege shall go on one, Galbart on the second.” He turned to the two he’d named. “You’ll carry letters for those lords of mine who remain in the north, but all the commands within will be false, in case you have the misfortune to be taken. If that happens, you must tell them that you were sailing for the north. Back to Bear Island, or for the Stony Shore.” He tapped a finger on the map. “Moat Cailin is the key. Lord Balon knew that, which is why he sent his brother Victarion there with the hard heart of the Greyjoy strength.”
“Succession squabbles or no, the ironborn are not such fools as to abandon Moat Cailin,” said Lady Maege.
“No,” Robb admitted. “Victarion will leave the best part of his garrison, I’d guess. Every man he takes will be one less man we need to fight, however. And he will take many of his captains, count on that. The leaders. He will need such men to speak for him if he hopes to sit the Seastone Chair.”
“You cannot mean to attack up the causeway, Your Grace,” said Galbart Glover. “The approaches are too narrow. There is no way to deploy. No one has ever taken the Moat.”
“From the south,” said Robb. “But if we can attack from the north and west simultaneously, and take the ironmen in the rear while they are beating off what they think is my main thrust up the causeway, then we have a chance. Once I link up with Lord Bolton and the Freys, I will have more than twelve thousand men. I mean to divide them into three battles and start up the causeway a half-day apart. If the Greyjoys have eyes south of the Neck, they will see my whole strength rushing headlong at Moat Cailin.
“Roose Bolton will have the rearguard, while I command the center. Greatjon, you shall lead the van against Moat Cailin. Your attack must be so fierce that the ironborn have no leisure to wonder if anyone is creeping down on them from the north.”
The Greatjon chuckled. “Your creepers best come fast, or my men will swarm those walls and win the Moat before you show your face. I’ll make a gift of it to you when you come dawdling up.”
“That’s a gift I should be glad to have,” said Robb.
Edmure was frowning. “You talk of attacking the ironmen in the rear, sire, but how do you mean to get north of them?”
“There are ways through the Neck that are not on any map, Uncle. Ways known only to the crannogmen—narrow trails between the bogs, and wet roads through the reeds that only boats can follow.” He turned to his two messengers. “Tell Howland Reed that he is to send guides to me, two days after I have started up the causeway. To the center battle, where my own standard flies. Three hosts will leave the Twins, but only two will reach Moat Cailin. Mine own battle will melt away into the Neck, to reemerge on the Fever. If we move swiftly once my uncle’s wed, we can all be in position by year’s end. We will fall upon the Moat from three sides on the first day of the new century, as the ironmen are waking with hammers beating at their heads from the mead they’ll quaff the night before.”
“I like this plan,” said the Greatjon. “I like it well.”
Galbart Glover rubbed his mouth. “There are risks. If the crannogmen should fail you . . .”
“We will be no worse than before. But they will not fail. My father knew the worth of Howland Reed.” Robb rolled up the map, and only then looked at Catelyn. “Mother.”
She tensed. “Do you have some part in this for me?”
“Your part is to stay safe. Our journey through the Neck will be dangerous, and naught but battle awaits us in the north. But Lord Mallister has kindly offered to keep you safe at Seagard until the war is done. You will be comfortable there, I know.”
Is this my punishment for opposing him about Jon Snow? Or for being a woman, and worse, a mother? It took her a moment to realize that they were all watching her. They had known, she realized. Catelyn should not have been surprised. She had won no friends by freeing the Kingslayer, and more than once she had heard the Greatjon say that women had no place on a battlefield.
Her anger must have blazed across her face, because Galbart Glover spoke up before she said a word. “My lady, His Grace is wise. It’s best you do not come with us.”
“Seagard will be brightened by your presence, Lady Catelyn,” said Lord Jason Mallister.
“You would make me a prisoner,” she said.
“An honored guest,” Lord Jason insisted.
Catelyn turned to her son. “I mean no offense to Lord Jason,” she said stiffly, “but if I cannot continue on with you, I would sooner return to Riverrun.”
“I left my wife at Riverrun. I want my mother elsewhere. If you keep all your treasures in one purse, you only make it easier for those who would rob you. After the wedding, you shall go to Seagard, that is my royal command.” Robb stood, and as quick as that, her fate was settled. He picked up a sheet of parchment. “One more matter. Lord Balon has left chaos in his wake, we hope. I would not do the same. Yet I have no son as yet, my brothers Bran and Rickon are dead, and my sister is wed to a Lannister. I’ve thought long and hard about who might follow me. I command you now as my true and loyal lords to fix your seals to this document as witnesses to my decision.”
A king indeed, Catelyn thought, defeated. She could only hope that the trap he’d planned for Moat Cailin worked as well as the one in which he’d just caught her.

They heard the Green Fork before they saw it, an endless susurrus, like the growl of some great beast. The river was a boiling torrent, half again as wide as it had been last year, when Robb had divided his army here and vowed to take a Frey to bride as the price of his crossing. He needed Lord Walder and his bridge then, and he needs them even more now. Catelyn’s heart was full of misgivings as she watched the murky green waters swirl past. There is no way we will ford this, nor swim across, and it could be a moon’s turn before these waters fall again.
As they neared the Twins, Robb donned his crown and summoned Catelyn and Edmure to ride beside him. Ser Raynald Westerling bore his banner, the direwolf of Stark on its ice-white field.
The gatehouse towers emerged from the rain like ghosts, hazy grey apparitions that grew more solid the closer they rode. The Frey stronghold was not one castle but two; mirror images in wet stone standing on opposite sides of the water, linked by a great arched bridge. From the center of its span rose the Water Tower, the river running straight and swift below. Channels had been cut from the banks, to form moats that made each twin an island. The rains had turned the moats to shallow lakes.
Across the turbulent waters, Catelyn could see several thousand men encamped around the eastern castle, their banners hanging like so many drowned cats from the lances outside their tents. The rain made it impossible to distinguish colors and devices. Most were grey, it seemed to her, though beneath such skies the whole world seemed grey.
“Tread lightly here, Robb,” she cautioned her son. “Lord Walder has a thin skin and a sharp tongue, and some of these sons of his will doubtless take after their father. You must not let yourself be provoked.”
“I know the Freys, Mother. I know how much I wronged them, and how much I need them. I shall be as sweet as a septon.”
Catelyn shifted her seat uncomfortably. “If we are offered refreshment when we arrive, on no account refuse. Take what is offered, and eat and drink where all can see. If nothing is offered, ask for bread and cheese and a cup of wine.”
“I’m more wet than hungry . . .”
“Robb, listen to me. Once you have eaten of his bread and salt, you have the guest right, and the laws of hospitality protect you beneath his roof.”
Robb looked more amused than afraid. “I have an army to protect me, Mother, I don’t need to trust in bread and salt. But if it pleases Lord Walder to serve me stewed crow smothered in maggots, I’ll eat it and ask for a second bowl.”
Four Freys rode out from the western gatehouse, wrapped in heavy cloaks of thick grey wool. Catelyn recognized Ser Ryman, son of the late Ser Stevron, Lord Walder’s firstborn. With his father dead, Ryman was heir to the Twins. The face she saw beneath his hood was fleshy, broad, and stupid. The other three were likely his own sons, Lord Walder’s great grandsons.
Edmure confirmed as much. “Edwyn is eldest, the pale slender man with the constipated look. The wiry one with the beard is Black Walder, a nasty bit of business. Petyr is on the bay, the lad with the unfortunate face. Petyr Pimple, his brothers call him. Only a year or two older than Robb, but Lord Walder married him off at ten to a woman thrice his age. Gods, I hope Roslin doesn’t take after him.”
They halted to let their hosts come to them. Robb’s banner drooped on its staff, and the steady sound of rainfall mingled with the rush of the swollen Green Fork on their right. Grey Wind edged forward, tail stiff, watching through slitted eyes of dark gold. When the Freys were a half-dozen yards away Catelyn heard him growl, a deep rumble that seemed almost one with rush of the river. Robb looked startled. “Grey Wind, to me. To me!”
Instead the direwolf leapt forward, snarling.
Ser Ryman’s palfrey shied off with a whinny of fear, and Petyr Pimple’s reared and threw him. Only Black Walder kept his mount in hand. He reached for the hilt of his sword. “No!” Robb was shouting. “Grey Wind, here. Here.” Catelyn spurred between the direwolf and the horses. Mud spattered from the hooves of her mare as she cut in front of Grey Wind. The wolf veered away, and only then seemed to hear Robb calling.
“Is this how a Stark makes amends?” Black Walder shouted, with naked steel in hand. “A poor greeting I call it, to set your wolf upon us. Is this why you’ve come?”
Ser Ryman had dismounted to help Petyr Pimple back to his feet. The lad was muddy, but unhurt.
“I’ve come to make my apology for the wrong I did your House, and to see my uncle wed.” Robb swung down from the saddle. “Petyr, take my horse. Yours is almost back to the stable.”
Petyr looked to his father and said, “I can ride behind one of my brothers.”
The Freys made no sign of obeisance. “You come late,” Ser Ryman declared.
“The rains delayed us,” said Robb. “I sent a bird.”
“I do not see the woman.”
By the woman Ser Ryman meant Jeyne Westerling, all knew. Lady Catelyn smiled apologetically. “Queen Jeyne was weary after so much travel, sers. No doubt she will be pleased to visit when times are more settled.”
“My grandfather will be displeased.” Though Black Walder had sheathed his sword, his tone was no friendlier. “I’ve told him much of the lady, and he wished to behold her with his own eyes.”
Edwyn cleared his throat. “We have chambers prepared for you in the Water Tower, Your Grace,” he told Robb with careful courtesy, “as well as for Lord Tully and Lady Stark. Your lords bannermen are also welcome to shelter under our roof and partake of the wedding feast.”
“And my men?” asked Robb.
“My lord grandfather regrets that he cannot feed nor house so large a host. We have been sore pressed to find fodder and provender for our own levies. Nonetheless, your men shall not be neglected. If they will cross and set up their camp beside our own, we will bring out enough casks of wine and ale for all to drink the health of Lord Edmure and his bride. We have thrown up three great feast tents on the far bank, to provide them with some shelter from the rains.”
“Your lord father is most kind. My men will thank him. They have had a long wet ride.”
Edmure Tully edged his horse forward. “When shall I meet my betrothed?”
“She waits for you within,” promised Edwyn Frey. “You will forgive her if she seems shy, I know. She has been awaiting this day most anxiously, poor maid. But perhaps we might continue this out of the rain?”
“Truly.” Ser Ryman mounted up again, pulling Petyr Pimple up behind him. “If you would follow me, my father awaits.” He turned the palfrey’s head back towrd the Twins.
Edmure fell in beside Catelyn. “The Late Lord Frey might have seen fit to welcome us in person,” he complained. “I am his liege lord as well as his son-to-be, and Robb’s his king.”
“When you are one-and-ninety, Brother, see how eager you are to go riding in the rain.” Yet she wondered if that was the whole truth of it. Lord Walder normally went about in a covered litter, which would have kept the worst of the rain off him. A deliberate slight? If so, it might be the first of many yet to come.
There was more trouble at the gatehouse. Grey Wind balked in the middle of the drawbridge, shook the rain off, and howled at the portcullis. Robb whistled impatiently. “Grey Wind. What is it? Grey Wind, with me.” But the direwolf only bared his teeth. He does not like this place, Catelyn thought. Robb had to squat and speak softly to the wolf before he would consent to pass beneath the portcullis. By then Lame Lothar and Walder Rivers had come up. “It’s the sound of the water he fears,” Rivers said. “Beasts know to avoid the river in flood.”
“A dry kennel and a leg of mutton will see him right again,” said Lothar cheerfully. “Shall I summon our master of hounds?”
“He’s a direwolf, not a dog,” said Robb, “and dangerous to men he does not trust. Ser Raynald, stay with him. I won’t take him into Lord Walder’s hall like this.”
Deftly done, Catelyn decided. Robb keeps the Westerling out of Lord Walder’s sight as well.
Gout and brittle bones had taken their toll of old Walder Frey. They found him propped up in his high seat with a cushion beneath him and an ermine robe across his lap. His chair was black oak, its back carved into the semblance of two stout towers joined by an arched bridge, so massive that its embrace turned the old man into a grotesque child. There was something of the vulture about Lord Walder, and rather more of the weasel. His bald head, spotted with age, thrust out from his scrawny shoulders on a long pink neck. Loose skin dangled beneath his receding chin, his eyes were runny and clouded, and his toothless mouth moved constantly, sucking at the empty air as a babe sucks at his mother’s breast.
The eighth Lady Frey stood beside Lord Walder’s high seat. At his feet sat a somewhat younger version of himself, a stooped thin man of fifty whose costly garb of blue wool and grey satin was strangely accented by a crown and collar ornamented with tiny brass bells. The likeness between him and his lord was striking, save for their eyes; Lord Frey’s small, dim, and suspicious, the other’s large, amiable, and vacant. Catelyn recalled that one of Lord Walder’s brood had fathered a halfwit long years ago. During past visits, the Lord of the Crossing had always taken care to hide this one away. Did he always wear a fool’s crown, or is that meant as mockery of Robb? It was a question she dare not ask.
Frey sons, daughters, children, grandchildren, husbands, wives and servants crowded the rest of the hall. But it was the old man who spoke. “You will forgive me if I do not kneel, I know. My legs no longer work as they did, though that which hangs between ’em serves well enough, heh.” His mouth split in a toothless smile as he eyed Robb’s crown. “Some would say it’s a poor king who crowns himself with bronze, Your Grace.”
“Bronze and iron are stronger than gold and silver,” Robb answered. “The old Kings of Winter wore such a sword-crown.”
“Small good it did them when the dragons came. Heh.” That heh seemed to please the lackwit, who bobbed his head from side to side, jingling crown and collar. “Sire,” Lord Walder said, “forgive my Aegon the noise. He has less wits than a crannogman, and he’s never met a king before. One of Stevron’s boys. We call him Jinglebell.”
“Ser Stevron mentioned him, my lord.” Robb smiled at the lackwit. “Well met, Aegon. Your father was a brave man.”
Jinglebell jingled his bells. A thin line of spit ran from one corner of his mouth when he smiled.
“Save your royal breath. You’d do as well talking to a chamberpot.” Lord Walder shifted his gaze to the others. “Well, Lady Catelyn, I see you have returned to us. And young Ser Edmure, the victor of the Stone Mill. Lord Tully now, I’ll need to remember that. You’re the fifth Lord Tully I’ve known. I outlived the other four, heh. Your bride’s about here somewhere. I suppose you want a look at her.”
“I would, my lord.”
“Then you’ll have it. But clothed. She’s a modest girl, and a maid. You won’t see her naked till the bedding.” Lord Walder cackled. “Heh. Soon enough, soon enough.” He craned his head about. “Benfrey, go fetch your sister. Be quick about it, Lord Tully’s come all the way from Riverrun.” A young knight in a quartered surcoat bowed and took his leave, and the old man turned back to Robb. “And where’s your bride, Your Grace? The fair Queen Jeyne. A Westerling of the Crag, I’m told, heh.”
“I left her at Riverrun, my lord. She was too weary for more travel, as we told Ser Ryman.”
“That makes me grievous sad. I wanted to behold her with mine own weak eyes. We all did, heh. Isn’t that so, my lady?”
Pale wispy Lady Frey seemed startled that she would be called upon to speak. “Y-yes, my lord. We all so wanted to pay homage to Queen Jeyne. She must be fair to look on.”
“She is most fair, my lady.” There was an icy stillness in Robb’s voice that reminded Catelyn of his father.
The old man either did not hear it or refused to pay it any heed. “Fairer than my own get, heh? Elsewise how could her face and form have made the King’s Grace forget his solemn promise.”
Robb suffered the rebuke with dignity. “No words can set that right, I know, but I have come to make my apologies for the wrong I did your House, and to beg for your forgiveness, my lord.”
“Apologies, heh. Yes, you vowed to make one, I recall. I’m old, but I don’t forget such things. Not like some kings, it seems. The young remember nothing when they see a pretty face and a nice firm pair of teats, isn’t that so? I was the same. Some might say I still am, heh heh. They’d be wrong, though, wrong as you were. But now you’re here to make amends. It was my girls you spurned, though. Mayhaps it’s them should hear you beg for pardon, Your Grace. My maiden girls. Here, have a look at them.” When he waggled his fingers, a flurry of femininity left their places by the walls to line up beneath the dais. Jinglebell started to rise as well, his bells ringing merrily, but Lady Frey grabbed the lackwit’s sleeve and tugged him back down.
Lord Walder named the names. “My daughter Arwyn,” he said of a girl of fourteen. “Shirei, my youngest trueborn daughter. Ami and Marianne are granddaughters. I married Ami to Ser Pate of Sevenstreams, but the Mountain killed the oaf so I got her back. That’s a Cersei, but we call her Little Bee, her mother’s a Beesbury. More granddaughters. One’s a Walda, and the others . . . well, they have names, whatever they are . . .”
“I’m Merry, Lord Grandfather,” one girl said.
“You’re noisy, that’s for certain. Next to Noisy is my daughter Tyta. Then another Walda. Alyx, Marissa . . . are you Marissa? I thought you were. She’s not always bald. The maester shaved her hair off, but he swears it will soon grow back. The twins are Serra and Sarra.” He squinted down at one of the younger girls. “Heh, are you another Walda?”
The girl could not have been more than four. “I’m Ser Aemon Rivers’s Walda, lord great grandfather.” She curtsied.
“How long have you been talking? Not that you’re like to have anything sensible to say, your father never did. He’s a bastard’s son besides, heh. Go away, I wanted only Freys up here. The King in the North has no interest in base stock.” Lord Walder glanced to Robb, as Jinglebell bobbed his head and chimed. “There they are, all maidens. Well, and one widow, but there’s some who like a woman broken in. You might have had any one of them.”
“It would have been an impossible choice, my lord,” said Robb with careful courtesy. “They’re all too lovely.”
Lord Walder snorted. “And they say my eyes are bad. Some will do well enough, I suppose. Others . . . well, it makes no matter. They weren’t good enough for the King in the North, heh. Now what is it you have to say?”
“My ladies.” Robb looked desperately uncomfortable, but he had known this moment must come, and he faced it without flinching. “All men should keep their word, kings most of all. I was pledged to marry one of you and I broke that vow. The fault is not in you. What I did was not done to slight you, but because I loved another. No words can set it right, I know, yet I come before you to ask forgiveness, that the Freys of the Crossing and the Starks of Winterfell may once again be friends.”
The smaller girls fidgeted anxiously. Their older sisters waited for Lord Walder on his black oak throne. Jinglebell rocked back and forth, bells chiming on collar and crown.
“Good,” the Lord of the Crossing said. “That was very good, Your Grace. ‘No words can set it right,’ heh. Well said, well said. At the wedding feast I hope you will not refuse to dance with my daughters. It would please an old man’s heart, heh.” He bobbed his wrinkled pink head up and down, in much the same way his lackwit grandson did, though Lord Walder wore no bells. “And here she is, Lord Edmure. My daughter Roslin, my most precious little blossom, heh.”
Ser Benfrey led her into the hall. They looked enough alike to be full siblings. Judging from their age, both were children of the sixth Lady Frey; a Rosby, Catelyn seemed to recall.
Roslin was small for her years, her skin as white as if she had just risen from a milk bath. Her face was comely, with a small chin, delicate nose, and big brown eyes. Thick chestnut hair fell in loose waves to a waist so tiny that Edmure would be able to put his hands around it. Beneath the lacy bodice of her pale blue gown, her breasts looked small but shapely.
“Your Grace.” The girl went to her knees. “Lord Edmure, I hope I am not a disappointment to you.”
Far from it, thought Catelyn. Her brother’s face had lit up at the sight of her. “You are a delight to me, my lady,” Edmure said. “And ever will be, I know.”
Roslin had a small gap between two of her front teeth that made her shy with her smiles, but the flaw was almost endearing. Pretty enough, Catelyn thought, but so small, and she comes of Rosby stock. The Rosbys had never been robust. She much preferred the frames of some of the older girls in the hall; daughters or granddaughters, she could not be sure. They had a Crakehall look about them, and Lord Walder’s third wife had been of that House. Wide hips to bear children, big breasts to nurse them, strong arms to carry them. The Crakehalls have always been a big-boned family, and strong.
“My lord is kind,” the Lady Roslin said to Edmure.
“My lady is beautiful.” Edmure took her hand and drew her to her feet. “But why are you crying?”
“For joy,” Roslin said. “I weep for joy, my lord.”
“Enough,” Lord Walder broke in. “You may weep and whisper after you’re wed, heh. Benfrey, see your sister back to her chambers, she has a wedding to prepare for. And a bedding, heh, the sweetest part. For all, for all.” His mouth moved in and out. “We’ll have music, such sweet music, and wine, heh, the red will run, and we’ll put some wrongs aright. But now you’re weary, and wet as well, dripping on my floor. There’s fires waiting for you, and hot mulled wine, and baths if you want ’em. Lothar, show our guests to their quarters.”
“I need to see my men across the river, my lord,” Robb said.
“They shan’t get lost,” Lord Walder complained. “They’re crossed before, haven’t they? When you came down from the north. You wanted crossing and I gave it to you, and you never said mayhaps, heh. But suit yourself. Lead each man across by the hand if you like, it’s naught to me.”
“My lord!” Catelyn had almost forgotten. “Some food would be most welcome. We have ridden many leagues in the rain.”
Walder Frey’s mouth moved in and out. “Food, heh. A loaf of bread, a bite of cheese, mayhaps a sausage.”
“Some wine to wash it down,” Robb said. “And salt.”
“Bread and salt. Heh. Of course, of course.” The old man clapped his hands together, and servants came into the hall, bearing flagons of wine and trays of bread, cheese, and butter. Lord Walder took a cup of red himself, and raised it high with a spotted hand. “My guests,” he said. “My honored guests. Be welcome beneath my roof, and at my table.”
“We thank you for your hospitality, my lord,” Robb replied. Edmure echoed him, along with the Greatjon, Ser Marq Piper, and the others. They drank his wine and ate his bread and butter. Catelyn tasted the wine and nibbled at some bread, and felt much the better for it. Now we should be safe, she thought.
Knowing how petty the old man could be, she had expected their rooms to be bleak and cheerless. But the Freys had made more than ample provision for them, it seemed. The bridal chamber was large and richly appointed, dominated by a great featherbed with corner posts carved in the likeness of castle towers. Its draperies were Tully red and blue, a nice courtesy. Sweet-smelling carpets covered a plank floor, and a tall shuttered window opened to the south. Catelyn’s own room was smaller, but handsomely furnished and comfortable, with a fire burning in the hearth. Lame Lothar assured them that Robb would have an entire suite, as befit a king. “If there is anything you require, you need only tell one of the guards.” He bowed and withdrew, limping heavily as he made his way down the curving steps.
“We should post our own guards,” Catelyn told her brother. She would rest easier with Stark and Tully men outside her door. The audience with Lord Walder had not been as painful as she feared, yet all the same she would be glad to be done with this. A few more days, and Robb will be off to battle, and me to a comfortable captivity at Seagard. Lord Jason would show her every courtesy, she had no doubt, but the prospect still depressed her.
She could hear the sounds of horses below as the long column of mounted men wound their way across the bridge from castle to castle. The stones rumbled to the passage of heavy-laden wayns. Catelyn went to the window and gazed out, to watch Robb’s host emerge from the eastern twin. “The rain seems to be lessening.”
“Now that we’re inside.” Edmure stood before the fire, letting the warmth wash over him. “What did you make of Roslin?”
Too small and delicate. Childbirth will go hard on her. But her brother seemed well pleased with the girl, so all she said was, “Sweet.”
“I believe she liked me. Why was she crying?”
“She’s a maid on the eve of her wedding. A few tears are to be expected.” Lysa had wept lakes the morning of their own wedding, though she had managed to be dry-eyed and radiant when Jon Arryn swept his cream-and-blue cloak about her shoulders.
“She’s prettier than I dared hope.” Edmure raised a hand before she could speak. “I know there are more important things, spare me the sermon, septa. Even so . . . did you see some of those other maids Frey trotted out? The one with the twitch? Was that the shaking sickness? And those twins had more craters and eruptions on their faces than Petyr Pimple. When I saw that lot, I knew Roslin would be bald and one-eyed, with Jinglebell’s wits and Black Walder’s temper. But she seems gentle as well as fair.” He looked perplexed. “Why would the old weasel refuse to let me choose unless he meant to foist off someone hideous?”
“Your fondness for a pretty face is well known,” Catelyn reminded him. “Perhaps Lord Walder actually wants you to be happy with your bride.” Or more like, he did not want you balking over a boil and upsetting all his plans. “Or it may be that Roslin is the old man’s favorite. The Lord of Riverrun is a much better match than most of his daughters can hope for.”
“True.” Her brother still seemed uncertain, however. “Is it possible the girl is barren?”
“Lord Walder wants his grandson to inherit Riverrun. How would it serve him to give you a barren wife?”
“It rids him of a daughter no one else would take.”
“Small good that will do him. Walder Frey is a peevish man, not a stupid one.”
“Still . . . it is possible?”
“Yes,” Catelyn conceded, reluctantly. “There are illnesses a girl can have in childhood that leave her unable to conceive. There’s no reason to believe that Lady Roslin was so afflicted, though.” She looked round the room. “The Freys have received us more kindly than I had anticipated, if truth be told.”
Edmure laughed. “A few barbed words and some unseemly gloating. From him that’s courtesy. I expected the old weasel to piss in our wine and make us praise the vintage.”
The jest left Catelyn strangely disquieted. “If you will excuse me, I should change from these wet clothes.
“As you wish.” Edmure yawned. “I may nap an hour.”
She retreated to her own room. The chest of clothes she’d brought from Riverrun had been carried up and laid at the foot of the bed. After she’d undressed and hung her wet clothing by the fire, she donned a warm wool dress of Tully red and blue, washed and brushed her hair and let it dry, and went in search of Freys.
Lord Walder’s black oak throne was empty when she entered the hall, but some of his sons were drinking by the fire. Lame Lothar rose clumsily when he saw her. “Lady Catelyn, I thought you would be resting. How may I be of service?”
“Are these your brothers?” she asked.
“Brothers, half-brothers, good brothers, and nephews. Raymund and I shared a mother. Lord Lucias Vypren is my half-sister Lythene’s husband, and Ser Damon is their son. My half-brother Ser Hosteen I believe you know. And this is Ser Leslyn Haigh and his sons, Ser Harys and Ser Donnel.”
“Well met, sers. Is Ser Perwyn about? He helped escort me to Storm’s End and back, when Robb sent me to speak with Lord Renly. I was looking forward to seeing him again.”
“Perwyn is away,” Lame Lothar said. “I shall give him your regards. I know he will regret having missed you.”
“Surely he will return in time for Lady Roslin’s wedding?”
“He had hoped to,” said Lame Lothar, “but with this rain . . . you saw how the rivers ran, my lady.”
“I did indeed,” said Catelyn. “I wonder if you would be so good as to direct me to your maester?”
“Are you unwell, my lady?” asked Ser Hosteen, a powerful man with a square strong jaw.
“A woman’s complaint. Nothing to concern you, ser.”
Lothar, ever gracious, escorted her from the hall, up some steps, and across a covered bridge to another stair. “You should find Maester Brenett in the turret on the top, my lady.”
Catelyn half expected that the maester would be yet another son of Walder Frey’s, but Brenett did not have the look. He was a great fat man, bald and double-chinned and none too clean, to judge from the raven droppings that stained the sleeves of his robes, yet he seemed amiable enough. When she told him of Edmure’s concerns about Lady Roslin’s fertility, he chuckled. “Your lord brother need have no fear, Lady Catelyn. She’s small, I’ll grant you, and narrow in the hips, but her mother was the same, and Lady Bethany gave Lord Walder a child every year.”
“How many lived past infancy?” she asked bluntly.
“Five.” He ticked them off on fingers plump as sausages. “Ser Perwyn. Ser Benfrey. Maester Willamen, who took his vows last year and now serves Lord Hunter in the Vale. Olyvar, who squired for your son. And Lady Roslin, the youngest. Four boys to one girl. Lord Edmure will have more sons than he knows what to do with.”
“I am sure that will please him.” So the girl was like to be fertile as well as fair of face. That should put Edmure’s mind at ease. Lord Walder had left her brother no cause for complaint, so far as she could see.
Catelyn did not return to her own room after leaving the maester; instead she went to Robb. She found Robin Flint and Ser Wendel Manderly with him, along with the Greatjon and his son, who was still called the Smalljon though he threatened to overtop his father. They were all damp. Another man, still wetter, stood before the fire in a pale pink cloak trimmed with white fur. “Lord Bolton,” she said.
“Lady Catelyn,” he replied, his voice faint, “it is a pleasure to look on you again, even in such trying times.”
“You are kind to say so.” Catelyn could feel gloom in the room. Even the Greatjon seemed somber and subdued. She looked at their grim faces and said, “What’s happened?”
“Lannisters on the Trident,” said Ser Wendel unhappily. “My brother is taken again.”
“And Lord Bolton has brought us further word of Winterfell,” Robb added. “Ser Rodrik was not the only good man to die. Cley Cerwyn and Leobald Tallhart were slain as well.”
“Cley Cerwyn was only a boy,” she said, saddened. “Is this true, then? All dead, and Winterfell gone?”
Bolton’s pale eyes met her own. “The ironmen burned both castle and winter town. Some of your people were taken back to the Dreadfort by my son, Ramsay.”
“Your bastard was accused of grievous crimes,” Catelyn reminded him sharply. “Of murder, rape, and worse.”
“Yes,” Roose Bolton said. “His blood is tainted, that cannot be denied. Yet he is a good fighter, as cunning as he is fearless. When the ironmen cut down Ser Rodrik, and Leobald Tallhart soon after, it fell to Ramsay to lead the battle, and he did. He swears that he shall not sheathe his sword so long as a single Greyjoy remains in the north. Perhaps such service might atone in some small measure for whatever crimes his bastard blood has led him to commit.” He shrugged. “Or not. When the war is done, His Grace must weigh and judge. By then I hope to have a trueborn son by Lady Walda.”
This is a cold man, Catelyn realized, not for the first time.
“Did Ramsay mention Theon Greyjoy?” Robb demanded. “Was he slain as well, or did he flee?”
Roose Bolton removed a ragged strip of leather from the pouch at his belt. “My son sent this with his letter.”
Ser Wendel turned his fat face away. Robin Flint and Smalljon Umber exchanged a look, and the Greatjon snorted like a bull. “Is that . . . skin?” said Robb.
“The skin from the little finger of Theon Greyjoy’s left hand. My son is cruel, I confess it. And yet . . . what is a little skin, against the lives of two young princes? You were their mother, my lady. May I offer you this . . . small token of revenge?”
Part of Catelyn wanted to clutch the grisly trophy to her heart, but she made herself resist. “Put it away. Please.”
“Flaying Theon will not bring my brothers back,” Robb said. “I want his head, not his skin.”
“He is Balon Greyjoy’s only living son,” Lord Bolton said softly, as if they had forgotten, “and now rightful King of the Iron Islands. A captive king has great value as a hostage.”
“Hostage?” The word raised Catelyn’s hackles. Hostages were oft exchanged. “Lord Bolton, I hope you are not suggesting that we free the man who killed my sons.”
“Whoever wins the Seastone Chair will want Theon Greyjoy dead,” Bolton pointed out. “Even in chains, he has a better claim than any of his uncles. Hold him, I say, and demand concessions from the ironborn as the price of his execution.”
Robb considered that reluctantly, but in the end he nodded. “Yes. Very well. Keep him alive, then. For the present. Hold him secure at the Dreadfort till we’ve retaken the north.”
Catelyn turned back to Roose Bolton. “Ser Wendel said something of Lannisters on the Trident?”
“He did, my lady. I blame myself. I delayed too long before leaving Harrenhal. Aenys Frey departed several days before me and crossed the Trident at the ruby ford, though not without difficulty. But by the time we came up the river was a torrent. I had no choice but to ferry my men across in small boats, of which we had too few. Two-thirds of my strength was on the north side when the Lannisters attacked those still waiting to cross. Norrey, Locke, and Burley men chiefly, with Ser Wylis Manderly and his White Harbor knights as rear guard. I was on the wrong side of the Trident, powerless to help them. Ser Wylis rallied our men as best he could, but Gregor Clegane attacked with heavy horse and drove them into the river. As many drowned as were cut down. More fled, and the rest were taken captive.”
Gregor Clegane was always ill news, Catelyn reflected. Would Robb need to march south again to deal with him? Or was the Mountain coming here? “Is Clegane across the river, then?”
“No.” Bolton’s voice was soft, but certain. “I left six hundred men at the ford. Spearmen from the rills, the mountains, and the White Knife, a hundred Hornwood longbows, some freeriders and hedge knights, and a strong force of Stout and Cerwyn men to stiffen them. Ronnel Stout and Ser Kyle Condon have the command. Ser Kyle was the late Lord Cerwyn’s right hand, as I’m sure you know; my lady. Lions swim no better than wolves. So long as the river runs high, Ser Gregor will not cross.”
“The last thing we need is the Mountain at our backs when we start up the causeway,” said Robb. “You did well, my lord.”
“Your Grace is too kind. I suffered grievous losses on the Green Fork, and Glover and Tallhart worse at Duskendale.”
“Duskendale.” Robb made the word a curse. “Robett Glover will answer for that when I see him, I promise you.”
“A folly,” Lord Bolton agreed, “but Glover was heedless after he learned that Deepwood Motte had fallen. Grief and fear will do that to a man.”
Duskendale was done and cold; it was the battles still to come that worried Catelyn. “How many men have you brought my son?” she asked Roose Bolton pointedly.
His queer colorless eyes studied her face a moment before he answered. “Some five hundred horse and three thousand foot, my lady. Dreadfort men, in chief, and some from Karhold. With the loyalty of the Karstarks so doubtful now, I thought it best to keep them close. I regret there are not more.”
“It should be enough,” said Robb. “You will have command of my rear guard, Lord Bolton. I mean to start for the Neck as soon as my uncle has been wedded and bedded. We’re going home.”

The drums were pounding, pounding, pounding, and her head with them. Pipes wailed and flutes trilled from the musicians’ gallery at the foot of the hall; fiddles screeched, horns blew, the skins skirled a lively tune, but the drumming drove them all. The sounds echoed off the rafters, whilst the guests ate, drank, and shouted at one another below. Walder Frey must be deaf as a stone to call this music. Catelyn sipped a cup of wine and watched Jinglebell prance to the sounds of “Alysanne.” At least she thought it was meant to be “Alysanne.” With these players, it might as easily have been “The Bear and the Maiden Fair.”
Outside the rain still fell, but within the Twins the air was thick and hot. A fire roared in the hearth and rows of torches burned smokily from iron sconces on the walls. Yet most of the heat came off the bodies of the wedding guests, jammed in so thick along the benches that every man who tried to lift his cup poked his neighbor in the ribs.
Even on the dais they were closer than Catelyn would have liked. She had been placed between Ser Ryman Frey and Roose Bolton, and had gotten a good noseful of both. Ser Ryman drank as if Westeros was about to run short of wine, and sweated it all out under his arms. He had bathed in lemonwater, she judged, but no lemon could mask so much sour sweat. Roose Bolton had a sweeter smell to him, yet no more pleasant. He sipped hippocras in preference to wine or mead, and ate but little.
Catelyn could not fault him for his lack of appetite. The wedding feast began with a thin leek soup, followed by a salad of green beans, onions, and beets, river pike poached in almond milk, mounds of mashed turnips that were cold before they reached the table, jellied calves’ brains, and a leche of stringy beef. It was poor fare to set before a king, and the calves’ brains turned Catelyn’s stomach. Yet Robb ate it uncomplaining, and her brother was too caught up with his bride to pay much attention.
You would never guess Edmure complained of Roslin all the way from Riverrun to the Twins. Husband and wife ate from a single plate, drank from a single cup, and exchanged chaste kisses between sips. Most of the dishes Edmure waved away. She could not blame him for that. She remembered little of the food served at her own wedding feast. Did I even taste it? Or spend the whole time gazing at Ned’s face, wondering who he was?
Poor Roslin’s smile had a fixed quality to it, as if someone had sewn it onto her face. Well, she is a maid wedded, but the bedding’s yet to come. No doubt she’s as terrified as I was. Robb was seated between Alyx Frey and Fair Walda, two of the more nubile Frey maidens. “At the wedding feast I hope you will not refuse to dance with my daughters,” Walder Frey had said. “It would please an old man’s heart.” His heart should be well pleased, then; Robb had done his duty like a king. He had danced with each of the girls, with Edmure’s bride and the eighth Lady Frey, with the widow Ami and Roose Bolton’s wife Fat Walda, with the pimply twins Serra and Sarra, even with Shirei, Lord Walder’s youngest, who must have been all of six. Catelyn wondered whether the Lord of the Crossing would be satisfied, or if he would find cause for complaint in all the other daughters and granddaughters who had not had a turn with the king. “Your sisters dance very well,” she said to Ser Ryman Frey, trying to be pleasant.
“They’re aunts and cousins.” Ser Ryman drank a swallow of wine, the sweat trickling down his cheek into his beard.
A sour man, and in his cups, Catelyn thought. The Late Lord Frey might be niggardly when it came to feeding his guests, but he did not stint on the drink. The ale, wine, and mead were flowing as fast as the river outside. The Greatjon was already roaring drunk. Lord Walder’s son Merrett was matching him cup for cup, but Ser Whalen Frey had passed out trying to keep up with the two of them. Catelyn would sooner Lord Umber had seen fit to stay sober, but telling the Greatjon not to drink was like telling him not to breathe for a few hours.
Smalljon Umber and Robin Flint sat near Robb, to the other side of Fair Walda and Alyx, respectively. Neither of them was drinking; along with Patrek Mallister and Dacey Mormont, they were her son’s guards this evening. A wedding feast was not a battle, but there were always dangers when men were in their cups, and a king should never be unguarded. Catelyn was glad of that, and even more glad of the swordbelts hanging on pegs along the walls. No man needs a longsword to deal with jellied calves’ brains.
“Everyone thought my lord would choose Fair Walda,” Lady Walda Bolton told Ser Wendel, shouting to be heard above the music. Fat Walda was a round pink butterball of a girl with watery blue eyes, limp yellow hair, and a huge bosom, yet her voice was a fluttering squeak. It was hard to picture her in the Dreadfort in her pink lace and cape of vair. “My lord grandfather offered Roose his bride’s weight in silver as a dowry, though, so my lord of Bolton picked me.” The girl’s chins jiggled when she laughed. “I weigh six stone more than Fair Walda, but that was the first time I was glad of it. I’m Lady Bolton now and my cousin’s still a maid, and she’ll be nineteen soon, poor thing.”
The Lord of the Dreadfort paid the chatter no mind, Catelyn saw. Sometimes he tasted a bite of this, a spoon of that, tearing bread from the loaf with short strong fingers, but the meal could not distract him. Bolton had made a toast to Lord Walder’s grandsons when the wedding feast began, pointedly mentioning that Walder and Walder were in the care of his bastard son. From the way the old man had squinted at him, his mouth sucking at the air, Catelyn knew he had heard the unspoken threat.
Was there ever a wedding less joyful? she wondered, until she remembered her poor Sansa and her marriage to the Imp. Mother take mercy on her. She has a gentle soul. The heat and smoke and noise were making her sick. The musicians in the gallery might be numerous and loud, but they were not especially gifted. Catelyn took another swallow of wine and allowed a page to refill her cup. A few more hours, and the worst will be over. By this hour tomorrow Robb would be off to another battle, this time with the ironmen at Moat Cailin. Strange, how that prospect seemed almost a relief. He will win his battle. He wins all his battles, and the ironborn are without a king. Besides, Ned taught him well. The drums were pounding. Jinglebell hopped past her once again, but the music was so loud she could scarcely hear his bells.
Above the din came a sudden snarling as two dogs fell upon each other over a scrap of meat. They rolled across the floor, snapping and biting, as a howl of mirth went up. Someone doused them with a flagon of ale and they broke apart. One limped toward the dais. Lord Walder’s toothless mouth opened in a bark of laughter as the dripping wet dog shook ale and hair all over three of his grandsons.
The sight of the dogs made Catelyn wish once more for Grey Wind, but Robb’s direwolf was nowhere to be seen. Lord Walder had refused to allow him in the hall. “Your wild beast has a taste for human flesh, I hear, heh,” the old man had said. “Rips out throats, yes. I’ll have no such creature at my Roslin’s feast, amongst women and little ones, all my sweet innocents.”
“Grey Wind is no danger to them, my lord,” Robb protested. “Not so long as I am there.”
“You were there at my gates, were you not? When the wolf attacked the grandsons I sent to greet you? I heard all about that, don’t think I didn’t, heh.”
“No harm was done—”
“No harm, the king says? No harm? Petyr fell from his horse, fell. I lost a wife the same way, falling.” His mouth worked in and out. “Or was she just some strumpet? Bastard Walder’s mother, yes, now I recall. She fell off her horse and cracked her head. What would Your Grace do if Petyr had broken his neck, heh? Give me another apology in place of a grandson? No, no, no. Might be you’re king, I won’t say you’re not, the King in the North, heh, but under my roof, my rule. Have your wolf or have your wedding, sire. You’ll not have both.”
Catelyn could tell that her son was furious, but he yielded with as much courtesy as he could summon. If it pleases Lord Walder to serve me stewed crow smothered in maggots, he’d told her, I’ll eat it and ask for a second bowl. And so he had.
The Greatjon had drunk another of Lord Walder’s brood under the table, Petyr Pimple this time. The lad has a third his capacity, what did he expect? Lord Umber wiped his mouth, stood, and began to sing. “A bear there was, a bear, a BEAR! All black and brown and covered with hair!” His voice was not at all bad, though somewhat thick from drink. Unfortunately the fiddlers and drummers and flutists up above were playing “Flowers of Spring,” which suited the words of “The Bear and the Maiden Fair” as well as snails might suit a bowl of porridge. Even poor Jinglebell covered his ears at the cacophony.
Roose Bolton murmured some words too soft to hear and went off in search of a privy. The cramped hall was in a constant uproar of guests and servants coming and going. A second feast, for knights and lords of somewhat lesser rank, was roaring along in the other castle, she knew. Lord Walder had exiled his baseborn children and their offspring to that side of the river, so that Robb’s northmen had taken to referring to it as “the bastard feast.” Some guests were no doubt stealing off to see if the bastards were having a better time than they were. Some might even be venturing as far as the camps. The Freys had provided wagons of wine, ale, and mead, so the common soldiers could drink to the wedding of Riverrun and the Twins.
Robb sat down in Bolton’s vacant place. “A few more hours and this farce is done, Mother,” he said in a low voice, as the Greatjon sang of the maid with honey in her hair. “Black Walder’s been mild as a lamb for once. And Uncle Edmure seems well content in his bride.” He leaned across her. “Ser Ryman?”
Ser Ryman Frey blinked and said, “Sire. Yes?”
“I’d hoped to ask Olyvar to squire for me when we march north,” said Robb, “but I do not see him here. Would he be at the other feast?”
“Olyvar?” Ser Ryman shook his head. “No. Not Olyvar. Gone . . . gone from the castles. Duty.”
“I see.” Robb’s tone suggested otherwise. When Ser Ryman offered nothing more, the king got to his feet again. “Would you care for a dance, Mother?”
“Thank you, but no.” A dance was the last thing she needed, the way her head was throbbing. “No doubt one of Lord Walder’s daughters would be pleased to partner you.”
“Oh, no doubt.” His smile was resigned.
The musicians were playing “Iron Lances” by then, while the Greatjon sang “The Lusty Lad.” Someone should acquaint them with each other, it might improve the harmony. Catelyn turned back to Ser Ryman. “I had heard that one of your cousins was a singer.”
“Alesander. Symond’s son. Alyx is his sister.” He raised a cup toward where she danced with Robin Flint.
“Will Alesander be playing for us tonight?”
Ser Ryman squinted at her. “Not him. He’s away.” He wiped sweat from his brow and lurched to his feet. “Pardons, my lady. Pardons.” Catelyn watched him stagger toward the door.
Edmure was kissing Roslin and squeezing her hand. Elsewhere in the hall, Ser Marq Piper and Ser Danwell Frey played a drinking game, Lame Lothar said something amusing to Ser Hosteen, one of the younger Freys juggled three daggers for a group of giggly girls, and Jinglebell sat on the floor sucking wine off his fingers. The servers were bringing out huge silver platters piled high with cuts of juicy pink lamb, the most appetizing dish they’d seen all evening. And Robb was leading Dacey Mormont in a dance.
When she wore a dress in place of a hauberk, Lady Maege’s eldest daughter was quite pretty; tall and willowy, with a shy smile that made her long face light up. It was pleasant to see that she could be as graceful on the dance floor as in the training yard. Catelyn wondered if Lady Maege had reached the Neck as yet. She had taken her other daughters with her, but as one of Robb’s battle companions Dacey had chosen to remain by his side. He has Ned’s gift for inspiring loyalty. Olyvar Frey had been devoted to her son as well. Hadn’t Robb said that Olyvar wanted to remain with him even after he’d married Jeyne?
Seated betwixt his black oak towers, the Lord of the Crossing clapped his spotted hands together. The noise they made was so faint that even those on the dais scarce heard it, but Ser Aenys and Ser Hosteen saw and began to pound their cups on the table. Lame Lothar joined them, then Marq Piper and Ser Danwell and Ser Raymund. Half the guests were soon pounding. Finally even the mob of musicians in the gallery took note. The piping, drumming, and fiddling trailed off into quiet.
“Your Grace,” Lord Walder called out to Robb, “the septon has prayed his prayers, some words have been said, and Lord Edmure’s wrapped my sweetling in a fish cloak, but they are not yet man and wife. A sword needs a sheath, heh, and a wedding needs a bedding. What does my sire say? Is it meet that we should bed them?”
A score or more of Walder Frey’s sons and grandsons began to bang their cups again, shouting, “To bed! To bed! To bed with them!” Roslin had gone white. Catelyn wondered whether it was the prospect of losing her maidenhead that frightened the girl, or the bedding itself. With so many siblings, she was not like to be a stranger to the custom, but it was different when you were the one being bedded. On Catelyn’s own wedding night, Jory Cassell had torn her gown in his haste to get her out of it, and drunken Desmond Grell kept apologizing for every bawdy joke, only to make another. When Lord Dustin had beheld her naked, he’d told Ned that her breasts were enough to make him wish he’d never been weaned. Poor man, she thought. He had ridden south with Ned, never to return. Catelyn wondered how many of the men here tonight would be dead before the year was done. Too many, I fear.
Robb raised a hand. “If you think the time is meet, Lord Walder, by all means let us bed them.”
A roar of approval greeted his pronouncement. Up in the gallery the musicians took up their pipes and horns and fiddles again, and began to play “The Queen Took Off Her Sandal, the King Took Off His Crown.” Jinglebell hopped from foot to foot, his own crown ringing. “I hear Tully men have trout between their legs instead of cocks,” Alyx Frey called out boldly. “Does it take a worm to make them rise?” To which Ser Marq Piper threw back, “I hear that Frey women have two gates in place of one!” and Alyx said, “Aye, but both are closed and barred to little things like you!” A gust of laughter followed, until Patrek Mallister climbed up onto a table to propose a toast to Edmure’s one-eyed fish. “And a mighty pike it is!” he proclaimed. “Nay, I’ll wager it’s a minnow,” Fat Walda Bolton shouted out from Catelyn’s side. Then the general cry of “Bed them! Bed them!” went up again.
The guests swarmed the dais, the drunkest in the forefront as ever. The men and boys surrounded Roslin and lifted her into the air whilst the maids and mothers in the hall pulled Edmure to his feet and began tugging at his clothing. He was laughing and shouting bawdy jokes back at them, though the music was too loud for Catelyn to hear. She heard the Greatjon, though. “Give this little bride to me,” he bellowed as he shoved through the other men and threw Roslin over one shoulder. “Look at this little thing! No meat on her at all!”
Catelyn felt sorry for the girl. Most brides tried to return the banter, or at least pretended to enjoy it, but Roslin was stiff with terror, clutching the Greatjon as if she feared he might drop her. She’s crying too, Catelyn realized as she watched Ser Marq Piper pull off one of the bride’s shoes. I hope Edmure is gentle with the poor child. Jolly, bawdy music still poured down from the gallery; the queen was taking off her kirtle now, and the king his tunic.
She knew she should join the throng of women round her brother, but she would only ruin their fun. The last thing she felt just now was bawdy. Edmure would forgive her absence, she did not doubt; much jollier to be stripped and bedded by a score of lusty, laughing Freys than by a sour, stricken sister.
As man and maid were carried from the hall, a trail of clothing behind them, Catelyn saw that Robb had also remained. Walder Frey was prickly enough to see some insult to his daughter in that. He should join in Roslin’s bedding, but is it my place to tell him so? She tensed, until she saw that others had stayed as well. Petyr Pimple and Ser Whalen Frey slept on, their heads on the table. Merrett Frey poured himself another cup of wine, while Jinglebell wandered about stealing bites off the plates of those who’d left. Ser Wendel Manderly was lustily attacking a leg of lamb. And of course Lord Walder was far too feeble to leave his seat without help. He will expect Robb to go, though. She could almost hear the old man asking why His Grace did not want to see his daughter naked. The drums were pounding again, pounding and pounding and pounding.
Dacey Mormont, who seemed to be the only woman left in the hall besides Catelyn, stepped up behind Edwyn Frey, and touched him lightly on the arm as she said something in his ear. Edwyn wrenched himself away from her with unseemly violence. “No,” he said, too loudly. “I’m done with dancing for the nonce.” Dacey paled and turned away. Catelyn got slowly to her feet. What just happened there? Doubt gripped her heart, where an instant before had been only weariness. It is nothing, she tried to tell herself, you are seeing grumkins in the woodpile, you are become an old silly woman sick with grief and fear. But something must have shown on her face. Even Ser Wendel Manderly took note. “Is something amiss?” he asked, the leg of lamb in his hands.
She did not answer him. Instead she went after Edwyn Frey. The players in the gallery had finally gotten both king and queen down to their name-day suits. With scarcely a moment’s respite, they began to play a very different sort of song. No one sang the words, but Catelyn knew “The Rains of Castamere” when she heard it. Edwyn was hurrying toward a door. She hurried faster, driven by the music. Six quick strides and she caught him. And who are you, the proud lord said, that I must bow so low? She grabbed Edwyn by the arm to turn him and went cold all over when she felt the iron rings beneath his silken sleeve.
Catelyn slapped him so hard she broke his lip. Olyvar, she thought, and Perwyn, Alesander, all absent. And Roslin wept . . . 
Edwyn Frey shoved her aside. The music drowned all other sound, echoing off the walls as if the stones themselves were playing. Robb gave Edwyn an angry look and moved to block his way . . . and staggered suddenly as a quarrel sprouted from his side, just beneath the shoulder. If he screamed then, the sound was swallowed by the pipes and horns and fiddles. Catelyn saw a second bolt pierce his leg, saw him fall. Up in the gallery, half the musicians had crossbows in their hands instead of drums or lutes. She ran toward her son, until something punched in the small of the back and the hard stone floor came up to slap her. “Robb!” she screamed. She saw Smalljon Umber wrestle a table off its trestles. Crossbow bolts thudded into the wood, one two three, as he flung it down on top of his king. Robin Flint was ringed by Freys, their daggers rising and falling. Ser Wendel Manderly rose ponderously to his feet, holding his leg of lamb. A quarrel went in his open mouth and came out the back of his neck. Ser Wendel crashed forward, knocking the table off its trestles and sending cups, flagons, trenchers, platters, turnips, beets, and wine bouncing, spilling, and sliding across the floor.
Catelyn’s back was on fire. I have to reach him. The Smalljon bludgeoned Ser Raymund Frey across the face with a leg of mutton. But when he reached for his swordbelt a crossbow bolt drove him to his knees. In a coat of gold or a coat of red, a lion still has claws. She saw Lucas Blackwood cut down by Ser Hosteen Frey. One of the Vances was hamstrung by Black Walder as he was wrestling with Ser Harys Haigh. And mine are long and sharp, my lord, as long and sharp as yours. The crossbows took Donnel Locke, Owen Norrey, and half a dozen more. Young Ser Benfrey had seized Dacey Mormont by the arm, but Catelyn saw her grab up a flagon of wine with her other hand, smash it full in his face, and run for the door. It flew open before she reached it. Ser Ryman Frey pushed into the hall, clad in steel from helm to heel. A dozen Frey men-at-arms packed the door behind him. They were armed with heavy longaxes.
“Mercy!” Catelyn cried, but horns and drums and the clash of steel smothered her plea. Ser Ryman buried the head of his axe in Dacey’s stomach. By then men were pouring in the other doors as well, mailed men in shaggy fur cloaks with steel in their hands. Northmen! She took them for rescue for half a heartbeat, till one of them struck the Smalljon’s head off with two huge blows of his axe. Hope blew out like a candle in a storm.
In the midst of slaughter, the Lord of the Crossing sat on his carved oaken throne, watching greedily.
There was a dagger on the floor a few feet away. Perhaps it had skittered there when the Smalljon knocked the table off its trestles, or perhaps it had fallen from the hand of some dying man. Catelyn crawled toward it. Her limbs were leaden, and the taste of blood was in her mouth. I will kill Walder Frey, she told herself. Jinglebell was closer to the knife, hiding under a table, but he only cringed away as she snatched up the blade. I will kill the old man, I can do that much at least.
Then the tabletop that the Smalljon had flung over Robb shifted, and her son struggled to his knees. He had an arrow in his side, a second in his leg, a third through his chest. Lord Walder raised a hand, and the music stopped, all but one drum. Catelyn heard the crash of distant battle, and closer the wild howling of a wolf. Grey Wind, she remembered too late. “Heh,” Lord Walder cackled at Robb, “the King in the North arises. Seems we killed some of your men, Your Grace. Oh, but I’ll make you an apology, that will mend them all again, heh.”
Catelyn grabbed a handful of Jinglebell Frey’s long grey hair and dragged him out of his hiding place. “Lord Walder!” she shouted. “LORD WALDER!” The drum beat slow and sonorous, doom boom doom. “Enough,” said Catelyn. “Enough, I say. You have repaid betrayal with betrayal, let it end.” When she pressed her dagger to Jinglebell’s throat, the memory of Bran’s sickroom came back to her, with the feel of steel at her own throat. The drum went boom doom boom doom boom doom. “Please,” she said. “He is my son. My first son, and my last. Let him go. Let him go and I swear we will forget this . . . forget all you’ve done here. I swear it by the old gods and new, we . . . we will take no vengeance . . .”
Lord Walder peered at her in mistrust. “Only a fool would believe such blather. D’you take me for a fool, my lady?”
“I take you for a father. Keep me for a hostage, Edmure as well if you haven’t killed him. But let Robb go.”
“No.” Robb’s voice was whisper faint. “Mother, no . . .”
“Yes. Robb, get up. Get up and walk out, please, please. Save yourself . . . if not for me, for Jeyne.”
“Jeyne?” Robb grabbed the edge of the table and forced himself to stand. “Mother,” he said, “Grey Wind . . .”
“Go to him. Now. Robb, walk out of here.”
Lord Walder snorted. “And why would I let him do that?”
She pressed the blade deeper into Jinglebell’s throat. The lackwit rolled his eyes at her in mute appeal. A foul stench assailed her nose, but she paid it no more mind than she did the sullen ceaseless pounding of that drum, boom doom boom doom boom doom. Ser Ryman and Black Walder were circling round her back, but Catelyn did not care. They could do as they wished with her; imprison her, rape her, kill her, it made no matter. She had lived too long, and Ned was waiting. It was Robb she feared for. “On my honor as a Tully,” she told Lord Walder, “on my honor as a Stark, I will trade your boy’s life for Robb’s. A son for a son.” Her hand shook so badly she was ringing Jinglebell’s head.
Boom, the drum sounded, boom doom boom doom. The old man’s lips went in and out. The knife trembled in Catelyn’s hand, slippery with sweat. “A son for a son, heh,” he repeated. “But that’s a grandson . . . and he never was much use.”
A man in dark armor and a pale pink cloak spotted with blood stepped up to Robb. “Jaime Lannister sends his regards.” He thrust his longsword through her son’s heart, and twisted.
Robb had broken his word, but Catelyn kept hers. She tugged hard on Aegon’s hair and sawed at his neck until the blade grated on bone. Blood ran hot over her fingers. His little bells were ringing, ringing, ringing, and the drum went boom doom boom.
Finally someone took the knife away from her. The tears burned like vinegar as they ran down her cheeks. Ten fierce ravens were raking her face with sharp talons and tearing off strips of flesh, leaving deep furrows that ran red with blood. She could taste it on her lips.
It hurts so much, she thought. Our children, Ned, all our sweet babes. Rickon, Bran, Arya, Sansa, Robb . . . Robb . . . please, Ned, please, make it stop, make it stop hurting . . . The white tears and the red ones ran together until her face was torn and tattered, the face that Ned had loved. Catelyn Stark raised her hands and watched the blood run down her long fingers, over her wrists, beneath the sleeves of her gown. Slow red worms crawled along her arms and under her clothes. It tickles. That made her laugh until she screamed. “Mad,” someone said, “she’s lost her wits,” and someone else said, “Make an end,” and a hand grabbed her scalp just as she’d done with Jinglebell, and she thought, No, don’t, don’t cut my hair, Ned loves my hair. Then the steel was at her throat, and its bite was red and cold.

